Skip to main content
 
 UPLOAD
 SIGN UP | LOG IN
 
BOOKS
 
VIDEO
 
AUDIO
 
SOFTWARE
 
IMAGES
ABOUT  BLOG  PROJECTS  HELP  DONATE  CONTACT  JOBS  VOLUNTEER  PEOPLE
 Search Metadata
 Search text contents
 Search TV news captions
 Search radio transcripts
 Search archived websites
Advanced Search
Sign up for free
Log in
Full text of "JIM CORBETT OMNIBUS"
See other formats
MAN-EATERS OF KUMAOH 


THE TEMPLE TIC E R AND MORE MAN-EATERS OF KUMAON 


THE MAN-EATINC LEOPARD OF RU D RAPRAYAC 


MY INDIA 







JIM CORBETT OMNIBUS 



ROOK ONF.: 

MAN-FATERS OF KTJMAON 




Introduction 

by Sir Maurice Hallett, Governor of the United Provinces , 
1939 - 45 . 

THESE jungle stories by Jim Corbett merit as much popularity 
and as wide a circulation as Rudyard Kipling's Jungle Books. 
Kipling's Jungle Books were fiction, based on great knowledge 
of jungle life; Corbett's stories are fact, and fact is often 
stranger than fiction. These stories should prove of entrancing 
interest to all boys and girls who like exciting yarns; they 
should be of equal interest to all who take any interest in the 
wild life of the jungle; they should prove of great value to any 
genuine sportsman who wishes to earn by his own efforts the 
credit of shooting a tiger; they will be of interest even to the so- 
called sportsman who feels some pride in killing a tiger when 
all that he has done is to fire straight from a safe position on a 
machan or on the back of a staunch elephant, when all the hard 
work involved in beating up a tiger to his death has been done 
by others. 

Corbett's description of his campaign against the man-eaters of 
the Kumaon Hills shows the qualities that a successful shikari 
needs, physical strength, infinite patience, great power of 
observation and power not only to notice small signs but also to 
draw the right inference from those signs. To these must be 
added great courage. I will not make quotations from the book 
to prove this statement. Read the book for yourself; you will 
soon see the truth of it; these qualities were exhibited by 
Corbett himself, by his friends who helped him in some of these 
campaigns, by the villagers whom he went to protect, and by 
his big-hearted and faithful companion Robin. 

Jim Corbett's name is already a household word in Kumaon; I 
hope that as a result of this book it will get still wider fame. 


M. G. HALLETT 



Foreword 

by Lord LinlithgowViceroy of India, 1936-43. 

THESE stories are the true account of Major Corbett's 
experiences with man-eating tigers in the jungles of the United 
Provinces. I am most glad to commend them to all who enjoy a 
tale well told of action and adventure. 

The sportsman will find much to entertain and inform him in 
Major Corbett's book. If every beginner would study it before 
tackling his first tiger, fewer persons would be killed or 
seriously injured when hunting these creatures. For something 
more is required than courage and good marksmanship for the 
successful pursuit of dangerous game. Forethought, 
preparation, and persistence are indispensable to success. 

Over wide areas of the United Provinces the authors name is 
familiar to the village folk as that of the man who has brought 
them relief from the great fear inspired by a cruel and 
malignant presence in their midst. Many a District Officer, 
faced with the utter disorganization of rural life that attends 
the presence of a man-eating tiger or panther, has turned to 
Jim Corbett for help— never, I believe, in vain. Indeed the 
destruction of these abnormal and dangerous animals is a 
service of great value both to the afflicted population and to 
Government. 

The reader will find in these stories many proofs of the author's 
love of nature. Having spent in Major Corbett's company some 
part of such holidays as I have contrived to take during my time 
in India, I can with confidence write of him that no man with 
whom I have hunted in any continent better understands the 
signs of the jungle. Very often he has told me of the intense 
happiness he has derived from his observations of wild life. I 
make no doubt that it is in large part the recollection of all that 
his own eyes have brought him that moves him now to dedicate 
this first edition of his book to the aid of soldiers blinded in 
war, and to arrange that all profits from its sale shall be 



devoted to the funds of St Dunstan's, the famous institution in 
which men who have given their sight for their country and for 
the great cause of human freedom may learn, despite their 
affliction, to lead useful and happy lives; and whose beneficent 
ministrations are extended now to the armed forces in India. 

LINLITHGOW, 
Viceroy's House, New Delhi 



Author's Note 

As many of the stories in this book are about man-eating tigers, 
it is perhaps desirable to explain why these animals develop 
man-eating tendencies. 

A man-eating tiger is a tiger that has been compelled, through 
stress of circumstances beyond its control, to adopt a diet alien 
to it. The stress of circumstances is, in nine cases out of ten, 
wounds, and in the tenth case old age. The wound that has 
caused a particular tiger to take to man-eating might be the 
result of a carelessly fired shot and failure to follow up and 
recover the wounded animal, or be the result of the tiger 
having lost his temper when killing a porcupine. Human beings 
are not the natural prey of tigers, and it is only when tigers 
have been incapacitated through wounds or old age that, in 
order to live, they are compelled to take to a diet of human 
flesh. 

A tiger when killing its natural prey, which it does either by 
stalking or lying in wait for it, depends for the success of its 
attack on its speed and, to a lesser extent, on the condition of 
its teeth and claws. When, therefore, a tiger is suffering from 
one or more painful wounds, or when its teeth are missing or 
defective and its claw worn down, and it is unable to catch the 
animals it has been accustomed to eating, it is driven by 
necessity to killing human beings. The change-over from 
animal to human flesh is, I believe, in most cases accidental. As 
an illustration of what I mean by ' accidental 1 I quote the case 
of the Muktesar man-eating tigress. This tigress, a 
comparatively young animal, in an encounter with a porcupine 
lost an eye and got some fifty quills, varying in length from one 
to nine inches, embedded in the arm and under the pad of her 
right foreleg. Several of these quills after striking a bone had 
doubled back in the form of a U, the point, and the broken-off 
end, being quite close together. Suppurating sores formed 
where she endeavoured to extract the quills with her teeth, and 
while she was lying up in a thick patch of grass, starving and 



licking her wounds, a woman selected this particular patch of 
grass to cut as fodder for her cattle. At first the tigress took no 
notice, but when the woman had cut the grass right up to 
where she was lying the tigress struck once, the blow crushing 
in the woman's skull. Death was instantaneous, for, when found 
the following day, she was grasping her sickle with one hand 
and holding a tuft of grass, which she was about to cut when 
struck, with the other. Leaving the woman lying where she had 
fallen, the tigress limped off for a distance of over a mile and 
took refuge in a little hollow under a fallen tree. Two days later 
a man came to chip firewood off this fallen tree, and the tigress 
who was lying on the far side killed him. The man fell across 
the tree, and as he had removed his coat and shirt and the 
tigress had clawed his back when killing him, it is possible that 
the smell of the blood trickling down his body as he hung 
across the bole of the tree first gave her the idea that he was 
something that she could satisfy her hunger with. However that 
may be, before leaving him she ate a small portion from his 
back. A day after she killed her third victim deliberately, and 
without having received any provocation. Thereafter she 
became an established man-eater and had killed twenty-four 
people before she was finally accounted for. 

A tiger on a fresh kill, or a wounded tiger, or a tigress with 
small cubs, will occasionally kill human beings who disturb 
them; but these tigers cannot, by any stretch of imagination, be 
called man-eaters, though they are often so called. Personally I 
would give a tiger the benefit of the doubt once, and once 
again, before classing it as a man-eater, and whenever possible 
I would subject the alleged victim to a post-mortem before 
letting the kill go down on the records as the kill of a tiger or a 
leopard, as the case might be. This subject of post-mortems of 
human beings alleged to have been killed by either tigers or 
leopards or, in the plains, by wolves or hyenas, is of great 
importance, for, though I refrain from giving instances, I know 
of cases where deaths have wrongly been ascribed to 
carnivora. 



It is a popular fallacy that all man-eaters are old and mangy 
the mange being attributed to the excess of salt in human flesh. 
I am not competent to give any opinion on the relative quantity 
of salt in human or animal flesh; but I can, and I do, assert that 
a diet of human flesh, so far from having an injurious effect on 
the coat of man-eaters, has quite the opposite effect, for all the 
man-eaters I have seen have had remarkably fine coats. 

Another popular belief in connexion with man-eaters is that the 
cubs of these animals automatically become man-eaters. This is 
quite a reasonable supposition; but it is not borne out by actual 
facts, and the reason why the cubs of a man-eater do not 
themselves become man-eaters, is that human beings are not 
the natural prey of tigers, or of leopards. 

A cub will eat whatever its mother provides, and I have even 
known of tiger cubs assisting their mothers to kill human 
beings: but I do not know of a single instance of a cub, after it 
had left the protection of its parent, or after that parent had 
been killed, taking to killing human beings. 

In the case of human beings killed by carnivora, the doubt is 
often expressed' as to whether the animal responsible for the 
kill is a tiger or leopard. As a general rule— to which I have 
seen no exceptions— tigers are responsible for all kills that 
take place in daylight, and leopards are responsible for all kills 
that take place in the dark. Both animals are semi-nocturnal 
forest-dwellers, have much the same habits, employ similar 
methods of killing, and both are capable of carrying their 
human victims for long distances. It would be natural, 
therefore, to expect them to hunt at the same hours; and that 
they do not do so is due to the difference in courage of the two 
animals. When a tiger becomes a man-eater it loses all fear of 
human beings and, as human beings move about more freely in 
the day than they do at night, it is able to secure its victims 
during daylight hours and there is no necessity for it to visit 
their habitations at night. A leopard on the other hand, even 
after it has killed scores of human beings, never loses its fear 



of man; and, as it is unwilling to face up to human beings in 
daylight, it secures its victims when they are moving about at 
night, or by breaking into their houses at night. Owing to these 
characteristics of the two animals, namely, that one loses its 
fear of human beings and kills in the daylight, while the other 
retains its fear and kills in the dark, man-eating tigers are 
easier to shoot than man-eating leopards. 

The frequency with which a man-eating tiger kills depends on 
(a) the supply of natural food in the area in which it is 
operating; (b) the nature of the disability which has caused it to 
become a man-eater, and (c) whether it is a male or a female 
with cubs. 

Those of us who lack the opportunity of forming our own 
opinion on any particular subject are apt to accept the opinions 
of others, and in no case is this more apparent than in the case 
of tigers— here I do not refer to man-eaters in particular, but to 
tigers in general. The author who first used the words 1 as cruel 
as a tiger 1 and 'as bloodthirsty as a tiger 1 , when attempting to 
emphasize the evil character of the villain of his piece, not only 
showed a lamentable ignorance of the animal he defamed, but 
coined phrases which have come into universal circulation, and 
which are mainly responsible for the wrong opinion of tigers 
held by all except that very small proportion of the public who 
have the opportunity of forming their own opinions. 

When I see the expression 'as cruel as a tiger' and 1 as 
bloodthirsty as a tiger' in print, I think of a small boy armed 
with an old muzzle— loading gun— the right barrel of which 
was split for six inches of its length, and the stock and barrels 
of which were kept from falling apart by lashings of brass wire 
— wandering through the jungles of the terai and bhabar in the 
days when there were ten tigers to every one that now 
survives; sleeping anywhere he happened to be when night 
came on, with a small fire to give him company and warmth, 
wakened at intervals by the calling of tigers, sometimes in the 
distance, at other times near at hand; throwing another stick 



on the fire and turning over and continuing his interrupted 
sleep without one thought of unease; knowing from his own 
short experience and from what others, who like himself had 
spent their days in the jungles, had told him, that a tiger, unless 
molested, would do him no harm; or during daylight hours 
avoiding any tiger he saw, and when that was not possible, 
standing perfectly still until it had passed and gone, before 
continuing on his way And I think of him on one occasion 
stalking half-a-dozen jungle fowl that were feeding in the open, 
and on creeping up to a plum bush and standing up to peer 
over, the bush heaving and a tiger walking out on the far side 
and, on clearing the bush, turning round and looking at the boy 
with an expression on its face which said as clearly as any 
words, 'Hello, kid, what the hell are you doing here ? 1 and, 
receiving no answer, turning round and waiting away very 
slowly without once looking back.. And then again I think of the 
tens of thousands of men, women and children who, while 
working in the forests or cutting grass or collecting dry sticks, 
pass day after day close to where tigers are lying up and who, 
when they return safely to their homes, do not even know that 
they have been under the observation of this so called 'cruel' 
and 1 bloodthirsty 1 animal. 

Half a century has rolled by since the day the tiger walked out 
of the plum bush, the latter thirty-two years of which have been 
spent in the more or less regular pursuit of man-eaters, and 
though sights have been seen which would have caused a stone 
to weep, I have not seen a case where a tiger has been 
deliberately cruel or where it has been bloodthirsty to the 
extent that it has killed, without provocation, more than it has 
needed to satisfy its hunger or the hunger of its cubs. 

A tiger's function in the scheme of things is to help maintain 
the balance in nature and if, on rare occasions when driven by 
dire necessity, he kills a human being or when his natural food 
has been ruthlessly exterminated by man he kills two per cent 
of the cattle he is alleged to have killed, it is not fair that for 
these acts a whole species should be branded as being cruel 



and bloodthirsty. 

Sportsmen are admittedly conservative, the reason being that 
it has taken them years to form their opinions, and as each 
individual has a different point of view, it is only natural that 
opinions should differ on minor, or even in some cases on 
major, points, and for this reason I do not flatter myself that all 
the opinions I have expressed will meet with universal 
agreement. 

There is, however, one point on which I am convinced that all 
sportsmen— no matter whether their viewpoint has been a 
platform on a tree, the back of an elephant or their own feet— 
will agree with me, and that is, that a tiger is a large-hearted 
gentleman with boundless courage and that when he is 
exterminated— as exterminated he will be unless public 
opinion rallies to his support— India will be the poorer by 
having lost the finest of her fauna. 

Leopards, unlike tigers, are to a certain extent scavengers and 
become man-eaters by acquiring a taste for human flesh when 
unrestricted slaughter of game has deprived them of their 
natural food. 

The dwellers in our hills are predominantly Hindu, and as such 
cremate their dead. The cremation invariably takes place on 
the bank of a stream or river in order that the ashes may be 
washed down into the Ganges and eventually into the sea. As 
most of the villages are situated high up on the hills, while the 
streams or rivers are in many cases miles away down in the 
valleys, it will be realized that a funeral entails a considerable 
tax on the man-power of a small community when, in addition 
to the carrying party, labour has to be provided to collect and 
carry the fuel needed for the cremation. In normal times these 
rites are carried out very effectively; but when disease in 
epidemic form sweeps through the hills and the inhabitants die 
faster than they can be disposed of, a very simple rite, which 
consists of placing a live coal in the mouth of the deceased, is 
performed in the village and the body is then carried to the 



edge of the hill and cast into the valley below. 

A leopard, in an area in which his natural food is scarce, 
finding these bodies very soon acquires a taste for human flesh, 
and when the disease dies down and normal conditions are 
established, he very naturally, on finding his food supply cut off, 
takes to killing human beings. 

Of the two man-eating leopards of Kumaon, which between 
them killed five hundred and twenty-five human beings, one 
followed on the heels of a very severe outbreak of cholera, 
while the other followed the mysterious disease which swept 
through India in 1918 and was called 'war fever'. 



The Champawat Man-Eater 

I 

I WAS shooting with Eddie Knowles in Malani when I first 
heard of the tiger which later received official recognition as 
the 1 Champawat man-eater 

Eddie, who will long be remembered in this province as a 
sportsman par excellence and the possessor of an inexhaustible 
fund of shikar yarns, was one of those few, and very fortunate, 
individuals who possess the best of everything in life. His rifle 
was without equal in accuracy and striking power, and while 
one of his brothers was the best gun shot in India, another 
brother was the best tennis player in the Indian Army When 
therefore Eddie informed me that his brother-in-law, the best 
shikari in the world, had been deputed by Government to shoot 
the Champawat man-eater, it was safe to assume that a very 
definite period had been put to the animal's activities. 

The tiger, however, for some inexplicable reason, did not die, 
and was causing Government a great deal of anxiety when I 
visited Naini Tal four years later. Rewards were offered, special 
shikaris employed, and parties of Gurkhas sent out from the 
depot in Almora. Yet in spite of these measures, the toll of 
human victims continued to mount alarmingly. 

The tigress, for such the animal turned out to be, had arrived in 
Kumaon as a full-fledged man-eater, from Nepal, from whence 
she had been driven out by a body of armed Nepalese after she 
had killed two hundred human beings, and during the four 
years she had been operating in Kumaon had added two 
hundred and thirty-four to this number. 

This is how matters stood, when shortly after my arrival in 
Naini Tal I received a visit from Berthoud. Berthoud, who was 
Deputy Commissioner of Naini Tal at that time, and who after 
his tragic death now lies buried in an obscure grave in 
Haldwani, was a man who was loved and respected by all who 
knew him, and it is not surprising therefore that when he told 



me of the trouble the man-eater was giving the people of his 
district, and the anxiety it was causing him, he took my 
promise with him that I would start for Champawat 
immediately on receipt of news of the next human kill. 

Two conditions I made, however: one that the Government 
rewards be cancelled, and the other, that the special shikaris, 
and regulars from Almora, be withdrawn. My reasons for 
making these conditions need no explanation for I am sure all 
sportsmen share my aversion to being classed as a reward- 
hunter and are as anxious as I am to avoid the risk of being 
accidentally shot. These conditions were agreed to, and a week 
later Berthoud paid me an early morning visit and informed me 
that news had been brought in during the night by runners that 
a woman had been killed by the man-eater at Pali, a village 
between Dabidhura and Dhunaghat. 

In anticipation of a start at short notice, I had engaged six men 
to carry my camp kit, and leaving after breakfast, we did a 
march the first day of seventeen miles to Dhari. Breakfasting at 
Mornaula next morning, we spent the night at Dabidhura, and 
arrived at Pali the following evening, five days after the woman 
had been killed. 

The people of the village, numbering some fifty men, women 
and children, were in a state of abject terror, and though the 
sun was still up when I arrived I found the entire population 
inside their homes behind locked doors, and it was not until my 
men had made a fire in the courtyard and I was sitting down to 
a cup of tea that a door here and there was cautiously opened, 
and the frightened inmates emerged. 

I was informed that for five days no one had gone beyond their 
own doorsteps— the insanitary condition of the courtyard 
testified to the truth of this statement— that food was running 
short, and that the people would starve if the tiger was not 
killed or driven away. 

That the tiger was still in the vicinity was apparent. For three 



nights it had been heard calling on the road, distant a hundred 
yards from the houses, and that very day it had been seen on 
the cultivated land at the lower end of the village. 

The Headman of the village very willingly placed a room at my 
disposal, but as there were eight of us to share it, and the only 
door it possessed opened on to the insanitary courtyard, I 
elected to spend the night in the open. 

After a scratch meal which had to do duty for dinner, I saw my 
men safely shut into the room and myself took up a position on 
the side of the road, with my back to a tree. The villagers said 
the tiger was in the habit of perambulating along this road, and 
as the moon was at the full I thought there was a chance of my 
getting a shot— provided I saw it first. 

I had spent many nights in the jungle looking for game, but this 
was the first time I had ever spent a night looking for a man- 
eater. The length of road immediately in front of me was 
brilliantly lit by the moon, but to right and left the overhanging 
trees cast dark shadows, and when the night wind agitated the 
branches and the shadows moved, I saw a dozen tigers 
advancing on me, and bitterly regretted the impulse that had 
induced me to place myself at the man-eater's mercy. I lacked 
the courage to return to the village and admit I was too 
frightened to carry out my self-imposed task, and with teeth 
chattering, as much from fear as from cold, I sat out the long 
night. As the grey dawn was lighting up the snowy range which 
I was facing, I rested my head on my drawn-up knees, and it 
was in this position my men an hour later found me— fast 
asleep; of the tiger I had neither heard nor seen anything. 

Back in the village I tried to get the men— who I could see 
were very surprised I had survived the night— to take me to 
the places where the people of the village had from time to 
time been killed, but this they were unwilling to do. From the 
courtyard they pointed out the direction in which the kills had 
taken place; the last kill— the one that had brought me to the 
spot— I was told, had taken place round the shoulder of the hill 



to the west of the village. The women and girls, some twenty in 
number, who had been out collecting oak leaves for the cattle 
when the unfortunate woman had been killed, were eager to 
give me details of the occurrence. It appeared that the party 
had set out two hours before midday and, after going half a 
mile, had climbed into trees to cut leaves. The victim and two 
other women had selected a tree growing on the edge of a 
ravine, which I subsequently found was about four feet deep 
and ten to twelve feet wide. Having cut all the leaves she 
needed, the woman was climbing down from the tree when the 
tiger, who had approached unseen, stood up on its hind legs 
and caught her by the foot. Her hold was torn from the branch 
she was letting herself down by, and, pulling her into the 
ravine, the tiger released her foot, and while she was 
struggling to rise caught her by the throat. After killing her it 
sprang up the side of the ravine and disappeared with her into 
some heavy undergrowth. 

All this had taken place a few feet from the two women on the 
tree, and had been witnessed by the entire party. As soon as 
the tiger and its victim were out of sight, the terror-stricken 
women and girls ran back to the village. The men had just 
come in for their midday meal and, when all were assembled 
and armed with drums, metal cooking-pots— anything in fact 
that would produce a noise— the rescue party set off, the men 
leading and the women bringing up the rear. 

Arrived at the ravine in which the woman had been killed, the 
very important question of 1 what next?' was being debated 
when the tiger interrupted the proceedings by emitting a loud 
roar from the bushes thirty yards away. As one man the party 
turned and fled helter-skelter back to the village. When breath 
had been regained, accusations were made against one and 
another of having been the first to run and cause the stampede. 

Words ran high until it was suggested that if no one was afraid 
and all were as brave as they claimed to be, why not go back 
and rescue the woman without loss of more time? The 



suggestion was adopted, and three times the party got as far as 
the ravine. On the third occasion the one man who was armed 
with a gun fired it off, and brought the tiger roaring out of the 
bushes; after this the attempted rescue was very wisely 
abandoned. On my asking the gun man why he had not 
discharged his piece into the bushes instead of up into the air, 
he said the tiger was already greatly enraged and that if by any 
mischance he had hit it, it would undoubtedly have killed him. 

For three hours that morning I walked round the village 
looking for tracks and hoping, and at the same time dreading, 
to meet the tiger. At one place in a dark heavily-wooded ravine, 
while I was skirting some bushes, a covey of kaleege pheasants 
fluttered screaming out of them, and I thought my heart had 
stopped beating for good. 

My men had cleared a spot under a walnut tree for my meals, 
and after breakfast the Headman of the village asked me to 
mount guard while the wheat crop was being cut. He said that 
if the crop was not harvested in my presence, it would not be 
harvested at all, for the people were too frightened to leave 
their homes. Half an hour later the entire population of the 
village, assisted by my men, were hard at work while I stood on 
guard with a loaded rifle. By evening the crop from five large 
fields had been gathered, leaving only two small patches close 
to the houses, which the Headman said he would have no 
difficulty in dealing with the next day. 

The sanitary condition of the village had been much improved, 
and a second room for my exclusive use placed at my disposal; 
and that night, with thorn bushes securely wedged in the 
doorway to admit ventilation and exclude the man-eater, I made 
up for the sleep I had lost the previous night. 

My presence was beginning to put new heart into the people 
and they were moving about more freely, but I had not yet 
gained sufficient of their confidence to renew my request of 
being shown round the jungle, to which I attached some 
importance. These people knew every foot of the ground for 



miles round, and could, if they wished, show me where I was 
most likely to find the tiger, or in any case, where I could see 
its pug marks. That the man-eater was a tiger was an 
established fact, but it was not known whether the animal was 
young or old, a male or a female, and this information, which I 
believed would help me to get in touch with it, I could only 
ascertain by examining its pug marks. 

After an early tea that morning I announced that I wanted meat 
for my men and asked the villagers if they could direct me to 
where I could shoot a ghooral (mountain goat). The village was 
situated on the top of a long ridge running east and west, and 
just below the road on which I had spent the night the hill fell 
steeply away to the north in a series of grassy slopes; on these 
slopes I was told ghooral were plentiful, and several men 
volunteered to show me over the ground. I was careful not to 
show my pleasure at this offer and, selecting three men, I set 
out, telling the Headman that if I found the ghooral as plentiful 
as he said they were, I would shoot two for the village in 
addition to shooting one for my men. 

Crossing the road we went down a very steep ridge, keeping a 
sharp lookout to right and left, but saw nothing. Half a mile 
down the hill the ravines converged, and from their junction 
there was a good view of the rocky, and grass-covered, slope to 
the right. I had been sitting for some minutes, scanning the 
slope, with my back to a solitary pine which grew at this spot, 
when a movement high up on the hill caught my eye. When the 
movement was repeated I saw it was a ghooral flapping its 
ears; the animal was standing in grass and only its head was 
visible. The men had not seen the movement, and as the head 
was now stationary and blended in with its surroundings it was 
not possible to point it out to them. Giving them a general idea 
of the animal's position I made them sit down and watch while I 
took a shot. I was armed with an old Martini Henry rifle, a 
weapon that atoned for its vicious kick by being dead accurate 
— up to any range. The distance was as near 200 yards as 
made no matter and, lying down and resting the rifle on a 



convenient pine root, I took careful aim, and fired. 

The smoke from the black powder cartridge obscured my view 
and the men said nothing had happened and that I had 
probably fired at a rock, or a bunch of dead leaves. Retaining 
my position I reloaded the rifle and presently saw the grass, a 
little below where I had fired, moving, and the hind quarters of 
the ghooral appeared. When the whole animal was free of the 
grass it started to roll over and over, gaming momentum as it 
came down the steep hill. When' it was half-way down it 
disappeared into heavy grass, and disturbed two ghooral that 
had been lying up there. Sneezing their alarm call, the two 
animals dashed out of the grass and went bounding up the hill. 
The range was shorter now, and, adjusting the leaf sight, I 
waited until the bigger of the two slowed down and put a bullet 
through its back, and as the other one turned, and made off 
diagonally across the hill, I shot it through the shoulder. 

On occasions one is privileged to accomplish the seemingly 
impossible. Lying in an uncomfortable position and shooting up 
at an angle of sixty degrees at a range of 200 yards at the small 
white mark on the ghooral's throat, there did not appear to be 
one chance in a million of the shot coming off, and yet the 
heavy lead bullet driven by black powder had not been 
deflected by a hair's breadth and had gone true to its mark, 
killing the animal instantaneously. Again, on the steep hillside 
which was broken up by small ravines and jutting rocks, the 
dead animal had slipped and rolled straight to the spot where 
its two companions were lying up; and before it had cleared the 
patch of grass the two companions in their turn were slipping 
rolling down the hill. As the three dead animals landed in the 
ravine in front of us it was amusing to observe the surprise and 
delight of the men who never before had seen a rifle in action. 
All thought of the man-eater was for the time being forgotten 
as they scrambled down into the ravine to retrieve the bag. 

The expedition was a great success in more ways than one; for 
in addition to providing a ration of meat for everyone, it gained 



me the confidence of the entire village. Shikar yarns, as 
everyone knows, never lose anything in repetition, and while 
the ghooral were being skinned and divided up the three men 
who had accompanied me gave full rein to their imagination, 
and from where I sat in the open, having breakfast, I could 
hear the exclamations of the assembled crowd when they were 
told that the ghooral had been shot at a range of over a mile, 
and that the magic bullets used had not only killed the animals 
— like that— but had also drawn them to the sahib's feet. 

After the midday meal the Headman asked me where I wanted 
to go, and how many men I wished to take with me. From the 
eager throng of men who pressed round I selected two of my 
late companions, and with them to guide me set off to visit the 
scene of the last human tragedy. 

The people of our hills are Hindus and cremate their dead, and 
when one of their number has been carried off by a man-eater 
it is incumbent on the relatives to recover some portion of the 
body for cremation even if it be only a few splinters of bone. In 
the case of this woman the cremation ceremony was yet to be 
performed, and as we started out, the relatives requested us to 
bring back any portion of the body we might find. 

From early boyhood I have made a hobby of reading, and 
interpreting, jungle signs. In the present case I had the account 
of the eye-witnesses who were present when the woman was 
killed, but eye-witnesses are not always reliable, whereas 
jungle signs are a true record of all that has transpired. On 
arrival at the spot a glance at the ground showed me that the 
tiger could only have approached the tree one way, without 
being seen, and that was up the ravine. Entering the ravine a 
hundred yards below the tree, and working up, I found the pug 
marks of a tiger in some fine earth that had sifted down 
between two big rocks; these pug marks showed the animal to 
be a tigress, a little past her prime. Further up the ravine, and 
some ten yards from the tree, the tigress had lain down behind 
a rock, presumably to wait for the woman to climb down from 



the tree. The victim had been the first to cut all the leaves she 
needed, and as she was letting herself down by a branch some 
two inches in diameter the tigress had crept forward and, 
standing up on her hind legs, had caught the woman by the 
foot and pulled her down into the ravine. The branch showed 
the desperation with which the unfortunate woman had clung 
to it, for adhering to the rough oak bark where the branch, and 
eventually the leaves, had slipped through her grasp were 
strands of skin which had been torn from the palms of her 
hands and fingers. Where the tigress had killed the woman 
there were signs of a struggle and a big patch of dried blood; 
from here the blood trail, now dry but distinctly visible, led 
across the ravine and up the opposite bank. Following the 
blood trail from where it left the ravine we found the place in 
the bushes where the tigress had eaten her kill. 

It is a popular belief that man-eaters do not eat the head, 
hands, and feet of the human victims. This is incorrect. Man- 
eaters, if not disturbed, eat everything— including the blood- 
soaked clothes, as I found on one occasion; however, that is 
another story, and will be told some other time. 

On the present occasion we found the woman's clothes, and a 
few pieces of bone which we wrapped up in the clean cloth we 
had brought for the purpose. Pitifully little as these remains 
were, they would suffice for the cremation ceremony which 
would ensure the ashes of the high caste woman reaching 
Mother Ganges. 

After tea I visited the scene of yet another tragedy. Separated 
from the main village by the public road was a small holding of 
a few acres. The owner of this holding had built himself a hut 
on the hillside just above the road. The man's wife, and the 
mother of his two children, a boy and a girl aged four and six 
respectively, was the younger of two sisters. These two sisters 
were out cutting grass one day on the hill above the hut when 
the tigress suddenly appeared and carried off the elder sister. 
For a hundred yards the younger woman ran after the tigress 



brandishing her sickle and screaming at the tigress to let her 
sister go, and take her instead. This incredible act of heroism 
was witnessed by the people in the main village. After carrying 
the dead woman for a hundred yards the tigress put her down 
and turned on her pursuer. With a loud roar it sprang at the 
brave woman who, turning, raced down the hillside, across the 
road, and into the village, evidently with the intention of telling 
the people what they, unknown to her, had already witnessed. 
The woman's incoherent noises were at the time attributed to 
loss of breath, fear, and excitement, and it was not until the 
rescue party that had set out with all speed had returned, 
unsuccessful, that it was found the woman had lost her power 
of speech. I was told this tale in the village, and when I climbed 
the path to the two-roomed hut where the woman was engaged 
in washing clothes, she had then been dumb a twelvemonth. 

Except for a strained look in her eyes the dumb woman 
appeared to be guite normal and, when I stopped to speak to 
her and tell her I had come to try and shoot the tiger that had 
killed her sister, she put her hands together and stooping down 
touched my feet, making me feel a wretched impostor. True, I 
had come with the avowed object of shooting the man-eater, 
but with an animal that had the reputation of never killing 
twice in the same locality, never returning to a kill, and whose 
domain extended over an area of many hundred square miles, 
the chance of my accomplishing my object was about as good 
as finding a needle in two haystacks. 

Plans in plenty I had made way back in Naini Tal; one I had 
already tried and wild horses would not induce me to try it 
again, and the others— now that I was on the ground— were 
just as unattractive. Further there was no one I could ask for 
advice, for this was the first man-eater that had ever been 
known in Kumaon; and yet something would have to be done. 

So for the next three days I wandered through the jungles from 
sunrise to sunset, visiting all the places for miles round where 
the villagers told me there was a chance of my seeing the 
tigress. 



I would like to interrupt my tale here for a few minutes to 
refute a rumour current throughout the hills that on this, and 
on several subsequent occasions, I assumed the dress of a hill 
woman and, going into the jungle, attracted the man-eaters to 
myself and killed them with either a sickle or an axe. All I have 
ever done in the matter of alteration of dress has been to 
borrow a sari and with it draped round me cut grass, or, 
climbed into trees and cut leaves, and in no case has the ruse 
proved successful; though on two occasions— to my knowledge 
— man-eaters have stalked the tree I was on, taking cover, on 
one occasion behind a rock and on the other behind a fallen 
tree, and giving me no opportunity of shooting them. 

To continue. As the tigress now appeared to have left this 
locality I decided, much to the regret of the people of Pali, to 
move to Champawat fifteen miles due east of Pali. Making an 
early start, I breakfasted at Dhunaghat, and completed the 
journey to Champawat by sunset. The roads in this area were 
considered very unsafe, and men only moved from village to 
village or to the bazaars in large parties. After leaving 
Dhunaghat, my party of eight was added to by men from 
villages adjoining the road, and we arrived at Champawat 
thirty strong. Some of the men who joined me had been in a 
party of twenty men who had visited Champawat two months 
earlier, and they told me the following very pitiful story. 

'The road for a few miles on this side of Champawat runs along 
the south face of the hill, parallel to, and about fifty yards 
above the valley. Two months ago a party of twenty of us men 
were on our way to the bazaar at Champawat, and as we were 
going along this length of the road at about midday, we were 
startled by hearing the agonized cries of a human being coming 
from the valley below. Huddled together on the edge of the 
road we cowered in fright as these cries drew nearer and 
nearer, and presently into view came a tiger, carrying a naked 
woman. The woman's hair was trailing on the ground on one 
side of the tiger, and her feet on the other— the tiger was 
holding her by the small of the back— and she was beating her 



chest and calling alternately on God and man to help her. Fifty 
yards from, and in clear view of us, the tiger passed with its 
burden, and when the cries had died away in the distance we 
continued on our way. 1 

'And you twenty men did nothing? 1 

'No, sahib, we did nothing for we were afraid, and what can 
men do when they are afraid? And further, even if we had been 
able to rescue the woman without angering the tiger and 
bringing misfortune on ourselves, it would have availed the 
woman nothing, for she was covered with blood and would of a 
surety have died of her wounds/ 

I subsequently learned that the victim belonged to a village 
near Champawat, and that she had been carried off by the tiger 
while collecting dry sticks. Her companions had run back to the 
village and raised an alarm, and just as a rescue party was 
starting the twenty frightened men arrived. As these men knew 
the direction in which the tiger had gone with its victim, they 
joined the party, and can best carry on the story. 

'We were fifty or sixty strong when we set out to rescue the 
woman, and several of the party were armed with guns. A 
furlong from where the sticks collected by the woman were 
lying, and from where she had been carried off, we found her 
torn clothes. Thereafter the men started beating their drums 
and firing off their guns, and in this way we proceeded for 
more than a mile right up to the head of the valley, where we 
found the woman, who was little more than a girl, lying dead on 
a great slab of rock. Beyond licking off all the blood and 
making her body clean the tiger had not touched her, and, 
there being no woman in our party, we men averted our faces 
as we wrapped her body in the loincloths which one and 
another gave, for she looked as she lay on her back as one who 
sleeps, and would waken in shame when touched/ 

With experiences such as these to tell and retell through the 
long night watches behind fast-shut doors, it is little wonder 



that the character and outlook on life of people living year after 
year in a man-eater country should change, and that one 
coming from the outside should feel that he had stepped right 
into a world of stark realities and the rule of the tooth and claw, 
which forced man in the reign of the sabre-toothed tiger to 
shelter in dark caverns. I was young and inexperienced in those 
far-off Champawat days, but, even so, the conviction I came to 
after a brief sojourn in that stricken land, that there is no more 
terrible thing than to live and have one's being under the 
shadow of a man-eater, has been strengthened by thirty-two 
years' subsequent experience. 

The Tahsildar of Champawat, to whom I had been given letters 
of introduction, paid me a visit that night at the Dak Bungalow 
where I was putting up, and suggested I should move next day 
to a bungalow a few miles away, in the vicinity of which many 
human beings had been killed. 

Early next morning, accompanied by the Tahsildar, I set out for 
the bungalow, and while I was having breakfast on the 
verandah two men arrived with news that a cow had been 
killed by a tiger in a village ten miles away. The Tahsildar 
excused himself to attend to some urgent work at Champawat, 
and said he would return to the bungalow in the evening and 
stay the night with me. My guides were good walkers, and as 
the track went downhill most of the way we covered the ten 
miles in record time. Arrived at the village I was taken to a 
cattle-shed in which I found a week-old calf, killed and partly 
eaten by a leopard. Not having the time or the inclination to 
shoot the leopard I rewarded my guides, and retraced my steps 
to the bungalow. Here I found the Tahsildar had not returned, 
and as there was still an hour or more of daylight left I went 
out with the chowkidar of the bungalow to look at a place 
where he informed me a tiger was in the habit of drinking; this 
place I found to be the head of the spring which supplied the 
garden with irrigation water. In the soft earth round the spring 
were tiger pug marks several days old, but these tracks were 
quite different from the pug marks I had seen, and carefully 



examined, in the ravine in which the woman of Pali village had 
been killed. 

On returning to the bungalow I found the Tahsildar was back, 
and as we sat on the verandah I told him of my day's 
experience. Expressing regret at my having had to go so far on 
a wild-goose chase, he rose, saying that as he had a long way to 
go he must start at once. This announcement caused me no 
little surprise, for twice that day he had said he would stay the 
night with me. It was not the question of his staying the night 
that concerned me, but the risk he was taking; however, he was 
deaf to all my arguments and, as he stepped off the verandah 
into the dark night, with only one man following him carrying a 
smoky lantern which gave a mere glimmer of light, to do a walk 
of four miles in a locality in which men only moved in large 
parties in daylight, I took off my hat to a very brave man. 
Having watched him out of sight I turned and entered the 
bungalow. 

I have a tale to tell of that bungalow but I will not tell it here, 
for this is a book of jungle stories, and tales 'beyond the laws of 
nature ' do not consort well with such stories. 

II 

I spent the following morning in going round the very extensive 
fruit orchard and tea garden and in having a bath at the spring, 
and at about midday the Tahsildar, much to my relief, returned 
safely from Champawat. 

I was standing talking to him while looking down a long sloping 
hill with a village surrounded by cultivated land in the distance, 
when I saw a man leave the village and start up the hill in our 
direction. As the man drew nearer I saw he was alternately 
running and walking, and was quite evidently the bearer of 
important news. Telling the Tahsildar I would return in a few 
minutes, I set off at a run 'down the hill, and when the man saw 
me coming he sat down to take breath. As soon as I was near 
enough to hear him he called out, ' Come quickly, sahib, the 
man-eater has just killed a girl/ 'Sit still/ I called back, and 


turning ran up to the bungalow. I passed the news on to the 
Tahsildar while I was getting a rifle and some cartridges, and 
asked him to follow me down to the village. 

The man who had come for me was one of those exasperating 
individuals whose legs and tongue cannot function at the same 
time. When he opened his mouth he stopped dead, and when 
he started to run his mouth closed; so telling him to shut his 
mouth and lead the way, we ran in silence down the hill. 

At the village an excited crowd of men, women and children 
awaited us and, as usually happens on these occasions, all 
started to talk at the same time. One man was vainly trying to 
quieten the babel. I led him aside and asked him to tell me 
what had happened. Pointing to some scattered oak trees on a 
gentle slope a furlong or so from the village, he said a dozen 
people were collecting dry sticks under the trees when a tiger 
suddenly appeared and caught one of their number, a girl 
sixteen or seventeen years of age. The rest of the party had run 
back to the village, and as it was known that I was staying at 
the bungalow a man had immediately been dispatched to 
inform me. 

The wife of the man I was speaking to had been of the party, 
and she now pointed out the tree, on the shoulder of the hill, 
under which the girl had been taken. None of the party had 
looked back to see if the tiger was carrying away its victim and, 
if so, in which direction it had gone. 

Instructing the crowd not to make a noise, and to remain in the 
village until I returned, I set off in the direction of the tree. The 
ground here was quite open and it was difficult to conceive 
how an animal the size of a tiger could have approached twelve 
people unseen, and its presence not detected, until attention 
had been attracted by the choking sound made by the girl. 

The spot where the girl had been killed was marked by a pool 
of blood and near it, and in vivid contrast to the crimson pool, 
was a broken necklace of brightly coloured blue beads which 



the girl had been wearing. From this spot the track led up and 
round the shoulder of the hill. 


The track of the tigress was clearly visible. On one side of it 
were great splashes of blood where the girl's head had hung 
down, and on the other side the trail of her feet. Half a mile up 
the hill I found the girl's sari, and on the brow of the hill her 
skirt. Once again the tigress was carrying a naked woman, but 
mercifully on this occasion her burden was dead. 

On the brow of the hill the track led through a thicket of 
blackthorn, on the thorns of which long strands of the girl's 
raven-black hair had caught. Beyond this was a bed of nettles 
through which the tigress had gone, and I was looking for a 
way round this obstruction when I heard footsteps behind me. 
Turning round I saw a man armed with a rifle coming towards 
me. I asked him why he had followed me when I had left 
instructions at the village that no one was to leave it. He said 
the Tahsildar had instructed him to accompany me, and that he 
was afraid to disobey orders. As he appeared determined to 
carry out his orders, and to argue the point would have meant 
the loss of valuable time, I told him to remove the heavy pair of 
boots he was wearing and, when he had hidden them under a 
bush, I advised him to keep close to me, and to keep a sharp 
lookout behind. 

I was wearing a very thin pair of stockings, shorts, and a pair of 
rubber-soled shoes, and as there appeared to be no way round 
the nettles I followed the tigress through them— much to my 
discomfort. 

Beyond the nettles the blood trail turned sharply to the left, 
and went straight down the very steep hill, which was densely 
clothed with bracken and ringals (Hill bamboos). A hundred 
yards down, the blood trail led into a narrow and very steep 
watercourse, down which the tigress had gone with some 
difficulty, as could be seen from the dislodged stones and earth. 
I followed this watercourse for five or six hundred yards, my 
companion getting more and more agitated the further we 



went. A dozen times he caught my arm and whispered— in a 
voice full of tears— that he could hear the tiger, either on one 
side or the other, or behind us. Half-way down the hill we came 
on a great pinnacle of rock some thirty feet high, and as the 
man had by now had all the man-eater hunting he could stand, 

I told him to climb the rock and remain on it until I returned. 
Very gladly he went up, and when he straddled the top and 
signalled to me that he was all right I continued on down the 
watercourse, which, after skirting round the rock, went 
straight down for a hundred yards to where it met a deep 
ravine coming down from the left. At the junction was a small 
pool, and as I approached it I saw patches of blood on my side 
of the water. 

The tigress had carried the girl straight down on this spot, and 
my approach had disturbed her at her meal. Splinters of bone 
were scattered round the deep pug marks into which 
discoloured water was slowly seeping and at the edge of the 
pool was an object which had puzzled me as I came down the 
watercourse, and which I now found was part of a human leg. 

In all the subsequent years I have hunted man-eaters I have not 
seen anything as pitiful as that young comely leg— bitten off a 
little below the knee as clean as though severed by the stroke 
of an axe— out of which the warm blood was trickling. 

While looking at the leg I had forgotten all about the tigress 
until I suddenly felt that I was in great danger. Hurriedly 
grounding the butt of the rifle I put two fingers on the triggers, 
raising my head as I did so, and saw a little earth from the 
fifteen-foot bank in front of me, come rolling down the steep 
side and plop into the pool. I was new to this game of man- 
eater hunting or I should not have exposed myself to an attack 
in the way I had done. My prompt action in pointing the rifle 
upwards had possibly saved my life, and in stopping her spring, 
or in turning to get away, the tigress had dislodged the earth 
from the top of the bank. 

The bank was too steep for scrambling, and the only way of 



getting up was to take it at a run. Going up the watercourse a 
short distance I sprinted down, took the pool in my stride, and 
got far enough up the other side to grasp a bush and pull 
myself on to the bank. A bed of Strobilanthes, the bent stalks of 
which were slowly regaining their upright position, showed 
where, and how recently, the tigress had passed, and a little 
further on under an overhanging rock I found where she had 
left her kill when she came to have a look at me. 

Her tracks now— as she carried away the girl— led into a 
wilderness of rocks, some acres in extent, where the going was 
both difficult and dangerous. The cracks and chasms between 
the rocks were masked with ferns and blackberry vines, and a 
false step, which might easily have resulted in a broken limb, 
would have been fatal. Progress under these conditions was of 
necessity slow, and the tigress was taking advantage of it to 
continue her meal. A dozen times I found where she had 
rested; and after each of these rests the blood trail became 
more distinct. 

This was her four hundred and thirty-sixth human kill and she 
was quite accustomed to being disturbed at her meals by 
rescue parties, but this, I think, was the first time she had been 
followed up so persistently and she now began to show her 
resentment by growling. To appreciate a tiger's growl to the 
full it is necessary to be situated as I then was— rocks all round 
with dense vegetation between, and the imperative necessity of 
testing each footstep to avoid falling headlong into unseen 
chasms and caves. 

I cannot expect you who read this at your fireside to appreciate 
my feelings at the time. The sound of the growling and the 
expectation of an attack terrified me at the same time as it 
gave me hope. If the tigress lost her temper sufficiently to 
launch an attack, it would not only give me an opportunity of 
accomplishing the object for which I had come, but it would 
enable me to get even with her for all the pain and suffering 
she had caused. 



The growling, however, was only a gesture, and when she 
found that instead of shooing me off it was bringing me faster 
on her heels, she abandoned it. 

I had now been on her track for over four hours. Though I had 
repeatedly seen the undergrowth moving I had not seen so 
much as a hair of her hide, and a glance at the shadows 
climbing up the opposite hillside warned me it was time to 
retrace my steps if I was to reach the village before dark. 

The late owner of the severed leg was a Hindu, and some 
portion of her would be needed for the cremation, so as I 
passed the pool I dug a hole in the bank and buried the leg 
where it would be safe from the tigress, and could be found 
when wanted. 

My companion on the rock was very relieved to see me. My 
long absence, and the growling he had heard, had convinced 
him that the tigress had secured another kill and his difficulty, 
as he quite frankly admitted, was how he was going to get back 
to the village alone. 

I thought when we were climbing down the watercourse that I 
knew of no more dangerous proceeding than walking in front of 
a nervous man carrying a loaded gun, but I changed my opinion 
when on walking behind him he slipped and fell, and I saw 
where the muzzle of his gun— a converted *450 without a 
safety catch— was pointing. Since that day— except when 
accompanied by Ibbotson— I have made it a hard and fast rule 
to go alone when hunting man-eaters, for if one's companion is 
unarmed it is difficult to protect him, and if he is armed, it is 
even more difficult to protect oneself. 

Arrived at the crest of the hill, where the man had hidden his 
boots, I sat down to have a smoke and think out my plans for 
the morrow. 

The tigress would finish what was left of the kill during the 
night, and would to a certainty lie up among the rocks next day. 



On the ground she was on there was very little hope of my 
being able to stalk her, and if I disturbed her without getting a 
shot, she would probably leave the locality and I should lose 
touch with her. A beat therefore was the only thing to do, 
provided I could raise sufficient men. 

I was sitting on the south edge of a great amphitheatre of hills, 
without a habitation of any kind in sight. A stream entering 
from the west had fretted its way down, cutting a deep valley 
right across the amphitheatre. To the east the stream had 
struck solid rock, and turning north had left the amphitheatre 
by a narrow gorge. 

The hill in front of me, rising to a height of some two thousand 
feet, was clothed in short grass with a pine tree dotted here 
and there, and the hill to the east was too precipitous for 
anything but a ghooral to negotiate. If I could collect sufficient 
men to man the entire length of the ridge from the stream to 
the precipitous hill, and get them to stir up the tigress, her 
most natural line of retreat would be through the narrow 
gorge. 

Admittedly a very difficult beat, for the steep hillside facing 
north, on which I had left the tigress, was densely wooded and 
roughly three-quarters of a mile long and half-a-mile wide; 
however, if I could get the beaters to carry out instructions, 
there was a reasonable chance of my getting a shot. 

The Tahsildar was waiting for me at the village. I explained the 
position to him, and asked him to take immediate steps to 
collect as many men as he could, and to meet me at the tree 
where the girl had been killed at ten o'clock the following 
morning. Promising to do his best, he left for Champawat, 
while I climbed the hill to the bungalow. 

I was up at crack of dawn next morning, and after a substantial 
meal told my men to pack up and wait for me at Champawat, 
and went down to have another look at the ground I intended 
beating. I could find nothing wrong with the plans I had made. 



and an hour before my time I was at the spot where I had asked 
the Tahsildar to meet me. 

That he would have a hard time in collecting the men I had no 
doubt, for the fear of the man-eater had sunk deep into the 
countryside and more than mild persuasion would be needed to 
make the men leave the shelter of their homes. At ten o'clock 
the Tahsildar and one man turned up, and thereafter the men 
came in twos, and threes, and tens, until by midday two 
hundred and ninety-eight had collected. 

The Tahsildar had let it be known that he would turn a blind 
eye towards all unlicensed fire-arms, and further that he would 
provide ammunition where required; and the weapons that 
were produced that day would have stocked a museum. 

When the men were assembled and had received the 
ammunition they needed I took them to the brow of the hill 
where the girl's skirt was lying, and pointing to a pine tree on 
the opposite hill that had been struck by lightning and stripped 
of bark, I told them to line themselves up along the ridge and, 
when they saw me wave a handkerchief from under the pine, 
those of them who were armed were to fire off their pieces, 
while the others beat drums, shouted, and rolled down rocks, 
and that no one was on any account to leave the ridge until I 
returned and personally collected him. When I was assured 
that all present had heard and understood my instructions, I 
set off with the Tahsildar, who said he would be safer with me 
than with the beaters whose guns would probably burst and 
cause many casualties. 

Making a wide detour I crossed the upper end of the valley, 
gained the opposite hill, and made my way down to the blasted 
pine. From here the hill went steeply down and the Tahsildar, 
who had on a thin pair of patent leather shoes, said it was 
impossible for him to go any further. While he was removing his 
inadequate foot-gear to ease his blisters, the men on the ridge, 
thinking I had forgotten to give the pre-arranged signal, fired 
off their guns and set up a great shout. I was still a hundred 



and fifty yards from the gorge, and that I did not break my 
neck a dozen times in covering this distance was due to my 
having been brought up on the hills, and being in consequence 
as sure-footed as a goat. 

As I ran down the hill I noticed that there was a patch of green 
grass near the mouth of the gorge, and as there was no time to 
look round for a better place, I sat down in the grass, with my 
back to the hill down which I had just come. The grass was 
about two feet high and hid half my body, and if I kept perfectly 
still there was a good chance of my not being seen. Facing me 
was the hill that was being beaten, and the gorge that I hoped 
the tigress would make for was behind my left shoulder. 

Pandemonium had broken loose on the ridge. Added to the 
fusillade of guns was the wild beating of drums and the 
shouting of hundreds of men, and when the din was at its worst 
I caught sight of the tigress bounding down a grassy slope 
between two ravines to my right front, and about three 
hundred yards away. She had only gone a short distance when 
the Tahsildar from his position under the pine let off both 
barrels of his short-gun. On hearing the shots the tigress 
whipped round and went straight back the way she had come, 
and as she disappeared into thick cover I threw up my rifle and 
sent a despairing bullet after her. 

The men on the ridge, hearing the three shots, not unnaturally 
concluded that the tigress had been killed. They emptied all 
their guns and gave a final yell, and I was holding my breath 
and listening for the screams that would herald the tigress's 
arrival on the ridge, when she suddenly broke cover to my left 
front and, taking the stream at a bound, came straight for the 
gorge. The *500 modified cordite rifle, sighted at sea level, 
shot high at this altitude, and when the tigress stopped dead I 
thought the bullet had gone over her back, and that she had 
pulled up on finding her retreat cut off; as a matter of fact I 
had hit her all right, but a little far back. Lowering her head, 
she half turned towards me, giving me a beautiful shot at the 



point of her shoulder at a range of less than thirty yards. She 
flinched at this second shot but continued, with her ears laid 
flat and bared teeth, to stand her ground, while I sat with rifle 
to shoulder trying to think what it would be best for me to do 
when she charged, for the rifle was empty and I had no more 
cartridges. Three cartridges were all that I had brought with 
me, for I never thought I should get a chance of firing more 
than two shots, and the third cartridge was for— an emergency. 

Fortunately the wounded animal most unaccountably decided 
against a charge. Very slowly she turned, crossed the stream to 
her right, climbed over some fallen rocks, and found a narrow 
ledge that went diagonally up and across the face of the 
precipitous hill to where there was a great flat projecting rock. 
Where this rock joined the cliff a small bush had found root- 
hold, and going up to it the tigress started to strip its branches. 
Throwing caution to the winds I shouted to the Tahsildar to 
bring me his gun. A long reply was shouted back, the only word 
of which I caught was 'feet 1 : Laying down my rifle I took the hill 
at a run, grabbed the gun out of the Tahsildar's hands and 
raced back. 

As I approached the stream the tigress left the bush and came 
out on the projecting rock towards me. When I was within 
twenty feet of her I raised the gun and found to my horror that 
there was a gap of about three-eighths of an inch between the 
barrels and the breech-block. The gun had not burst when both 
barrels had been fired, and would probably not burst now, but 
there was danger of being blinded by a blow back. However, 
the risk would have to be taken, and, aligning the great blob of 
a bead that did duty as a sight on the tigress's open mouth, I 
fired. Maybe I bobbed, or maybe the gun was not capable of 
throwing the cylindrical bullet accurately for twenty feet; 
anyway, the missile missed the tigress's mouth and struck her 
on the right paw, from where I removed it later with my finger¬ 
nails. Fortunately she was at her last gasp, and the tap on the 
foot was sufficient to make her lurch forward. She came to rest 
with her head projecting over the side of the rock. 



From the moment the tigress had broken cover in her attempt 
to get through the gorge I had forgotten the beaters, until I 
was suddenly reminded of their existence by hearing a shout, 
from a short distance up the hill, of 'There it is on the rock! Pull 
it down and let us hack it to bits. 1 I could not believe my ears 
when I heard 'hack it to bits', and yet I had heard aright, for 
others now had caught sight of the tigress and from all over the 
hillside the shout was being repeated. 

The ledge by which the wounded animal had gained the 
projecting rock was fortunately on the opposite side from the 
beaters, and was just wide enough to permit my shuffling along 
it sideways. As I reached the rock and stepped over the tigress 
— hoping devoutly she was dead for I had not had time to carry 
out the usual test of pelting her with stones— the men emerged 
from the forest and came running across the open, brandishing 
guns, axes, rusty swords, and spears. 

At the rock, which was twelve to fourteen feet in height, their 
advance was checked, for the outer face had been worn smooth 
by the stream when in spate and afforded no foothold even for 
their bare toes. The rage of the crowd on seeing their dread 
enemy was quite understandable, for there was not a man 
among them who had not suffered at her hands. One man, who 
appeared demented and was acting as ring-leader, was 
shouting over and over again as he ran to and fro brandishing a 
sword, 'This is the shaitan (Devil) that killed my wife and my 
two sons/ As happens with crowds, the excitement died down 
as suddenly as it had flared up, and to the credit of the man 
who had lost his wife and sons be it said that he was the first to 
lay down his weapon. He came near to the rock and said, 'We 
were mad, sahib, when we saw our enemy, but the madness has 
now passed, and we ask you and the Tahsildar sahib to forgive 
us/ Extracting the unspent cartridge, I laid the gun across the 
tigress and hung down by my hands and was assisted to the 
ground. When I showed the men how I had gained the rock the 
dead animal was very gently lowered and carried to an open 
spot, where all could crowd round and look at her. 



When the tigress had stood on the rock looking down at me I 
had noticed that there was something wrong with her mouth, 
and on examining her now I found that the upper and lower 
canine teeth on the right side of her mouth were broken, the 
upper one in half, and the lower one right down to the bone. 
This permanent injury to her teeth— the result of a gun-shot 
wound— had prevented her from killing her natural prey, and 
had been the cause of her becoming a man-eater. 

The men begged me not to skin the tigress there, and asked me 
to let them have her until nightfall to carry through their 
villages, saying that if their womenfolk and children did not see 
her with their own eyes, they would not believe that their dread 
enemy was dead. 

Two saplings were now cut and laid one on either side of the 
tigress, and with pugrees, waistbands and loincloths she was 
carefully and very securely lashed to them. When all was ready 
the saplings were manned and we moved to the foot of the 
precipitous hill; the men preferred to take the tigress up this 
hill, on the far side of which their villages lay, to going up the 
densely wooded hill which they had just beaten. Two human 
ropes were made by the simple expedient of the man behind 
taking a firm grip of the waistband, or other portion of 
clothing, of the man in front of him. When it was considered 
that the ropes were long and strong enough to stand the strain, 
they attached themselves to the saplings, and with men on 
either side to hold the feet of the bearers and give them 
foothold, the procession moved up the hill, looking for all the 
world like an army of ants carrying a beetle up the face of a 
wall. Behind the main army was a second and a smaller one— 
the Tahsildar being carried up. Had the ropes broken at any 
stage of that thousand-foot climb, the casualties would have 
been appalling, but the rope did not break. The men gained the 
crest of the hill and set off eastwards, singing on their 
triumphal march, while the Tahsildar and I turned west and 
made for Champawat. 



Our way lay along the ridge and once again I stood among the 
blackthorn bushes on the thorns of which long tresses of the 
girl's hair had caught, and for the last time looked down into 
the amphitheatre which had been the scene of our recent 
exploit. 

On the way down the hill the beaters had found the head of the 
unfortunate girl, and a thin column of smoke rising straight up 
into the still air from the mouth of the gorge showed where the 
relations were performing the last rites of the Champawat man- 
eater's last victim, on the very spot on which the man-eater had 
been shot. 

After dinner, while I was standing in the courtyard of the 
Tahsil, I saw a long procession of pine torches winding its way 
down the opposite hillside, and presently the chanting of a hill 
song by a great concourse of men was borne up on the still 
night air. An hour later, the tigress was laid down at my feet. 

It was difficult to skin the animal with so many people 
crowding round, and to curtail the job I cut the head and paws 
from the trunk and left them adhering to the skin, to be dealt 
with later. A police guard was then mounted over the carcass, 
and next day, when all the people of the countryside were 
assembled, the trunk, legs and tail of the tigress were cut up 
into small pieces and distributed. These pieces of flesh and 
bone were required for the lockets which hill children wear 
round their necks, and the addition of a piece of tiger to the 
other potent charms is credited with giving the wearer 
courage, as well as immunity from the attacks of wild animals. 
The fingers of the girl which the tigress had swallowed whole 
were sent to me in spirits by the Tahsildar, and were buried by 
me in the Naini Tal lake close to the Nandadevi temples. 

While I had been skinning the tigress the Tahsildar and his 
staff, assisted by the Headmen and greybeards of the 
surrounding villages and merchants of the Champawat bazaar, 
had been busy drawing up a programme for a great feast and 
dance for the morrow, at which I was to preside. Round about 



midnight, when the last of the great throng of men had left 
with shouts of delight at being able to use roads and village 
paths that the man-eater had closed for four years, I had a final 
smoke with the Tahsildar, and telling him that I could not stay 
any longer and that he would have to take my place at the 
festivities, my men and I set off on our seventy-five-mile 
journey, with two days in hand to do it in. 

At sunrise I left my men and, with the tigress's skin strapped to 
the saddle of my horse, rode on ahead to put in a few hours in 
cleaning the skin at Dabidhura, where I intended spending the 
night. When passing the hut on the hill at Pali it occurred to me 
that it would be some little satisfaction to the dumb woman to 
know that her sister had been avenged, so leaving the horse to 
browse— he had been bred near the snow-line and could eat 
anything from oak trees to nettles— I climbed the hill to the 
hut, and spread out the skin with the head supported on a 
stone facing the door. The children of the house had been 
round-eyed spectators of these proceedings and, hearing me 
talking to them, their mother, who was inside cooking, came to 
the door. 

I am not going to hazard any theories about shock, and 
counter-shock, for I know nothing of these matters. All I know 
is that this woman, who was alleged to have been dumb a 
twelvemonth and who four days previously had made no 
attempt to answer any questions, was now running backwards 
and forwards from the hut to the road calling to her husband 
and the people in the village to come quickly and see what the 
sahib had brought. This sudden return of speech appeared 
greatly to mystify the children, who could not take their eyes 
off their mother's face. 

I rested in the village while a dish of tea was being prepared 
for me and told the people who thronged round how the man- 
eater had been killed. An hour later I continued my journey and 
for half a mile along my way I could hear the shouts of goodwill 
of the men of Pali. 



I had a very thrilling encounter with a leopard the following 
morning, which I only mention because it delayed my start 
from Dabidhura and put an extra strain on my small mount and 
myself. Fortunately the little pony was as strong on his legs as 
he was tough inside, and by holding his tail on the up-grades, 
riding him on the flat, and running behind him on the down¬ 
grades, we covered the forty-five miles to Naini Tal between 9 
a.m. and 6 p.m. 

At a durbar held in Naini Tal a few months later Sir John 
Hewett, Lieutenant-Governor of the United Provinces, 
presented the Tahsildar of Champawat with a gun, and the man 
who accompanied me when I was looking for the girl with a 
beautiful hunting-knife, for the help they had given me. Both 
weapons were suitably engraved and will be handed down as 
heirlooms in the respective families. 



Robin 

I NEVER saw either of his parents. The Knight of the Broom I 
purchased him from said he was a spaniel, that his name was 
Pincha, and that his father was a 'keen gun dog'. This is all I 
can tell you about his pedigree. 

I did not want a pup, and it was quite by accident that I 
happened to be with a friend when the litter of seven was 
decanted from a very filthy basket for her inspection. Pincha 
was the smallest and the thinnest of the litter, and it was quite 
evident he had reached the last ditch in his fight for survival. 
Leaving his little less miserable brothers and sisters, he walked 
once round me, and then curled himself up between my big 
feet. When I picked him up and put him inside my coat— it was 
a bitterly cold morning— he tried to show his gratitude by 
licking my face, and I tried to show him I was not aware of his 
appalling stench. 

He was rising three months then, and I bought him for fifteen 
rupees. He is rising thirteen years now, and all the gold in India 
would not buy him. 

When I got him home and he had made his first acquaintance 
with a square meal, warm water and soap, we scrapped his 
kennel name of Pincha and rechristened him Robin, in memory 
of a faithful old collie who had saved my young brother, aged 
four, and myself, aged six, from the attack of an infuriated she- 
bear. 

Robin responded to regular meals as parched land does to rain, 
and after he had been with us for a few weeks, acting on the 
principle that a boy's and a pup's training cannot be started too 
early, I took him out one morning, intending to get a little away 
from him and fire a shot or two to get him used to the sound of 
gunfire. 

At the lower end of our estate there are some dense thorn 
bushes, and while I was skirting round them a peafowl got up, 
and forgetting all about Robin, who was following at heel, I 



brought the bird fluttering down. It landed in the thorn bushes 
and Robin dashed in after it. The bushes were too thick and 
thorny for me to enter them, so I ran round to the far side 
where beyond the bushes was open ground, and beyond that 
again heavy tree and grass jungle which I knew the wounded 
bird would make for. The open ground was flooded with 
morning sunlight, and if I had been armed with a movie camera 
I should have had an opportunity of securing a unique picture. 
The peafowl, an old hen, with neck feathers stuck out at right 
angles, and one wing broken, was making for the tree jungle, 
while Robin, with stern to the ground, was hanging on to her 
tail and being dragged along. Running forward I very foolishly 
caught the bird by the neck and lifted it clear of the ground, 
whereon it promptly lashed out with both legs, and sent Robin 
heels-over-head. In a second he was up and on his feet again, 
and when I laid the dead bird down, he danced round it making 
little dabs alternately at its head and tail. The lesson was over 
for that morning, and as we returned home it would have been 
difficult to say which of us was the more proud— Robin, at 
bringing home his first bird, or I, at having picked a winner out 
of a filthy basket. The shooting season was now drawing to a 
close, and for the next few days Robin was not given anything 
larger than quail, doves and an occasional partridge to 
retrieve. 

We spent the summer on the hills, and on our annual migration 
to the foothills in November, at the end of a long fifteen-mile 
march as we turned a sharp corner, one of a big troop of 
langurs jumped off the hillside and crossed the road a few 
inches in front of Robin's nose. Disregarding my whistle, Robin 
dashed down the roadside after the langur, which promptly 
sought safety in a tree. The ground was open with a few trees 
here and there, and after going steeply down for thirty or forty 
yards flattened out for a few yards, before going sharply down 
into the valley below. On the right-hand side of this flat ground 
there were a few bushes, with a deep channel scoured out by 
rain-water running through them. Robin had hardly entered 



these bushes when he was out again, and with ears laid back 
and tail tucked in was running for dear life, with an enormous 
leopard bounding after him and gaining on him at every bound. 
I was unarmed and all the assistance I could render was to 1 Ho 
1 and 1 Har ' at the full extent of my lungs. The men carrying 
M.'s dandy joined in lustily, the pandemonium reaching its 
climax when the hundred or more langurs added their alarm- 
calls in varying keys. For twenty-five or thirty yards the 
desperate and unegual race continued, and just as the leopard 
was within reach of Robin, it unaccountably swerved and 
disappeared into the valley, while Robin circled round a 
shoulder of the hill and rejoined us on the road. Two very 
useful lessons Robin learned from his hairbreadth escape, 
which he never in after-life forgot. First, that it was dangerous 
to chase langurs, and second that the alarm-call of a langur 
denoted the presence of a leopard. 

Robin resumed his training where it had been interrupted in 
spring, but it soon became apparent that his early neglect and 
starvation had affected his heart, for he fainted now after the 
least exertion. 

There is nothing more disappointing for a gun dog than to be 
left at home when his master goes out, and as bird-shooting 
was now taboo for Robin, I started taking him with me when I 
went out after big game. He took to this new form of sport as 
readily as a duck takes to water, and from then on has 
accompanied me whenever I have been out with a rifle. 

The method we employ is to go out early in the morning, pick 
up the tracks of a leopard or tiger, and follow them. When the 
pug marks can be seen, I do the tracking, and when the animal 
we are after takes to the jungle, Robin does the tracking. In 
this way we have on occasions followed an animal for miles 
before coming up with it. 

When shooting on foot, it is very much easier to kill an animal 
outright than when shooting down on it from a machan, or from 
the back of an elephant. For one thing, when wounded animals 



have to be followed up on foot, chance shots are not indulged 
in, and for another, the vital parts are more accessible when 
shooting on the same level as the animal than when shooting 
down on it. However, even after exercising the greatest care 
over the shot, I have sometimes only wounded leopards and 
tigers, who have rampaged round before being quietened by a 
second or third shot, and only once during all the years that we 
have shot together has Robin left me in a tight corner. When he 
rejoined me after his brief absence that day, we decided that 
the incident was closed and would never be referred to again, 
but we are older now and possibly less sensitive, anyway Robin 
— who has exceeded the canine equivalent of three-score- 
years-and-ten, and who, lies at my feet as I write, on a bed he 
will never again leave— has with a smile from his wise brown 
eyes and a wag of his small stump of a tail given me permission 
to go ahead and tell you the story. 

We did not see the leopard until it stepped clear of the thick 
undergrowth and, coming to a stand, looked back over its left 
shoulder. 

He was an outsized male with a beautiful dark glossy coat, the 
rosettes on his skin standing out like clear-cut designs on a rich 
velvet ground. I had an unhurried shot with an accurate rifle at 
his right shoulder, at the short range of fifteen yards. By how 
little I missed his heart makes no matter, and while the bullet 
was kicking up the dust fifty yards away he was high in the air, 
and, turning a somersault, landed in the thick undergrowth he 
had a minute before left. For twenty, forty, fifty yards we heard 
him crashing through the cover, and then the sound ceased as 
abruptly as it had begun. This sudden cessation of sound could 
be accounted for in two ways: either the leopard had collapsed 
and died in his tracks, or fifty yards away he had reached open 
ground. 

We had walked far that day; the sun was near setting and we 
were still four miles from home. This part of the jungle was not 
frequented by man, and there was not one chance in a million 



of anyone passing that way by night, and last, and the best 
reason of all for leaving the leopard, M. was unarmed and 
could neither be left alone nor taken along to follow up the 
wounded animal— so we turned to the north and made for 
home. There was no need for me to mark the spot, for I had 
walked through these jungles by day— and often by night— for 
near on half a century, and could have found my way blind-fold 
to any part of them. 

Night had only just given place to day the following morning 
when Robin— who had not been with us the previous evening— 
and I arrived at the spot I had fired from. Very warily Robin, 
who was leading, examined the ground where the leopard had 
stood, and then raising his head and snuffing the air he 
advanced to the edge of the undergrowth, where the leopard in 
falling had left great splashes of blood. There was no need for 
me to examine the blood to determine the position of the 
wound, for at the short range I had fired at I had seen the 
bullet strike, and the spurt of dust on the far side was proof 
that the bullet had gone right through the leopard's body. 

It might be necessary later on to follow up the blood trail, but 
just at present a little rest after our four-mile walk in the dark 
would do no harm, and might on the other hand prove of great 
value to us. The sun was near rising, and at that early hour of 
the morning all the jungle folk were on the move, and it would 
be advisable to hear what they had to say on the subject of the 
wounded animal before going further. 

Under a nearby tree I found a dry spot to which the saturating 
dew had not penetrated, and with Robin stretched out at my 
feet had finished my cigarette when a chital hind, and then a 
second and a third, started calling some sixty yards to our left 
front. Robin sat up and slowly turning his head looked at me, 
and, on catching my eye, as slowly turned back in the direction 
of the calling deer. He had travelled far along the road of 
experience since that day he had first heard the alarm-call of a 
langur, and he knew now— as did every bird and animal within 



hearing— that the chital were warning the jungle folk of the 
presence of a leopard. 

From the manner in which the chital were calling it was 
evident that the leopard was in full view of them. A little more 
patience and they would tell us if he was alive. They had been 
calling for about five minutes when suddenly and all together, 
they called once and again, and then settled down to their 
regular call; the leopard was alive and had moved, and was 
now quiet again. All that we needed to know now was the 
position of the leopard, and this information we could get by 
stalking the chital. 

Moving down-wind for fifty yards we entered the thick 
undergrowth, and started to stalk the deer not a difficult task, 
for Robin can move through any jungle as silently as a cat, and 
long practice has taught me where to place my feet. The chital 
were not visible until we were within a few feet of them. They 
were standing in the open and looking towards the north in the 
exact direction, as far as I was able to judge, in which the 
crashing sound of the evening before had ceased. 

Up to this point the chital had been of great help to us; they 
had told us the leopard was lying out in the open and that it 
was alive, and they had now given us the direction. It had taken 
us the best part of an hour to acquire this information, and if 
the chital now caught sight of us and warned the jungle folk of 
our presence, they would in one second undo the good they had 
so far done. I was debating whether it would be better to 
retrace our steps and work down below the calling deer and try 
to get a shot from behind them, or move them from our vicinity 
by giving the call of a leopard, when one of the hinds turned 
her head and looked straight into my face. Next second, with a 
cry of 'Ware man', they dashed away at top speed. I had only 
about five yards to cover to reach the open ground, but quick 
as I was the leopard was quicker, and I was only in time to see 
his hind quarters and tail disappearing behind some bushes. 

The chital had very effectively spoilt my chance of a shot, and 



the leopard would now have to be located and marked down all 
over again— this time by Robin. 

I stood on the open ground for some minutes, to give the 
leopard time to settle down and the scent he had left in his 
passage to blow past us, and then took Robin due west across 
the track of the wind, which was blowing from the north. We 
had gone about sixty or seventy yards when Robin, who was 
leading, stopped and turned to face into the wind. Robin is 
mute in the jungles, and has a wonderful control over his 
nerves. There is one nerve, however, running down the back of 
his hind legs, which he cannot control when he is looking at a 
leopard, or when the scent of a leopard is warm and strong. 
This nerve was now twitching, and agitating the long hair on 
the upper part of his hind legs. 

A very violent cyclonic storm had struck this part of the forest 
the previous summer, uprooting a number of trees; it was 
towards one of these fallen trees, forty yards from where we 
were standing, that Robin was now looking. The branches were 
towards us, and on either side of the trunk there were light 
bushes and a few scattered tufts of short grass. 

At any other time Robin and I would have made straight for our 
quarry; but on this occasion a little extra caution was 
advisable. Not only were we dealing with an animal who when 
wounded knows no fear, but in addition we were dealing with a 
leopard who had had fifteen hours in which to nurse his 
grievance against man, and who could in consequence be 
counted on to have all his fighting instincts thoroughly aroused. 

When leaving home that morning I had picked up the *275 rifle 
I had used the previous evening. A good rifle to carry when 
miles have to be covered, but not the weapon one would select 
to deal with a wounded leopard; so instead of a direct 
approach, I picked a line that would take us fifteen yards from, 
and parallel to, the fallen tree. Step by step, Robin leading, we 
moved along this line, and had passed the branches and were 
opposite the trunk when Robin stopped. Taking the direction 



from him, I presently saw what had attracted his attention— 
the tip of the leopard's tail slowly raised, and as slowly lowered 
— the warning a leopard invariably gives before charging. 
Pivoting to the right on my heels, I had just got the rifle to my 
shoulder when the leopard burst through the intervening 
bushes and sprang at us. My bullet, fired more with the object 
of deflecting him than with any hope of killing or even hitting 
him, passed under his belly and went through the fleshy part of 
his left thigh. The crack of the rifle, more than the wound, had 
the effect of deflecting the leopard sufficiently to make him 
pass my right shoulder without touching me, and before I could 
get in another shot, he disappeared into the bushes beyond. 

Robin had not moved from my feet, and together we now 
examined the ground the leopard had passed over. Blood we 
found in plenty, but whether it had come from the old wounds 
torn open by the leopard's violent exertions, or from my recent 
shot, it was impossible to say. Anyway it made no difference to 
Robin, who without a moment's hesitation took up the trail. 
After going through some very heavy cover we came on knee- 
high undergrowth, and had proceeded about a couple of 
hundred yards when I saw the leopard get up in front of us, and 
before I could get the rifle to bear on him, he disappeared 
under a lantana bush. This bush with its branches resting on 
the ground was as big as a cottage tent, and in addition to 
affording the leopard ideal cover gave him all the advantages 
for launching his next attack. 

Robin and I had come very well out of our morning's adventure 
and it would have been foolish now, armed as I was, to pursue 
the leopard further, so without more ado we turned about and 
made for home. 

Next morning we were back on the ground. From a very early 
hour Robin had been agitating to make a start, and, ignoring all 
the interesting smells the jungle holds in the morning, would 
have made me do the four miles at a run had that been 
possible. 



I had armed myself with a 450/400, and was in consequence 
feeling much happier than I had done the previous day. When 
we were several hundred yards from the lantana bush, I made 
Robin slow down and advance cautiously, for it is never safe to 
assume that a wounded animal will be found where it has been 
left hours previously, as the following regrettable incident 
shows. 

A sportsman of my acquaintance wounded a tiger one 
afternoon, and followed the blood trail for several miles along a 
valley. Next morning, accompanied by a number of men, one of 
whom was carrying his empty rifle and leading the way, he set 
out intending to take up the tracking where he had left off. His 
way led over the previous day's blood trail, and while still a 
mile from the spot where the tiger had been left, the leading 
man, who incidentally was the local shikari, walked on to the 
wounded tiger and was killed. The rest of the party escaped, 
some by climbing trees and others by showing a clean pair of 
heels. 

I had marked the exact position of the lantana bush, and now 
took Robin along a line that would pass a few yards on the lee 
side of it. Robin knew all that was worth knowing about this 
method of locating the position of an animal by cutting across 
the wind, and we had only gone a short distance, and were still 
a hundred yards from the bush, when he stopped, turned and 
faced into the wind, and communicated to me that he could 
smell the leopard. As on the previous day, he was facing a 
fallen tree which was lying along the edge of, and parallel to, 
the thick undergrowth through which we had followed the 
leopard to the lantana bush after he had charged us. On our 
side of the tree the ground was open, but on the far side there 
was a dense growth of waist-high basonta bushes. Having 
signalled to Robin to carry on along our original line, we went 
past the lantana bush, in which he showed no interest, to a 
channel washed out by rain-water. Here, removing my coat, I 
filled it with as many stones as the stitches would hold, and 
with this improvised sack slung over my shoulder returned to 



the open ground near the tree. 

Resuming my coat, and holding the rifle ready for instant use, I 
took up a position fifteen yards from the tree and started 
throwing the stones, first on to the tree and then into the 
bushes on the far side of it with the object of making the 
leopard— assuming he was still alive— charge on to the open 
ground where I could deal with him. When all my ammunition 
was exhausted I coughed, clapped my hands, and shouted, and 
neither during the bombardment nor after it did the leopard 
move or make any sound to indicate that he was alive. 

I should now have been justified in walking straight up to the 
tree and looking on the far side of it, but remembering an old 
jungle saying, 'It is never safe to assume that a leopard is dead 
until it has been skinned ', I set out to circle round the tree, 
intending to reduce the size of the circle until I could see right 
under the branches and along the whole length of the trunk. I 
made the radius of the first circle about twenty-five yards, and 
had gone two-thirds of the way round when Robin stopped. As I 
looked down to see what had attracted his attention, there was 
a succession of deep-throated, angry grunts, and the leopard 
made straight for us. All I could see was the undergrowth being 
violently agitated in a direct line towards us, and I only just had 
time to swing half right and bring the rifle up, when the head 
and shoulders of the leopard appeared out of the bushes a few 
feet away. 

The leopard's spring and my shot were simultaneous, and side¬ 
stepping to the left and leaning back as far as I could I fired the 
second barrel from my hip into his side as he passed me. 

When a wounded animal, be he leopard or tiger, makes a 
headlong charge and fails to contact he invariably carries on 
and does not return to the attack until he is again disturbed. 

I had side-stepped to the left to avoid crushing Robin, and 
when I looked down for him now, he was nowhere to be seen. 
For the first time in all the years we had hunted together we 



had parted company in a tight corner, and he was now probably 
trying to find his way home, with very little chance of being 
able to avoid the many dangers that lay before him in the 
intervening four miles of jungle. Added to the natural dangers 
he would have to face in a jungle with which, owing to its 
remoteness from home, he was not familiar, was the weak 
condition of his heart. And it was therefore with very great 
misgivings that I turned about to go in search of him; as I did 
so, I caught sight of his head projecting from behind a tree 
trunk at the edge of a small clearing only a hundred yards 
away. When I raised my hand and beckoned, he disappeared 
into the undergrowth, but a little later, with drooped eyes and 
drooping ears, he crept silently to my feet. Laying down the 
rifle I picked him up in my arms and, for the second time in his 
life, he licked my face— telling me as he did so, with little 
throaty sounds, how glad he was to find me unhurt, and how 
terribly ashamed he was of himself for having parted company 
from me. 

Our reactions to the sudden and quite unexpected danger that 
had confronted us were typical of how a canine and a human 
being act in an emergency, when the danger that threatens is 
heard, and not seen. In Robin's case it had impelled him to seek 
safety in silent and rapid retreat; whereas in my case it had the 
effect of gluing my feet to the ground and making retreat- 
rapid or otherwise— impossible. 

When I had satisfied Robin that he was not to blame for our 
temporary separation, and his small body had stopped 
trembling, I put him down and together we walked up to where 
the leopard, who had put up such a game fight, and had so 
nearly won the last round, was lying dead. 

I have told you the story, and while I have been telling it Robin 
— the biggest-hearted and the most faithful friend man ever 
had— has gone to the Happy Hunting Grounds, where I know I 
shall find him waiting for me. 



The Chowgarh Tigers 

I 

THE map of Eastern Kumaon that hangs on the wall before me 
is marked with a number of crosses, and below each cross is a 
date. These crosses indicate the locality, and the date, of the 
officially recorded human victims of the man-eating tiger of 
Chowgarh. There are sixty-four crosses on the map. I do not 
claim this as being a correct tally, for the map was posted up by 
me for two years and during this period all kills were not 
reported to me; further, victims who were only mauled, and 
who died subsequently, have not been awarded a cross and a 
date. 

The first cross is dated 15 December 1925, and the last, 21 
March 1930. The distance between the extreme crosses, north 
to south, is fifty miles, and east to west, thirty miles, an area of 
1,500 square miles of mountain and vale where the snow lies 
deep during winter, and the valleys are scorching hot in 
summer. Over this area the Chowgarh tiger had established a 
reign of terror. Villages of varying size, some with a population 
of a hundred or more, and others with only a small family or 
two, are scattered throughout the area. Footpaths, beaten hard 
by bare feet, connect the villages. Some of these paths pass 
through thick forests, and when a man-eater renders their 
passage dangerous inter-village communication is carried on 
by shouting. Standing on a commanding point, maybe a big 
rock or the roof of a house, a man cooees to attract the 
attention of the people in a neighbouring village, and when the 
cooee is answered, the message is shouted across in a high- 
pitched voice. From village to village the message is tossed, 
and is broadcast throughout large areas in an incredibly short 
space of time. 

It was at a District Conference in February 1929 that I found 
myself committed to have a try for this tiger. There were at that 
time three man-eaters in the Kumaon Division, and as the 
Chowgarh tiger had done most damage I promised to go in 



pursuit of it first. 

The map with the crosses and dates, furnished to me by 
Government, showed that the man-eater was most active in the 
villages on the north and east face of the Kala Agar ridge. This 
ridge, some forty miles in length, rises to a height of 8,500 feet 
and is thickly wooded along the crest. A forest road runs along 
the north face of the ridge, in some places passing for miles 
through dense forests of oak and rhododendron, and in others 
forming a boundary between the forest and cultivated land. In 
one place the road forms a loop, and in this loop is situated the 
Kala Agar Forest Bungalow. This bungalow was my objective, 
and after a four days' march, culminating in a stiff climb of 
4,000 feet, I arrived at it one evening in April 1929. The last 
human victim in this area was a young man of twenty-two, who 
had been killed while out grazing cattle, and while I was having 
breakfast, the morning after my arrival, the grandmother of the 
young man came to see me. 

She informed me that the man-eater had, without any 
provocation, killed the only relative she had in the world. After 
giving me her grandson's history from the day he was born, 
and extolling his virtues, she pressed me to accept her three 
milch buffaloes to use as bait for the tiger, saying that if I killed 
the tiger with the help of her buffaloes she would have the 
satisfaction of feeling that she had assisted in avenging her 
grandson. These full-grown animals were of no use to me, but 
knowing that refusal to accept them would give offence, I 
thanked the old lady and assured her I would draw on her for 
bait as soon as I had used up the four young male buffaloes I 
had brought with me from Naini Tal. The Headmen of nearby 
villages had now assembled, and from them I learned that the 
tiger had last been seen ten days previously in a village twenty 
miles away, on the eastern slope of the ridge, where it had 
killed and eaten a man and his wife. 

A trail ten days old was not worth following up, and after a long 
discussion with the Headmen I decided to make for Dalkania 



village on the eastern side of the ridge. Dalkania is ten miles 
from Kala Agar, and about the same distance from the village 
where the man and his wife had been killed. 

From the number of crosses Dalkania and the villages adjoining 
it had earned, it appeared that the tiger had its headquarters in 
the vicinity of these villages. 

After breakfast next morning I left Kala Agar and followed the 
forest road, which I was informed would take me to the end of 
the ridge, where I should have to leave the road and take a 
path two miles downhill to Dalkania. This road, running right to 
the end of the ridge through dense forest was very little used, 
and, examining it for tracks as I went along, I arrived at the 
point where the path took off at about 2 p.m. Here I met a 
number of men from Dalkania. They had heard— via the cooee 
method of communication— of my intention of camping at their 
village and had come up to the ridge to inform me that the 
tiger had that morning attacked a party of women, while they 
had been cutting their crops in a village ten miles to the north 
of Dalkania. 

The men carrying my camp equipment had done eight miles 
and were quite willing to carry on, but on learning from the 
villagers that the path to this village, ten miles away, was very 
rough and ran through dense forest I decided to send my men 
with the villagers to Dalkania, and visit the scene of the tiger's 
attack alone. My servant immediately set about preparing a 
substantial meal for me, and at 3 p.m., having fortified myself, I 
set out on my ten-mile walk. Ten miles under favourable 
conditions is a comfortable two-and-a-half hours' walk, but here 
the conditions were anything but favourable. The track running 
along the east face of the hill wound in and out through deep 
ravines and was bordered alternately by rocks, dense 
undergrowth, and trees; and when every obstruction capable of 
concealing sudden death, in the form of a hungry man-eater, 
had to be approached with caution, progress was of necessity 
slow. I was still several miles from my objective when the 



declining day warned me it was time to call a halt. 

In any other area, sleeping under the stars on a bed of dry 
leaves would have ensured a restful night, but here, to sleep on 
the ground would have been to court death in a very 
unpleasant form. Long practice in selecting a suitable tree, and 
the ability to dispose myself comfortably in it, has made 
sleeping up aloft a simple matter. On this occasion I selected an 
oak tree, and, with the rifle tied securely to a branch, had been 
asleep for some hours when I was awakened by the rustling of 
several animals under the tree. The sound moved on, and 
presently I heard the scraping of claws on bark and realized 
that a family of bears were climbing some karphal trees 
(Karphal is found on our hills at an elevation of 6,000 feet. The 
tree grows to a height of about forty feet and produces a small 
red and very sweet berry, which is greatly fancied by both 
human beings and bears.) I had noticed growing a little way 
down the hillside. Bears are very quarrelsome when feeding, 
and sleep was impossible until they had eaten their fill and 
moved on. 

The sun had been up a couple of hours when I arrived at the 
village, which consisted of two huts and a cattle-shed, in a 
clearing of five acres surrounded by forest. The small 
community were in a state of terror and were overjoyed to see 
me. The wheatfield, a few yards from the huts, where the tiger, 
with belly to ground, had been detected only just in time, 
stalking the three women cutting the crop, was eagerly pointed 
out to me. The man who had seen the tiger, and given the 
alarm, told me the tiger had retreated into the jungle, where it 
had been joined by a second tiger, and that the two animals had 
gone down the hillside into the valley below. The occupants of 
the two huts had had no sleep, for the tigers, baulked of their 
prey, had called at short intervals throughout the night, and 
had only ceased calling a little before my arrival. This 
statement, that there were two tigers, confirmed the reports I 
had already received that the man-eater was accompanied by a 
full-grown cub. 



Our hill folk are very hospitable, and when the villagers 
learned that I had spent the night in the jungle, and that my 
camp was at Dalkania, they offered to prepare a meal for me. 
This I knew would strain the resources of the small community, 
so I asked for a dish of tea, but as there was no tea in the 
village I was given a drink of fresh milk sweetened to excess 
with jaggery, a very satisfying and not unpleasant drink— when 
one gets used to it. At the request of my hosts I mounted guard 
while the remaining portion of the wheat crop was cut; and at 
midday, taking the good wishes of the people with me, I went 
down into the valley in the direction in which the tigers had 
been heard calling. 

The valley, starting from the watershed of the three rivers 
Ladhya, Nandhour and Eastern Goula, runs south-west for 
twenty miles and is densely wooded. Tracking was impossible, 
and my only hope of seeing the tigers was to attract them to 
myself, or helped by the jungle folk to stalk them. 

To those of you who may be inclined to indulge in the sport of 
man-eater hunting on foot, it will be of interest to know that 
the birds and animals of the jungle, and the four winds of 
heaven, play a very important part in this form of sport. This is 
not the place to give the names of the jungle folk on whose 
alarm-calls the sportsman depends, to a great extent, for his 
safety and knowledge of his quarry's movements; for in a 
country in which a walk up or down hill of three or four miles 
might mean a difference in altitude of as many thousand feet 
the variation in fauna, in a well-stocked area, is considerable. 
The wind, however, at all altitudes, remains a constant factor, 
and a few words relevant to its importance in connexion with 
man-eater hunting on foot will not be out of place. 

Tigers do not know that human beings have no sense of smell, 
and when a tiger becomes a man-eater it treats human beings 
exactly as it treats wild animals, that is, it approaches its 
intended victims up-wind, or lies up in wait for them down¬ 
wind. 



The significance of this will be apparent when it is realized 
that, while the sportsman is trying to get a sight of the tiger, 
the tiger in all probability is trying to stalk the sportsman, or is 
lying up in wait for him. The contest, owing to the tiger's 
height, colouring, and ability to move without making a sound, 
would be very unequal were it not for the wind-factor operating 
in favour of the sportsman. 

In all cases where killing is done by stalking or stealth, the 
victim is approached from behind. This being so, it would be 
suicidal for the sportsman to enter dense jungle, in which he 
had every reason to believe a man-eater was lurking, unless he 
was capable of making full use of the currents of air. For 
example, assuming that the sportsman has to proceed, owing to 
the nature of the ground, in the direction from which the wind 
is blowing, the danger would lie behind him, where he would 
be least able to deal with it, but by frequently tacking across 
the wind he could keep the danger alternately to right and left 
of him. In print this scheme may not appear very attractive, but 
in practice it works; and, short of walking backwards, I do not 
know of a better or safer method of going up-wind through 
dense cover in which a hungry man-eater is lurking. 

By evening I had reached the upper end of the valley, without 
having seen the tigers and without having received any 
indication from bird or animal of their presence in the jungle. 
The only habitation then in sight was a cattle-shed, high up on 
the north side of the valley. 

I was careful in the selection of a tree on this second night, and 
was rewarded by an undisturbed night's rest. Not long after 
dark the tigers called, and a few minutes later two shots from a 
muzzle-loader came echoing down the valley, followed by a lot 
of shouting from the graziers at the cattle station. Thereafter 
the night was silent. 

By the afternoon of the following day I had explored every bit 
of the valley, and I was making my way up a grassy slope intent 
on rejoining my men at Dalkania when I heard a long-drawn- 



out cooee from the direction of the cattle-shed. The cooee was 
repeated once and again, and on my sending back an 
answering call I saw a man climb on a projecting rock, and 
from this vantage point he shouted across the valley to ask if I 
was the sahib who had come from Naini Tal to shoot the man- 
eater. On my telling him I was that sahib, he informed me that 
his cattle had stampeded out of a ravine on my side of the 
valley at about midday, and that when he counted them on 
arrival at the cattle station he found that one— a white cow— 
was missing. 

He suspected that the cow had been killed by the tigers he had 
heard calling the previous night, half a mile to the west of 
where I was standing. Thanking him for his information, I set 
off to investigate the ravine. I had gone but a short distance 
along the edge of the ravine when I came on the tracks of the 
stampeding cattle, and following these tracks back I had no 
difficulty in finding the spot where the cow had been killed. 
After killing the cow the tigers had taken it down the steep 
hillside into the ravine. An approach along the drag was not 
advisable, so going down into the valley I made a wide detour, 
and approached the spot where I expected the kill to be from 
the other side of the ravine. This side of the ravine was less 
steep than the side down which the kill had been taken, and 
was deep in young bracken— ideal ground for stalking over. 
Step by step, and as silently as a shadow, I made my way 
through the bracken, which reached above my waist, and when 
I was some thirty yards from the bed of the ravine a movement 
in front of me caught my eye. A white leg was suddenly thrust 
up into the air and violently agitated, and next moment there 
was a deep-throated growl— the tigers were on the kill and 
were having a difference of opinion over some toothful morsel. 

For several minutes I stood perfectly still; the leg continued to 
be agitated, but the growl was not repeated. A nearer approach 
was not advisable, for even if I succeeded in covering the thirty 
yards without being seen, and managed to kill one of the tigers, 
the other, as likely as not, would blunder into me, and the 



ground I was on would give me no chance of defending myself. 
Twenty yards to my left front, and about the same distance 
from the tigers, there was an outcrop of rock, some ten to 
fifteen feet high. If I could reach this rock without being seen, I 
should in all probability get an easy shot at the tigers. 

Dropping on hands and knees, and pushing the rifle before me, 

I crawled through the bracken to the shelter of the rocks, 
paused a minute to regain my breath and make quite sure the 
rifle was loaded, and then climbed the rock. When my eyes 
were level with the top, I looked over, and saw the two tigers. 

One was eating at the hind quarters of the cow, while the other 
was lying near by licking its paws. Both tigers appeared to be 
about the same size, but the one that was licking its paws was 
several shades lighter than the other; and concluding that her 
light colouring was due to age and that she was the old man- 
eater, I aligned the sights very carefully on her, and fired. At my 
shot she reared up and fell backwards, while the other bounded 
down the ravine and was out of sight before I could press the 
second trigger. The tiger I had shot did not move again, and 
after pelting it with stones to make sure it was dead, I 
approached and met with a great disappointment; for a glance 
at close quarters showed me I had made a mistake and shot the 
cub— a mistake that during the ensuing twelve months cost the 
district fifteen lives and incidentally nearly cost me my own 
life. 

Disappointment was to a certain extent mitigated by the 
thought that this young tigress, even if she had not actually 
killed any human beings herself, had probably assisted her old 
mother to kill (this assumption I later found to be correct), and 
in any case, having been nurtured on human flesh, she could— 
to salve my feelings— be classed as a potential man-eater. 

Skinning a tiger with assistance on open ground and with the 
requisite appliances is an easy job, but here the job was 
anything but easy, for I was alone, surrounded by thick cover, 
and my only appliance was a penknife; and though there was 



no actual danger to be apprehended from the man-eater, for 
tigers never kill in excess of their requirements, there was the 
uneasy feeling in the back of my mind that the tigress had 
returned and was watching my every movement. 

The sun was near setting before the arduous task was 
completed, and as I should have to spend yet another night in 
the jungles I decided to remain where I was. The tigress was a 
very old animal, as I could see from her pug marks, and having 
lived all her life in a district in which there are nearly as many 
fire-arms as men to use them, had nothing to learn about men 
and their ways. Even so, there was just a chance that she might 
return to the kill some time during the night, and remain in the 
vicinity until light came in the morning. 

My selection of a tree was of necessity limited, and the one I 
spent that night in proved, by morning, to be the most 
uncomfortable tree I have ever spent twelve hours in. The 
tigress called at intervals throughout the night, and as morning 
drew near the calling became fainter and fainter, and 
eventually died away on the ridge above me. 

Cramped, and stiff, and hungry— I had been without food for 
sixty-four hours— and with my clothes clinging to me— it had 
rained for an hour during the night— I descended from the tree 
when objects were clearly visible, and, after tying the tiger's 
skin up in a coat, set off for Dalkania. 

I have never weighed a tiger's skin when green, and if the skin, 
plus the head and paws, which I carried for fifteen miles that 
day weighed 40 pounds at the start, I would have taken my 
oath it weighed 200 pounds before I reached my destination. 

In a courtyard, flagged with great slabs of blue slate, and 
common to a dozen houses, I found my men in conference with 
a hundred or more villagers. My approach, along a yard-wide 
lane between two houses, had not been observed, and the 
welcome I received when, bedraggled and covered with blood, 

I staggered into the circle of squatting men will live in my 



memory as long as memory lasts. 

My 40-lb. tent had been pitched in a field of stubble a hundred 
yards from the village, and I had hardly reached it before tea 
was laid out for me on a table improvised out of a couple of 
suitcases and planks borrowed from the village. I was told later 
by the villagers that my men, who had been with me for years 
and had accompanied me on several similar expeditions, 
refusing to believe that the man-eater had claimed me as a 
victim, had kept a kettle on the boil night and day in 
anticipation of my return, and, further, had stoutly opposed the 
Headmen of Dalkania and the adjoining villages sending a 
report to Almora and Naini Tal that I was missing. 

A hot bath, taken of necessity in the open and in full view of the 
village— I was too dirty and too tired to care who saw me— 
was followed by an ample dinner, and I was thinking of turning 
in for the night when a flash of lightning succeeded by a loud 
peal of thunder heralded the approach of a storm. Tent-pegs 
are of little use in a field, so long stakes were hurriedly 
procured and securely driven into the ground, and to these 
stakes the tent-ropes were tied. For further safety all the 
available ropes in camp were criss-crossed over the tent and 
lashed to the stakes. The storm of wind and rain lasted an hour 
and was one of the worst the little tent had ever weathered. 
Several of the guy-ropes were torn from the canvas, but the 
stakes and criss-cross ropes held. Most of my things were 
soaked through, and a little stream several inches deep was 
running from end to end of the tent; my bed, however, was 
comparatively dry, and by 10 o'clock my men were safely 
lodged behind locked doors in the house the villagers had 
placed at their disposal, while I, with a loaded rifle for 
company, settled down to a sleep which lasted for twelve hours. 

The following day was occupied in drying my kit and in 
cleaning and pegging out the tiger's skin. While these 
operations were in progress the villagers, who had taken a 
holiday from their field work, crowded round to hear my 



experiences and to tell me theirs. Every man present had lost 
one or more relatives, and several bore tooth and claw marks, 
inflicted by the man-eater, which they will carry to their graves. 
My regret at having lost an opportunity of killing the man-eater 
was not endorsed by the assembled men. True, there had 
originally been only one man-eater; but, of recent months, 
rescue parties who had gone out to recover the remains of 
human victims had found two tigers on the kills, and only a 
fortnight previously a man and his wife had been killed 
simultaneously, which was proof sufficient for them that both 
tigers were established man-eaters. 

My tent was on a spur of the hill, and commanded an extensive 
view. Immediately below me was the valley of the Nandhour 
river, with a hill, devoid of any cultivation, rising to a height of 
9,000 feet on the far side. As I sat on the edge of the terraced 
fields that evening with a pair of good binoculars in my hand 
and the Government map spread out beside me, the villagers 
pointed out the exact positions where twenty human beings 
had been killed during the past three years. These kills were 
more or less evenly distributed over an area of forty square 
miles. 

The forests in this area were open to grazing, and on the cattle- 
paths leading to them I decided to tie up my four young 
buffaloes. 

During the following ten days no news was received of the 
tigress, and I spent the time in visiting the buffaloes in the 
morning, searching the forests in the day, and tying out the 
buffaloes in the evening. On the eleventh day my hopes were 
raised by the report that a cow had been killed on a ravine on 
the hill above my tent. A visit to the kill, however, satisfied me 
the cow had been killed by an old leopard, whose pug marks I 
had repeatedly seen. The villagers complained that the leopard 
had for several years been taking heavy toll of their cattle and 
goats, so I decided to sit up for him. A shallow cave close to the 
dead cow gave me the cover I needed. I had not been long in 



the cave when I caught sight of the leopard coming down the 
opposite side of the ravine, and I was raising my rifle for a shot 
when I heard a very agitated voice from the direction of the 
village calling to me. 

There could be but one reason for this urgent call, and 
grabbing up my hat I dashed out of the cave, much to the 
consternation of the leopard, who first flattened himself out on 
the ground, and then with an angry woof went bounding back 
the way he had come, while I scrambled up my side of the 
ravine; and, arriving at the top, shouted to the man that I was 
coming, and set off at top speed to join him. 

The man had run all the way uphill from the village, and when 
he regained his breath he informed me that a woman had just 
been killed by the man-eater, about half a mile on the far side 
of the village. As we ran down the hillside I saw a crowd of 
people collected in the courtyard already alluded to. Once 
again my approach through the narrow lane was not observed, 
and looking over the heads of the assembled men, I saw a girl 
sitting on the ground. 

The upper part of her clothing had been torn off her young 
body, and with head thrown back and hands resting on the 
ground behind to support her, she sat without sound or 
movement, other than the heaving up and down of her breast, 
in the hollow of which the blood, that was flowing down her 
face and neck, was collecting in a sticky congealed mass. 

My presence was soon detected and a way made for me to 
approach the girl. While I was examining her wounds, a score 
of people, all talking at the same time, informed me that the 
attack on the girl had been made on comparatively open 
ground in full view of a number of people including the girl's 
husband; that alarmed at their combined shouts the tiger had 
left the girl and gone off in the direction of the forest; that 
leaving the girl for dead where she had fallen her companions 
had run back to the village to inform me; that subsequently the 
girl had regained consciousness and returned to the village; 



that she would without doubt die of her injuries in a few 
minutes; and that they would then carry her back to the scene 
of the attack, and I could sit up over the corpse and shoot the 
tiger. 

While this information was being imparted to me the girl's eyes 
never left my face and followed my every movement with the 
liquid pleading gaze of a wounded and frightened animal. 

Room to move unhampered, quiet to collect my wits, and clean 
air for the girl to breathe were necessary, and I am afraid the 
methods I employed to gain them were not as gentle as they 
might have been. When the last of the men had left in a hurry, I 
set the women, who up to now had remained in the 
background, to warming water and to tearing my shirt, which 
was comparatively clean and dry, into bandages, while one girl, 
who appeared to be on the point of getting hysterics, was 
bundled off to scour the village for a pair of scissors. The water 
and bandages were ready before the girl I had sent for the 
scissors returned with the only pair, she said, the village could 
produce. They had been found in the house of a tailor, long 
since dead, and had been used by the widow for digging up 
potatoes. The rusty blades, some eight inches long, could not 
be made to meet at any point, and after a vain attempt I 
decided to leave the thick coils of blood-caked hair alone. 

The major wounds consisted of two claw cuts, one starting 
between the eyes and extending right over the head and down 
to the nape of the neck, leaving the scalp hanging in two 
halves, and the other, starting near the first, running across the 
forehead up to the right ear. In addition to these ugly gaping 
wounds there were a number of deep scratches on the right 
breast, right shoulder and neck, and one deep cut on the back 
of the right hand, evidently inflicted when the girl had put up 
her hand in a vain attempt to shield her head. 

A doctor friend whom I had once taken out tiger-shooting on 
foot had, on our return after an exciting morning, presented me 
with a two-ounce bottle of yellow fluid which he advised me to 



carry whenever I went out shooting. I had carried the bottle in 
the inner pocket of my shooting jacket for over a year and a 
portion of the fluid had evaporated; but the bottle was still 
three-parts full, and after I had washed the girl's head and 
body I knocked the neck off the bottle and poured the contents, 
to the last drop, into the wounds. This done I bandaged the 
head, to try to keep the scalp in position, and then picked up 
the girl and carried her to her home— a single room combining 
living quarters, kitchen and nursery— with the women 
following behind. 

Dependent from a rafter near the door was an open basket, the 
occupant of which was now clamouring to be fed. This was a 
complication with which I could not deal, so I left the solution 
of it to the assembled women. Ten days later, when on the eve 
of my departure I visited the girl for the last time, I found her 
sitting on the doorstep of her home with the baby asleep in her 
lap. 

Her wounds, except for a sore at the nape of her neck where 
the tiger's claws had sunk deepest into the flesh, were all 
healed, and when parting her great wealth of raven-black hair 
to show me where the scalp had made a perfect join, she said, 
with a smile, that she was very glad her young sister had— 
quite by mistake— borrowed the wrong pair of scissors from 
the tailor's widow (for a shorn head here is the sign of 
widowhood). If these lines should ever be read by my friend the 
doctor I should like him to know that the little bottle of yellow 
fluid he so thoughtfully provided for me, saved the life of a very 
brave young mother. 

While I had been attending to the girl my men had procured a 
goat. Following back the blood trail made by the girl I found 
the spot where the attack had taken place, and tying the goat 
to a bush I climbed into a stunted oak, the only tree in the 
vicinity, and prepared for an all-night vigil. Sleep, even in 
snatches, was not possible, for my seat was only a few feet 
from the ground, and the tigress was still without her dinner. 



However, I neither saw nor heard anything throughout the 
night. 

On examining the ground in the morning— I had not had time 
to do this the previous evening— I found that the tigress, after 
attacking the girl, had gone up the valley for half a mile to 
where a cattle track crossed the Nandhour river. This track it 
had followed for two miles, to its junction with the forest road 
on the ridge above Dalkania. Here on the hard ground I lost the 
tracks. 

For two days the people in all the surrounding villages kept as 
close to their habitations as the want of sanitary conveniences 
permitted, and then on the third day news was brought to me 
by four runners that the man-eater had claimed a victim at 
Lohali, a village five miles to the south of Dalkania. The 
runners stated that the distance by the forest road was ten 
miles, but only five by a short cut by which they proposed 
taking me back. My preparations were soon made, and a little 
after midday I set off with my four guides. 

A very stiff climb of two miles brought us to the crest of the 
long ridge south of Dalkania and in view of the valley three 
miles below, where the 'kill' was reported to have taken place. 
My guides could give me no particulars. They lived in a small 
village a mile on the near side of Lohali, and at 10 a.m. a 
message had come to them— in the manner already described 
— that a woman of Lohali had been killed by the man-eater, and 
they were instructed to convey this information to me at 
Dalkania. 

The top of the hill on which we were standing was bare of 
trees, and, while I regained my breath and had a smoke, my 
companions pointed out the landmarks. Close to where we 
were resting, and under the shelter of a great rock, there was a 
small ruined hut, with a circular thorn enclosure near by. 
Questioned about this hut, the men told me the following story. 
Four years previously a Bhutia (a man from across the border), 
who had all the winter been sending packages of gur, salt, and 



other commodities from the bazaars at the foothills into the 
interior of the district, had built the hut with the object of 
resting and fattening his flock of goats through the summer 
and rains, and getting them fit for the next winter's work. After 
a few weeks the goats wandered down the hill and damaged 
my informants' crops, and when they came up to lodge a 
protest, they found the hut empty, and the fierce sheepdog 
these men invariably keep with them, to guard their camps at 
night, chained to an iron stake and dead. Foul play was 
suspected, and next day men were collected from adjoining 
villages and a search organized. Pointing to an oak tree scored 
by lightning and distant some four hundred yards, my 
informants said that under it the remains of the man— his skull 
and a few splinters of bone— and his clothes had been found. 
This was the Chowgarh man-eater's first human victim. 

There was no way of descending the precipitous hill from 
where we were sitting, and the men informed me we should 
have to proceed half a mile along the ridge to where we should 
find a very steep and rough track which would take us straight 
down, past their village, to Lohali, which we could see in the 
valley below. We had covered about half the distance we had to 
go along the ridge, when all at once, and without being able to 
ascribe any reason for it, I felt we were being followed. Arguing 
with myself against this feeling was of no avail; there was only 
one man-eater in all this area and she had procured a kill three 
miles away which she was not likely to leave. However, the 
uneasy feeling persisted, and as we were now at the widest 
part of the grassy ridge I made the men sit down, instructing 
them not to move until I returned, and myself set out on a tour 
of investigation. Retracing my steps to where we had first come 
out on the ridge I entered the jungle, and carefully worked 
round the open ground and back to where the men were 
sitting. No alarm-call of animal or bird indicated that a tiger 
was anywhere in the vicinity, but from there on I made the four 
men walk in front of me, while I brought up the rear, with 
thumb on safety-catch and a constant lookout behind. 



When we arrived at the little village my companions had 
started from, they asked for permission to leave me. I was very 
glad of this request, for I had a mile of dense scrub jungle to go 
through, and though the feeling that I was being followed had 
long since left me, I felt safer and more comfortable with only 
my own life to guard. A little below the outlying terraced fields, 
and where the dense scrub started, there was a crystal-clear 
spring of water, from which the village drew its water-supply. 
Here in the soft wet ground I found the fresh pug marks of the 
man-eater. 

These pug marks, coming from the direction of the village I was 
making for, coupled with the uneasy feeling I had experienced 
on the ridge above, convinced me that something had gone 
wrong with the 'kill' and that my quest would be fruitless. As I 
emerged from the scrub jungle I came in view of Lohali, which 
consisted of five or six small houses. Near the door of one of 
these houses a group of people were collected. 

My approach over the steep open ground and narrow terraced 
fields was observed, and a few men detached themselves from 
the group near the door and advanced to meet me. One of the 
number, an old man, bent down to touch my feet, and with 
tears streaming down his cheeks implored me to save the life of 
his daughter. His story was as short as it was tragic. His 
daughter, who was a widow and the only relative he had in the 
world, had gone out at about ten o'clock to collect dry sticks 
with which to cook their midday meal. A small stream flows 
through the valley, and on the far side of the stream from the 
village the hill goes steeply up. On the lower slope of this hill 
there are a few terraced fields. At the edge of the lowest field, 
and distant about 150 yards from the home, the woman had 
started to collect sticks. A little later, some women who were 
washing their clothes in the stream heard a scream, and on 
looking up saw the woman and a tiger disappearing together 
into the dense thorn bushes, which extended from the edge of 
the field right down to the stream. Dashing back to the village, 
the women raised an alarm. The frightened villagers made no 



attempt at a rescue, and a message for help was shouted to a 
village higher up the valley, from where it was tossed back to 
the village from which the four men had set out to find me. Half 
an hour after the message had been sent, the wounded woman 
crawled home. Her story was that she had seen the tiger just as 
it was about to spring on her, and as there was no time to run, 
she had jumped down the almost perpendicular hillside and 
while she was in the air the tiger had caught her and they had 
gone down the hill together. She remembered nothing further 
until she regained consciousness and found herself near the 
stream; and being unable to call for help, she had crawled back 
to the village on her hands and knees. 

We had reached the door of the house while this tale was being 
told. Making the people stand back from the door— the only 
opening in the four walls of the room— I drew the blood¬ 
stained sheet off the woman, whose pitiful condition I am not 
going to attempt to describe. Had I been a qualified doctor, 
armed with modern appliances, instead of just a mere man with 
a little permanganate of potash in his pocket, I do not think it 
would have been possible to have saved the woman's life; for 
the deep tooth and claw wounds in her face, neck, and other 
parts of her body had, in that hot unventilated room, already 
turned septic. Mercifully she was only semi-conscious. The old 
father had followed me into the room, and, more for his 
satisfaction than for any good I thought it would do, I washed 
the caked blood from the woman's head and body, and cleaned 
out the wounds as best I could with my handkerchief and a 
strong solution of permanganate. 

It was now too late to think of returning to my camp, and a 
place would have to be found in which to pass the night. A little 
way up the stream, and not far from where the women had 
been washing their clothes, there was a giant pipal tree, with a 
foot-high masonry platform round it used by the villagers for 
religious ceremonies. 

I undressed on the platform and bathed in the stream; and 



when the wind had carried out the functions of a towel, dressed 
again, put my back to the tree and, laying the loaded rifle by 
my side, prepared to see the night out. Admittedly it was an 
unsuitable place in which to spend the night, but any place was 
preferable to the village, and that dark room, with its hot fetid 
atmosphere and swarm of buzzing flies, where a woman in 
torment fought desperately for breath. 

During the night the wailing of women announced that the 
sufferer's troubles were over, and when I passed through the 
village at day break preparations for the funeral were well 
advanced. 

From the experience of this unfortunate woman, and that of the 
girl at Dalkania, it was now evident that the old tigress had 
depended, to a very great extent, on her cub to kill the human 
beings she attacked. Usually only one out of every hundred 
people attacked by man-eating tigers escapes, but in the case 
of this man-eater it was apparent that more people would be 
mauled than killed outright, and as the nearest hospital was 
fifty miles away, when I returned to Naini Tal I appealed to 
Government to send a supply of disinfectants and dressings to 
all the Headmen of villages in the area in which the man-eater 
was operating. On my subsequent visit I was glad to learn that 
the request had been complied with, and that the disinfectants 
had saved the lives of a number of people. 

I stayed at Dalkania for another week and announced on a 
Saturday that I would leave for home the following Monday. I 
had now been in the man-eater's domain for close on a month, 
and the constant strain of sleeping in- an open tent, and of 
walking endless miles during the day with the prospect of every 
step being the last, was beginning to tell on my nerves. The 
villagers received my announcement with consternation, and 
only desisted from trying to make me change my decision when 
I promised them I would return at the first opportunity. 

After breakfast on Sunday morning the Headmen of Dalkania 
paid me a visit and requested me to shoot them some game 



before I left. The request was gladly acceded to, and half an 
hour later, accompanied by four villagers and one of my own 
men, and armed with a *275 rifle and a clip of cartridges, I set 
off for the hill on the far side of the Nandhour river, on the 
upper slopes of which I had, from my camp, frequently seen 
ghooral feeding. 

One of the villagers accompanying me was a tall gaunt man 
with a terribly disfigured face. He had been a constant visitor 
to my camp, and finding in me a good listener had told and 
retold his encounter with the man-eater so often that I could, 
without effort, repeat the whole story in my sleep. The 
encounter had taken place four years previously and is best 
told in his own words. 

'Do you see that pine tree, sahib, at the bottom of the grassy 
slope on the shoulder of the hill? Yes, the pine tree with a big 
white rock to the east of it. Well, it was at the upper edge of the 
grassy slope that the man-eater attacked me. The grassy slope 
is as perpendicular as the wall of a house, and none but a 
hillman could find foothold on it. My son, who was eight years 
of age at the time, and I had cut grass on that slope on the day 
of my misfortune, carrying the grass up in armfuls to the belt of 
trees where the ground is level. 

'I was stooping down at the very edge of the slope, tying the 
grass into a big bundle, when the tiger sprang at me and 
buried its teeth, one under my right eye, one in my chin and 
the other two here at the back of my neck. The tiger's mouth 
struck me with a great blow and I fell over on my back, while 
the tiger lay on top of me chest to chest, with its stomach 
between my legs. When falling backwards I had flung out my 
arms and my right hand had come in contact with an oak 
sapling. As my fingers grasped the sapling, an idea came to me. 
My legs were free, and if I could draw them up and insert my 
feet under and against the tiger's belly, I might be able to push 
the tiger off, and run away. The pain, as the tiger crushed all 
the bones on the right side of my face, was terrible; but I did 



not lose consciousness, for you see, sahib, at that time I was a 
young man, and in all the hills there was no one to compare 
with me in strength. Very slowly, so as not to anger the tiger I 
drew my legs up on either side of it, and gently inserted my 
bare feet against its belly Then placing my left hand against its 
chest and pushing and kicking upwards with all my might, I 
lifted the tiger right off the ground and, we being on the very 
edge of the perpendicular hillside, the tiger went crashing 
down and belike would have taken me with him, had my hold 
on the sapling not been a good one. 

'My son had been too frightened to run away, and when the 
tiger had gone, I took his loincloth from him and wrapped it 
round my head, and holding his hand I walked back to the 
village. Arrived at my home I told my wife to call all my friends 
together, for I wished to see their faces before I died. When my 
friends were assembled and saw my condition, they wanted to 
put me on a charpoy and carry me fifty miles to the Almora 
hospital, but this I would not consent to; for my suffering was 
great, and being assured that my time had come, I wanted to 
die where I had been born, and where I had lived all my life. 
Water was brought, for I was thirsty and my head was on fire, 
but when it was poured into my mouth, it all flowed out 
through the holes in my neck. Thereafter, for a period beyond 
measure, there was great confusion in my mind, and much pain 
in my head and in my neck, and while I waited and longed for 
death to end my sufferings my wounds healed of themselves, 
and I became well. 

'And now, sahib, I am as you see me, old and thin, and with 
white hair, and a face that no man can look on without 
repulsion. My enemy lives and continues to claim victims but 
do not be deceived into thinking it is a tiger, for it is no tiger 
but an evil spirit, who, when it craves for human flesh and 
blood, takes on for a little while the semblance of a tiger. But 
they say you are a sadhu, sahib, and the spirits that guard 
sadhus are more powerful than this evil spirit, as is proved by 
the fact that you spent three days and three nights alone in the 



jungle, and came out— as your men said you would— alive and 
unhurt.' 

Looking at the great frame of the man, it was easy to picture 
him as having been a veritable giant. And a giant in strength he 
must have been, for no man, unless he had been endowed with 
strength far above the average, could have lifted the tigress 
into the air, torn its hold from the side of his head, carrying 
away, as it did, half his face with it, and hurled it down the 
precipitous hill. 

My gaunt friend constituted himself our guide, and with a 
beautifully polished axe, with long tapering handle, over his 
shoulder, led us by devious steep paths to the valley below. 
Fording the Nandhour river, we crossed several wide terraced 
fields, now gone out of cultivation for fear of the man-eater, and 
on reaching the foot of the hill started what proved to be a very 
stiff climb, through forest, to the grass slopes above. Gaunt my 
friend may have been, but he lacked nothing in wind, and tough 
as I was it was only by calling frequent halts— to admire the 
view— that I was able to keep up with him. 

Emerging from the tree forest, we went diagonally across the 
grassy slope, in the direction of a rock cliff that extended 
upwards for a thousand feet or more. It was on this cliff, 
sprinkled over with tufts of short grass, that I had seen ghooral 
feeding from my tent. We had covered a few hundred yards 
when one of these small mountain-goats started up out of a 
ravine, and at my shot 'crumpled up and slipped back out of 
sight. Alarmed by the report of the rifle, another ghooral, that 
had evidently been lying asleep at the foot of the cliff, sprang to 
his feet and went up the rock face, as only he or his big brother 
the tahr could have done. As he climbed upwards, I lay down 
and, putting the sight to 200 yards, waited for him to stop. This 
he presently did, coming out on a projecting rock to look down 
on us. At my shot he staggered, regained his footing, and very 
slowly continued his climb. At the second shot he fell, hung for 
a second or two on a narrow ledge, and then fell through space 



to the grassy slope from whence he had started. Striking the 
ground he rolled over and over, passing within a hundred yards 
of us, and eventually came to rest on a cattle track a hundred 
and fifty yards below. 

I have only once, in all the years I have been shooting, 
witnessed a similar sight to the one we saw during the next few 
minutes, and on that occasion the marauder was a leopard. 

The ghooral had hardly come to rest when a big Himalayan 
bear came lumbering out of a ravine on the side of the grassy 
slope and, with never a pause or backward look, came at a fast 
trot along the cattle track. On reaching the dead goat he sat 
down and took it into his lap, and as he started nosing the goat, 
I fired. Maybe I hurried over my shot, or allowed too much for 
refraction; anyway the bullet went low and struck the bear in 
the stomach instead of in the chest. To the six of us who were 
intently watching, it appeared that the bear took the smack of 
the bullet as an assault from the ghooral, for, rearing up, he 
flung the animal from him and came galloping along the track, 
emitting angry grunts. As he passed a hundred yards below us I 
fired my fifth and last cartridge, the bullet, as I found later, 
going through the fleshy part of his hind quarters. 

While the men retrieved the two ghooral, I descended to 
examine the blood trail. The blood on the track showed the 
bear to be hard hit, but even so there was danger in following 
it up with an empty rifle, for bears are bad-tempered at the 
best of times, and are very ugly customers to deal with when 
wounded. 

When the men rejoined me a short council of war was held. 
Camp was three and a half miles away, and as it was now 2 
p.m. it would not be possible to fetch more ammunition, track 
down and kill the bear, and get back home by dark; so it was 
unanimously decided that we should follow up the wounded 
animal and try to finish it off with stones and the axe. 

The hill was steep and fairly free of undergrowth, and by 



keeping above the bear there was a sporting chance of our 
being able to accomplish our task without serious mishap. We 
accordingly set off, I leading the way followed by three men, 
the rear being brought up by two men each with a ghooral 
strapped to his back. Arrived at the spot where I had fired my 
last shot, additional blood on the track greatly encouraged us. 
Two hundred yards further on, the blood trail led down into a 
deep ravine. Here we divided up our force, two men crossing to 
the far side, the owner of the axe and I remaining on the near 
side, with the men carrying the ghooral following in our rear. 

On the word being given we started to advance down the hill. 

In the bed of the ravine, and fifty feet below us, was a dense 
patch of stunted bamboo, and when a stone was thrown into 
this thicket, the bear got up with a scream of rage; and six 
men, putting their best foot foremost, went straight up the hill. 

I was not trained to this form of exercise, and on looking back 
to see if the bear was gaining on us, I saw, much to my relief, 
that he was going as hard downhill as we were going uphill. A 
shout to my companions, a rapid change of direction, and we 
were off in full cry and rapidly gaining on our quarry. A few 
well-aimed shots had been registered, followed by delighted 
shouts from the marksmen, and angry grunts from the bear, 
when at a sharp bend in the ravine, which necessitated a 
cautious advance, we lost touch with the bear. To have followed 
the blood trail would have been easy, but here the ravine was 
full of big rocks, behind any of which the bear might have been 
lurking, so while the encumbered men sat down for a rest, a 
cast was made on either side of the ravine. While my 
companion went forward to look down into the ravine, I went to 
the right to prospect a rocky cliff that went sheer down for 
some two hundred feet. Holding to a tree for support, I leaned 
over and saw the bear lying on a narrow ledge forty feet 
immediately below me. I picked up a stone, about thirty pounds 
in weight, and, again advancing to the edge and in imminent 
danger of going over myself, I raised the stone above my head 
with both hands and hurled it. 



The stone struck the ledge a few inches from the bear's head, 
and scrambling to his feet he disappeared from sight, to 
reappear a minute later on the side of the hill. Once again the 
hunt was on. The ground was here more open and less 
encumbered with rocks, and the four of us who were running 
light had no difficulty in keeping up with him. For a mile or 
more we ran him at top speed, until we eventually cleared the 
forest and emerged on to the terraced fields. Rainwater had 
cut several deep and narrow channels across the fields, and in 
one of these channels the bear took cover. 

The man with the distorted face was the only armed member of 
the party and he was unanimously elected executioner. Nothing 
loth, he cautiously approached the bear and, swinging his 
beautifully polished axe aloft, brought the square head down on 
the bear's skull. The result was as alarming as it was 
unexpected. The axe-head rebounded off the bear's skull as 
though it had been struck on a block of rubber, and with a 
scream of rage the animal reared up on his hind legs. 
Fortunately he did not follow up his advantage, for we were 
bunched together, and in trying to run got in each other's way. 

The bear did not appear to like this open ground, and after 
going a short way down the channel again took cover. It was 
now my turn for the axe. The bear,, however, having once been 
struck resented my approach, and it was only after a great deal 
of manoeuvring that I eventually got within striking distance. It 
had been my ambition when a boy to be a lumberman in 
Canada, and I had attained sufficient proficiency with an axe to 
split a match-stick. I had no fear, therefore, as the owner had, 
of the axe glancing off and getting damaged on the stones, and 
the moment I got within reach I buried the entire blade in the 
bear's skull. 

Himalayan bearskins are very greatly prized by our hill folk, 
and the owner of the axe was a very proud and envied man 
when I told him he could have the skin in addition to a double 
share of the ghooral meat. Leaving the men, whose numbers 



were being rapidly augmented by new arrivals from the village, 
to skin and divide up the bag, I climbed up to the village and 
paid, as already related, a last visit to the injured girl. The day 
had been a strenuous one, and if the man-eater had paid me a 
visit that night she would have 'caught me napping'. 

On the road I had taken when coming to Dalkania therewere 
several long stiff climbs up treeless hills, and when I mentioned 
the discomforts of this road to the villagers they had suggested 
that I should go back via Haira Khan. This route would 
necessitate only one climb to the ridge above the village, from 
where it was downhill all the way to Ranibagh, whence I could 
complete the journey to Naini Tal by car. 

I had warned my men overnight to prepare for an early start, 
and a little before sunrise, leaving them to pack up and follow 
me, I said good-bye to my friends at Dalkania and started on 
the two-mile climb to the forest road on the ridge above. The 
footpath I took was not the one by which my men, and later I, 
had arrived at Dalkania, but was one the villagers used when 
going to, and returning from, the bazaars in the foot-hills. 

The path wound in and out of deep ravines, through thick oak 
and pine forests and dense undergrowth. There had been no 
news of the tigress for a week. This absence of news made me 
all the more careful, and an hour after leaving camp I arrived 
without mishap at an open glade near the top of the hill, within 
a hundred yards of the forest road. 

The glade was pear-shaped, roughly a hundred yards long and 
fifty yards wide, with a stagnant pool of rain-water in the 
centre of it. Sambur and other game used this pool as a 
drinking place and wallow and, curious to see the tracks round 
it, I left the path, which skirted the left-hand side of the glade 
and passed close under a cliff of rock which extended up to the 
road. As 'I approached the pool I saw the pug marks of the 
tigress in the soft earth at the edge of the water. She had 
approached the pool from the same direction as I had, and, 
evidently disturbed by me, had crossed the water and gone into 



the dense tree and scrub jungle on the right-hand side of the 
glade. A great chance lost, for had I kept as careful a lookout in 
front as I had behind I should have seen her before she saw 
me. However, though I had missed a chance, the advantages 
were now all on my side and distinctly in my favour. 

The tigress had seen me, or she would not have crossed the 
pool and hurried for shelter, as her tracks showed she had 
done. Having seen me she had also seen that I was alone, and 
watching me from cover as she undoubtedly was, she would 
assume I was going to the pool to drink as she had done. My 
movements up to this had been quite natural, and if I could 
continue to make her think I was unaware of her presence, she 
would possibly give me a second chance. Stooping down and 
keeping a very sharp lookout from under my hat, I coughed 
several times, splashed the water about, and then, moving very 
slowly and gathering dry sticks on the way, I went to the foot of 
the steep rock. Here I built a small fire, and putting my back to 
the rock lit a cigarette. By the time the cigarette had been 
smoked the fire had burnt out. I then lay down, and pillowing 
my head on my left arm placed the rifle on the ground with rny 
finger on the trigger. 

The rock above me was too steep for any animal to find 
foothold on. I had therefore only my front to guard, and as the 
heavy cover nowhere approached to within less than twenty 
yards of my position I was quite safe. I had all this time neither 
seen nor heard anything; nevertheless, I was convinced that 
the tigress was watching me. The rim of my hat, while 
effectually shading my eyes, did not obstruct my vision and 
inch by inch I scanned every bit of the jungle within my range 
of view. There was not a breath of wind blowing, and not a leaf 
or blade of grass stirred. My men, whom I had instructed to 
keep close together and sing from the time they left camp until 
they joined me on the forest road, were not due for an hour and 
a half, and during this time it was more than likely that the 
tigress would break cover and try to stalk, or rush, me. 



There are occasions when time drags, and others when it flies. 
My left arm, on which my head was pillowed, had long since 
ceased to prick and had gone dead, but even so the singing of 
the men in the valley below reached me all too soon. The voices 
grew louder, and presently I caught sight of the men as they 
rounded a sharp bend. It was possibly at this bend that the 
tigress had seen me as she turned round to retrace her steps 
after having her drink. Another failure, and the last chance on 
this trip gone. 

After my men had rested we climbed up to the road, and set off 
on what proved to be a very long twenty-mile march to the 
forest Rest House at Haira Khan. After going a couple of 
hundred yards over open ground, the road entered very thick 
forest, and here I made the men walk in front while I brought 
up the rear. We had gone about two miles in this order, when 
on turning a corner I saw a man sitting on the road, herding 
buffaloes. It was now time to call a halt for breakfast, so I 
asked the man where we could get water. He pointed down the 
hill straight in front of him, and said there was a spring down 
there from which his village, which was just round the shoulder 
of the hill, drew its water-supply. There was, however, no 
necessity for us to go down the hill for water, for if we 
continued a little further we should find a good spring on the 
road. 

His village was at the upper end of the valley in which the 
woman of Lohali had been killed the previous week, and he told 
me that nothing had been heard of the man-eater since, and 
added that the animal was possibly now at the other end of the 
district. I disabused his mind on this point by telling him about 
the fresh pug marks I had seen at the pool, and advised him 
very strongly to collect his buffaloes and return to the village. 
His buffaloes, some ten in number, were straggling up towards 
the road and he said he would leave as soon as they had grazed 
up to where he was sitting. Handing him a cigarette, I left him 
with a final warning. What occurred after I left was related to 
me by the men of the village, when I paid the district a second 



visit some months later. 

When the man eventually got home that day he told the 
assembled villagers of our meeting, and my warning, and said 
that after he had watched me go round a bend in the road a 
hundred yards away he started to light the cigarette I had 
given him. A wind was blowing, and to protect the flame of the 
match he bent forward, and while in this position he was seized 
from behind by the right shoulder and pulled backwards. His 
first thought was of the party who had just left him, but 
unfortunately, his cry for help was not heard by them. Help, 
however, was near at hand, for as soon as the buffaloes heard 
his cry, mingled with the growl of the tigress, they charged on 
to the road and drove the tigress off. His shoulder and arm 
were broken, and with great difficulty he managed to climb on 
the back of one of his brave rescuers, and, followed by the rest 
of the herd, reached his home. The villagers tied up his wounds 
as best they could and carried him thirty miles, non-stop, to the 
Haldwani hospital, where he died shortly after admission. 

When Atropos who snips the threads of life misses one thread 
she cuts another, and we who do not know why one thread is 
missed and another cut, call it Fate, Kismet, or what we will. 

For a month I had lived in an open tent, a hundred yards from 
the nearest human being, and from dawn to dusk had 
wandered through the jungles, and on several occasions had 
disguised myself as a woman and cut grass in places where no 
local inhabitant dared to go. During this period the man-eater 
had, quite possibly, missed many opportunities of adding me to 
her bag and now, when making a final effort, she had quite by 
chance encountered this unfortunate man and claimed him as a 
victim. 

II 

The following February I returned to Dalkania. A number of 
human beings had been killed, and many more wounded, over a 
wide area since my departure from the district the previous 
summer, and as the whereabouts of the tigress was not known 


and the chances in one place were as good as in another, I 
decided to return and camp on the ground with which I was 
now familiar. 

On my arrival at Dalkania I was told that a cow had been killed 
the previous evening, on the hill on which the bear hunt had 
taken place. The men who had been herding the cattle at the 
time were positive that the animal they had seen killing the 
cow was a tiger. The kill was lying near some bushes at the 
edge of a deserted field, and was clearly visible from the spot 
where my tent was being put up. Vultures were circling over 
the kill, and looking through my field-glasses I saw several of 
these birds perched on a tree, to the left of the kill. From the 
fact that the kill was lying out in the open, and the vultures had 
not descended on it, I concluded (a) that the cow had been 
killed by a leopard, and (b) that the leopard was lying up close 
to the kill. 

The ground below the field on which the cow was lying was 
very steep and overgrown with dense brushwood. The 
maneater was still at large, and an approach over this ground 
was therefore inadvisable. 

To the right was a grassy slope, but the ground here was too 
open to admit of my approaching the kill without being seen. A 
deep .heavily-wooded ravine, starting from near the crest of the 
hill, ran right down to the Nandhour river, passing within a 
short distance of the kill. The tree on which the vultures were 
perched was growing on the edge of this ravine. I decided on 
this ravine as my line of approach. While I had been planning 
out the stalk with the assistance of the villagers, who knew 
every foot of the ground, my men had prepared tea for me. The 
day was now on the decline but by going hard I should just 
have time to visit the kill and return to camp before nightfall. 

Before setting off I instructed my men to be on the look-out. If, 
after hearing a shot, they saw me on the open ground near the 
kill, three or four of them were immediately to leave camp, and, 
keeping to the open ground, to join me. On the other hand if I 



did not fire, and failed to return by morning, a search party was 
to be organized. 

The ravine was overgrown with raspberry bushes and strewn 
with great rocks, and as the wind was blowing downhill, my 
progress was slow. After a stiff climb I eventually reached the 
tree on which the vultures were perched, only to find that the 
kill was not visible from this spot. The deserted field, which 
through my field-glasses had appeared to be quite straight, I 
found to be crescent-shaped, ten yards across at its widest part 
and tapering to a point at both ends. The outer edge was 
bordered with dense undergrowth, and the hill fell steeply 
away from the inner edge. Only two-thirds of the field was 
visible from where I was standing, and in order to see the 
remaining one-third, on which the kill was lying, it would be 
necessary either to make a wide detour and approach from the 
far side or climb the tree on which the vultures were perched. 

I decided on the latter course. The cow, as far as I could judge, 
was about twenty yards from the tree, and it was quite possible 
that the animal that had killed her was even less than that 
distance from me. To climb the tree without disturbing the 
killer would have been an impossible feat, and would not have 
been attempted had it not been for the vultures. There were by 
now some twenty of these birds on the tree and their number 
was being added to by new arrivals, and as the accommodation 
on the upper branches was limited there was much flapping of 
wings and quarrelling. The tree was leaning outwards away 
from the hill, and about ten feet from the ground a great limb 
projected out over the steep hillside. Hampered with the rifle I 
had great difficulty in reaching this limb. Waiting until a fresh 
quarrel had broken out among the vultures, I stepped out along 
the branch— a difficult balancing feat where a slip or false step 
would have resulted in a fall of a hundred or more feet on to 
the rocks below— reached a fork, and sat down. 

The kill, from which only a few pounds of flesh had been eaten, 
was now in full view. I had been in position about ten minutes. 



and was finding my perch none too comfortable, when two 
vultures, who had been circling round and were uncertain of 
their reception on the tree, alighted on the field a short 
distance from the cow. They had hardly come to rest when they 
were on the wing again, and at the same moment the bushes on 
my side of the kill were gently agitated and out into the open 
stepped a fine male leopard. 

Those who have never seen a leopard under favourable 
conditions in his natural surroundings can have no conception 
of the grace of movement, and beauty of colouring, of this the 
most graceful and the most beautiful of all animals in our 
Indian jungles. Nor are his attractions limited to outward 
appearances, for, pound for pound, his strength is second to 
none, and in courage he lacks nothing. To class such an animal 
as VERMIN, as is done in some parts of India, is a crime which 
only those could perpetrate whose knowledge of the leopard is 
limited to the miserable, underfed, and mangy specimens seen 
in captivity. 

But beautiful as the specimen was that stood before me, his life 
was forfeit, for he had taken to cattle killing, and I had 
promised the people of Dalkania and other villages on my last 
visit that I would rid them of this their minor enemy, if 
opportunity offered. The opportunity had now come, and I do 
not think the leopard heard the shot that killed him. 

Of the many incomprehensible things one meets with in life, 
the hardest to assign any reason for is the way in which 
misfortune dogs an individual, or a family. Take as an example 
the case of the owner of the cow over which I had shot the 
leopard. He was a boy, eight years of age, and an only child. 

Two years previously his mother, while out cutting grass for the 
cow, had been killed and eaten by the man-eater, and twelve 
months later his father had suffered a like fate. The few pots 
and pans the family possessed had been sold to pay off the 
small debt left by the father, and the son started life as the 
owner of one cow; and this particular cow the leopard had 



selected, out of a herd of two or three hundred head of village 
cattle, and killed. (I am afraid my attempt to repair a 
heartbreak was not very successful in this case, for though the 
new cow, a red one, was an animal of parts, it did not make up 
to the boy for the loss of his lifelong white companion.) 

My young buffaloes had been well cared for by the man in 
whose charge I had left them, and the day after my arrival I 
started tying them out, though I had little hope of the tigress 
accepting them as bait. 

Five miles down the Nandhour valley nestles a little village at 
the foot of a great cliff of rock, some thousand or more feet 
high. The man-eater had, during the past few months, killed 
four people on the outskirts of this village. Shortly after I shot 
the leopard, a deputation came from this village to request me 
to move my camp from Dalkania to a site that had been 
selected for me near their village. I was told that the tiger had 
frequently been seen on the cliff above the village and that it 
appeared to have its home in one of the many caves in the cliff 
face. That very morning, I was informed, some women out 
cutting grass had seen the tiger, and the villagers were now in 
a state of terror, and too frightened to leave their homes. 
Promising the deputation I would do all I could to help them, I 
made a very early start next morning, climbed the hill opposite 
the village, and scanned the cliff for an hour or more through 
my field-glasses. I then crossed the valley, and by way of a very 
deep ravine climbed the cliff above the village. Here the going 
was very difficult and not at all to my liking, for added to the 
danger of a fall, which would have resulted in a broken neck, 
was the danger of an attack on ground on which it would be 
impossible to defend oneself. 

By 2 p.m. I had seen as much of the rock cliff as I shall ever 
want to see again, and was making my way up the valley 
towards my camp and breakfast, when on looking back before 
starting the stiff climb to Dalkania I saw two men running 
towards me from the direction in which I had just come. On 



joining me the men informed me that a tiger had just killed a 
bullock in the deep ravine up which I had gone earlier in the 
day. Telling one of the men to go on up to my camp and instruct 
my servant to send tea and some food, I turned round and, 
accompanied by the other man, retraced my steps down the 
valley 

The ravine where the bullock had been killed was about two 
hundred feet deep and one hundred feet wide. As we 
approached it I saw a number of vultures rising, and when we 
arrived at the kill I found the vultures had cleaned it out, 
leaving only the skin and bones. The spot where the remains of 
the bullock were lying was only a hundred yards from the 
village but there was no way up the steep bank, so my guide 
took me a quarter of a mile down the ravine, to where a cattle 
track crossed it. This track, after gaining the high ground, 
wound in and out through dense scrub jungle before it finally 
fetched up at the village. On arrival at the village I told the 
Headman that the vultures had ruined the kill, and asked him 
to provide me with a young buffalo and a short length of stout 
rope; while these were being procured, two of my men arrived 
from Dalkania with the food I had sent for. 

The sun was near setting when I re-entered the ravine, 
followed by several men leading a vigorous young male buffalo 
which the Headman had purchased for me from an adjoining 
village. Fifty yards from where the bullock had been killed, one 
end of a pine tree washed down from the hill above had been 
buried deep in the bed of the ravine After tying the buffalo very 
securely to the exposed end of the pine, the men returned to 
the village. There were no trees in the vicinity, and the only 
possible place for a sit-up was a narrow ledge on the village 
side of the ravine. With great difficulty I climbed to this ledge, 
which was about two feet wide by five feet long, and twenty 
feet above the bed of the ravine. From a little below the ledge 
the rock shelved inwards, forming a deep recess that was not 
visible from the ledge. The ledge canted downwards at an 
uncomfortable angle, and when I had taken my seat on it, I had 



my back towards the direction from which I expected the tiger 
to come, while the tethered buffalo was to my left front, and 
distant about thirty yards from me. 

The sun had set when the buffalo, who had been lying down, 
scrambled to his feet and faced up the ravine, and a moment 
later a stone came rolling down. It would not have been 
possible for me to have fired in the direction from which the 
sound had come, so to avoid detection I sat perfectly still. After 
some time the buffalo gradually turned to the left until he was 
facing in my direction. This showed that whatever he was 
frightened of— and I could see he was frightened— was in the 
recess below me. Presently the head of a tiger appeared 
directly under me. A head-shot at a tiger is only justified in an 
emergency, and any movement on my part might have betrayed 
my presence. For a long minute or two the head remained 
perfectly still, and then, with a quick dash forward, and one 
great bound, the tiger was on the buffalo. The buffalo, as I have 
stated, was facing the tiger, and to avoid a frontal attack with 
the possibility of injury from the buffalo's horns, the tiger's 
dash carried him to the left of the buffalo, and he made his 
attack at right angles. There was no fumbling for tooth-hold, no 
struggle, and no sound beyond the impact of the two heavy 
bodies, after which the buffalo lay quite still with the tiger lying 
partly over it and holding it by the throat. It is generally 
believed that tigers kill by delivering a smashing blow on the 
neck. This is incorrect. Tigers kill with their teeth. 

The right side of the tiger was towards me and, taking careful 
aim with the *275 I had armed myself with when leaving camp 
that morning, I fired. Relinquishing its hold on the buffalo, the 
tiger, without making a sound, turned and bounded off up the 
ravine and out of sight. Clearly a miss, for which I was unable 
to assign any reason. If the tiger had not seen me or the flash 
of the rifle there was a possibility that it would return; so 
recharging the rifle I sat on. 

The buffalo, after the tiger left him, lay without movement, and 



the conviction grew on me that I had shot him instead of the 
tiger. Ten, fifteen minutes had dragged by, when the tiger's 
head for a second time appeared from the recess below me. 
Again there was a long pause, and then, very slowly, the tiger 
emerged, walked up to the buffalo and stood looking down at 
it. With the whole length of the back as a target I was going to 
make no mistake the second time. Very carefully the sights 
were aligned, and the trigger slowly pressed; but instead of the 
tiger falling dead as I expected it to, it sprang to the left and 
went tearing up a little ravine, dislodging stones as it went up 
the steep hillside. 

Two shots fired in comparatively good light at a range of thirty 
yards, and heard by anxious villagers for miles round: and all I 
should have to show for them would be, certainly one, and 
quite possibly two, bullet holes in a dead buffalo. Clearly my 
eyesight was failing, or in climbing the rock I had knocked the 
foresight out of alignment. But on focussing my eyes on small 
objects I found there was nothing wrong with my eyesight, and 
a glance along the barrel showed that the sights were all right, 
so the only reason I could assign for having missed the tiger 
twice was bad shooting. 

There was no chance of the tiger returning a third time; and 
even if it did return, there was nothing to be gained by risking 
the possibility of only wounding it in bad light when I had not 
been able to kill it while the light had been comparatively good. 
Under these circumstances there was no object in my 
remaining any longer on the ledge. 

My clothes were still damp from my exertions earlier in the day, 
a cold wind was blowing and promised to get colder, my shorts 
were of thin khaki and the rock was hard and cold, and a hot 
cup of tea awaited me in the village. Good as these reasons 
were, there was a better and a more convincing reason for my 
remaining where I was— the man-eater. It was now quite dark. 
A quarter-of-a-mile walk, along a boulder-strewn ravine and a 
winding path through dense undergrowth, lay between me and 



the village. Beyond the suspicions of the villagers that the tiger 
they had seen the previous day— and that I had quite evidently 
just fired at— was the man-eater, I had no definite knowledge 
of the man-eater's whereabouts; and though at that moment 
she might have been fifty miles away she might also have been 
watching me from a distance of fifty yards, so, uncomfortable 
as my perch was, prudence dictated that I should remain where 
I was. As the long hours dragged by, the conviction grew on me 
that man-eater shooting, by night, was not a pastime that 
appealed to me, and that if this animal could not be shot during 
daylight hours she would have to be left to die of old age. This 
conviction was strengthened, when, cold and stiff, I started to 
climb down as soon as there was sufficient light to shoot by, 
and slipping on the dew-drenched rock completed the descent 
with my feet in the air. Fortunately I landed on a bed of sand, 
without doing myself or the rifle any injury. 

Early as it was I found the village astir, and I was quickly in the 
middle of a small crowd. In reply to the eager questions from 
all sides, I was only able to say that I had been firing at an 
imaginary tiger with blank ammunition. 

A pot of tea drunk while sitting near a roaring fire did much to 
restore warmth to my inner and outer man, and then, 
accompanied by most of the men and all the boys of the village, 
I went to where a rock jutted out over the ravine and directly 
above my overnight exploit. To the assembled throng I 
explained how the tiger had appeared from the recess under 
me and had bounded on to the buffalo, and how after I had 
fired it had dashed off in that direction; and as I pointed up the 
ravine there was an excited shout of 'Look, sahib, there's the 
tiger lying dead! 1 My eyes were strained with an all-night vigil, 
but even after looking away and back again there was no 
denying the fact that the tiger was lying there, dead. To the 
very natural question of why I had fired a second shot after a 
period of twenty or thirty minutes, I said that the tiger had 
appeared a second time from exactly the same place, and that I 
had fired at it while it was standing near the buffalo and that it 



had gone up that side ravine— and there were renewed shouts, 
in which the women and girls who had now come up joined, of 
'Look, sahib, there is another tiger lying dead!' Both tigers 
appeared to be about the same size and both were lying sixty 
yards from where I had fired. 

Questioned on the subject of this second tiger, the villagers 
said that when the four human beings had been killed, and also 
on the previous day when the bullock had been killed, only one 
tiger had been seen. The mating season for tigers is an elastic 
one extending from November to April, and the man-eater— if 
either of the two tigers lying within view was the man-eater- 
had evidently provided herself with a mate. 

A way into the ravine, down the steep rock face, was found 
some two hundred yards below where I had sat up, and, 
followed by the entire population of the village, I went past the 
dead buffalo to where the first tiger was lying. As I approached 
it hopes rose high, for she was an old tigress. Handing the rifle 
to the nearest man I got down on my knees to examine her feet. 
On that day when the tigress had tried to stalk the women 
cutting wheat she had left some beautiful pug marks on the 
edge of the field. They were the first pug marks I had seen of 
the man-eater, and I had examined them very carefully. They 
showed the tigress to be a very old animal, whose feet had 
splayed out with age. The pads of the forefeet were heavily 
rutted, one deep rut running right across the pad of the right 
forefoot, and the toes were elongated to a length I had never 
before seen in a tiger. With these distinctive feet it would have 
been easy to pick the man-eater out of a hundred dead tigers. 
The animal before me was, I found to my great regret, not the 
man-eater. When I conveyed this information to the assembled 
throng of people there was a murmur of strong dissent from all 
sides. It was asserted that I myself, on my previous visit, had 
declared the man-eater to be an old tigress, and such an animal 
I had now shot a few yards from where, only a short time 
previously, four of their number had been killed. Against this 
convincing evidence, of what value was the evidence of the 



feet, for the feet of all tigers were alike! 

The second tiger could, under the circumstances, only be a 
male, and while I made preparations to skin the tigress I sent a 
party of men to fetch him. The side ravine was steep and 
narrow, and after a great deal of shouting and laughter the 
second tiger — a fine male— was laid down alongside the 
tigress. 

The skinning of those two tigers that had been dead fourteen 
hours, with the sun beating down on my back and an 
evergrowing crowd pressing round, was one of the most 
unpleasant tasks I have ever undertaken. By early afternoon 
the job was completed, and with the skins neatly tied up for my 
men to carry I was ready to start on my five-mile walk back to 
camp. 

During the morning Headmen and others had come in from 
adjoining villages, and before leaving I assured them that the 
Chowgarh man-eater was not dead and warned them that the 
slackening of precautions would give the tigress the 
opportunity she was waiting for. Had my warning been heeded, 
the man-eater would not have claimed as many victims as she 
did during the succeeding months. 

There was no further news of the man-eater, and after a stay of 
a few weeks at Dalkania, I left to keep an appointment with the 
district officials in the terai. 

Ill 

In March 1930, Vivian, our District Commissioner, was touring 
through the man-eater's domain, and on the 22nd of the month 
I received an urgent request from him to go to Kala Agar, 
where he said he would await my arrival. It is roughly fifty 
miles from Naini Tal to Kala Agar, and two days after receipt of 
Vivian's letter I arrived in time for breakfast at the Kala Agar 
Forest Bungalow, where he and Mrs Vivian were staying. 

Over breakfast the Vivians told me they had arrived at the 
bungalow on the afternoon of the 21st, and while they were 



having tea on the verandah, one of six women who were 
cutting grass in the compound of the bungalow had been killed 
and carried off by the man-eater. Rifles were hurriedly seized 
and, accompanied by some of his staff, Vivian followed up the 
'drag' and found the dead woman tucked away under a bush at 
the foot of an oak tree. On examining the ground later, I found 
that on the approach of Vivian's party the tigress had gone off 
down the hill, and throughout the subsequent proceedings had 
remained in a thicket of raspberry bushes, fifty yards from the 
kill. A machan was put up in the oak tree for Vivian, and two 
others in trees near the forest road which passed thirty yards 
above the kill, for members of his staff. The machans were 
occupied as soon as they were ready and the party sat up the 
whole night, without, however, seeing anything of the tigress. 

Next morning the body of the woman was removed for 
cremation, and a young buffalo was tied up on the forest road 
about half a mile from the bungalow, and killed by the tigress 
the same night. The following evening the Vivians sat up over 
the buffalo. There was no moon, and just as daylight was fading 
out and nearby objects becoming indistinct, they first heard, 
and then saw an animal coming up to the kill, which in the 
uncertain light they mistook for a bear; but for this unfortunate 
mistake their very sporting effort would have resulted in their 
bagging the man-eater, for both the Vivians are good rifle 
shots. 

On the 25th the Vivians left Kala Agar, and during the course of 
the day my four buffaloes arrived from Dalkania. As the tigress 
now appeared to be inclined to accept this form of bait I tied 
them up at intervals of a few hundred yards along the forest 
road. For three nights in succession the tigress passed within a 
few feet of the buffaloes without touching them, but on the 
fourth night the buffalo nearest the bungalow was killed. On 
examining the kill in the morning I was disappointed to find 
that the buffalo had been killed by a pair of leopards I had 
heard calling the previous night above the bungalow. I did not 
like the idea of firing in this locality, for fear of driving away the 



tigress, but it was quite evident that if I did not shoot the 
leopards they would kill my three remaining buffaloes, so I 
stalked them while they were sunning themselves on some big 
rocks above the kill, and shot both of them. 

The forest road from the Kala Agar bungalow runs for several 
miles due west through very beautiful forests of pine, oak and 
rhododendron, and in these forests there is, compared with the 
rest of Kumaon, quite a lot of game in the way of sambur, kakar 
and pig, in addition to a great wealth of bird life. On two 
occasions I suspected the tigress of having killed sambur in this 
forest, and though on both occasions I found the bloodstained 
spot where the animal had been killed, I failed to find either of 
the kills. 

For the next fourteen days I spent all the daylight hours either 
on the forest road, on which no one but myself ever set foot, or 
in the jungle, and only twice during that period did I get near 
the tigress. On the first occasion I had been down to visit an 
isolated village, on the south face of Kala Agar ridge, that had 
been abandoned the previous year owing to the depredations of 
the man-eater, and on the way back had taken a cattle track 
that went over the ridge and down the far side to the forest 
road, when, approaching a pile of rocks, I suddenly felt there 
was danger ahead. The distance from the ridge to the forest 
road was roughly three hundred yards. Thte track, after leaving 
the ridge, went steeply down for a few yards and then turned to 
the right and ran diagonally across the hill for a hundred yards; 
the pile of rocks was about midway on the right-hand .side of 
this length of the track. Beyond the rocks a hairpin bend 
carried the track to the left, and a hundred yards further on, 
another sharp bend took it down to its junction with the forest 
road. 

I had been along this track many times, and this was the first 
occasion on which I hesitated to pass the rocks. To avoid them I 
should either have had to go several hundred yards through 
dense undergrowth, or make a wide detour round and above 



them; the former would have subjected me to very great 
danger, and there was no time for the latter, for the sun was 
near setting and I had still two miles to go. So, whether I liked 
it or not, there was nothing for it but to face the rocks. The 
wind was blowing up the hill so I was able to ignore the thick 
cover on the left of the track, and concentrate all my attention 
on the rocks to my right. A hundred feet would see me clear of 
the danger zone, and this distance I covered foot by foot, 
walking sideways with my face to the rocks and the rifle to my 
shoulder; a strange mode of progression, had there been any to 
see it. 

Thirty yards beyond the rocks was an open glade, starting from 
the right-hand side of the track and extending up the hill for 
fifty or sixty yards, and screened from the rocks by a fringe of 
bushes. In this glade a kakar was grazing. I saw her before she 
saw me, and watched her out of the corner of my eye. On 
catching sight of me she threw up her head, and as I was not 
looking in her direction and was moving slowly on she stood 
stock still, as these animals have a habit of doing when they are 
under the impression that they have not been seen. On arrival 
at the hairpin bend I looked over my shoulder and saw that the 
kakar had lowered her head, and was once more cropping the 
grass. 

I had walked a short distance along the track after passing the 
bend when the kakar went dashing up the hill, barking 
hysterically. In a few quick strides I was back at the bend, and 
was just in time to see a movement in the bushes on the lower 
side of the track. That the kakar had seen the tigress was quite 
evident, and the only place where she could have seen her was 
on the track. The movement I had seen might have been caused 
by the passage of a bird, on the other hand it might have been 
caused by the tigress; anyway, a little investigation was 
necessary before proceeding further on my way. 

A trickle of water seeping out from under the rocks had 
damped the red clay of which the track was composed, making 



an ideal surface for the impression of tracks. In this damp clay 
I had left footprints, and over these footprints I now found the 
splayed-out pug marks of the tigress where she had jumped 
down from the rocks and followed me, until the kakar had seen 
her and given its alarm-call, whereon the tigress had left the 
track and entered the bushes where I had seen the movement. 
The tigress was undoubtedly familiar with every foot of the 
ground, and not having had an opportunity of killing me at the 
rocks— and her chance of bagging me at the first hairpin bend 
having been spoilt by the kakar— she was probably now 
making her way through the dense undergrowth to try to 
intercept me at the second bend. 

Further progress along the track was now not advisable, so I 
followed the kakar up the glade, and turning to the left worked 
my way down, over open ground, to the forest road below. Had 
there been sufficient daylight I believe I could, that evening, 
have turned the tables on the tigress, for the conditions, after 
she left the shelter of the rocks, were all in my favour. I knew 
the ground as well as she did, and while she had no reason to 
suspect my intention towards her, I had the advantage of 
knowing, very clearly, her intentions towards me. However, 
though the cgnditions were in my favour, I was unable to take 
advantage of them owing to the lateness of the evening. 

I have made mention elsewhere of the sense that warns us of 
impending danger, and will not labour the subject further 
beyond stating that this sense is a very real one and that I do 
not know, and therefore cannot explain, what brings it into 
operation. On this occasion I had neither heard nor seen the 
tigress, nor had I received any indication from bird or beast of 
her presence, and yet I knew, without any shadow of doubt, 
that she was lying up for me among the rocks. I had been out 
for many hours that day and had covered many miles of jungle 
with unflagging caution, but without one moment's unease, and 
then, on cresting the ridge, and coming in sight of the rocks, I 
knew they held danger for me, and this knowledge was 
confirmed a few minutes later by the kakar's warning call to 



the jungle folk, and by my finding the man-eater's pug marks 
superimposed on my footprints. 

IV 

To those of my readers who have had the patience to 
accompany me so far in my narrative, I should like to give a 
clear and a detailed account of my first— and last— meeting 
with the tigress. 

The meeting took place in the early afternoon of the 11th of 
April 1930, nineteen days after my arrival at Kala Agar. 

I had gone out that day at 2 p.m. with the intention of tying up 
my three buffaloes at selected places along the forest road, 
when at a point a mile from the bungalow, where the road 
crosses a ridge and goes from the north to the west face of the 
Kala Agar range, I came on a large party of men who had been 
out collecting firewood. In the party was an old man who, 
pointing down the hill to a thicket of young oak trees some five 
hundred yards from where we were standing, said it was in 
that thicket where the man-eater, a month previously, had 
killed his only son, a lad eighteen years of age. I had not heard 
the father's version of the killing of his son, so, while we sat on 
the edge of the road smoking, he told his story, pointing out the 
spot where the lad had been killed, and where all that was left 
of him had been found the following day. The old man blamed 
the twenty-five men who had been out collecting firewood on 
that day for the death of his son, saying, very bitterly, that they 
had run away and left him to be killed by the tiger. Some of the 
men sitting near me had been in that party of twenty-five and 
they hotly repudiated responsibility for the lad's death, 
accusing him of having been responsible for the stampede by 
screaming out that he had heard the tiger growling and telling 
everyone to run for their lives. This did not satisfy the old man. 
He shook his head and said, 'You are grown men and he was 
only a boy, and you ran away and left him to be killed.' I was 
sorry for having asked the questions that had led to this heated 
discussion, and more to placate the old man than for any good 


it would do, I said I would tie up one of my buffaloes near the 
spot where he said his son had been killed. So, handing two of 
the buffaloes over to the party to take back to the bungalow, I 
set off followed by two of my men leading the remaining 
buffalo. 

A footpath, taking off close to where we had been sitting, went 
down the hill to the valley below and zigzagged up the opposite 
pine-clad slope to join the forest road two miles further on. The 
path passed close to an open patch of ground which bordered 
the oak thicket in which the lad had been killed. On this patch 
of ground, which was about thirty yards square, there was a 
solitary pine sapling. This I cut down. I tied the buffalo to the 
stump, set one man to cutting a supply of grass for it, and sent 
the other man, Madho Singh, who served in the Garhwalis 
during the Great War and is now serving in the United 
Provinces Civil Pioneer Force, up an oak tree with instructions 
to strike a dry branch with the head of his axe and call at the 
top of his voice as hill people do when cutting leaves for their 
cattle. I then took up a position on a rock, about four feet high, 
on the lower edge of the open ground. Beyond the rock the hill 
fell steeply away to the valley below and was densely clothed 
with tree and scrub jungle. 

The man on the ground had made several trips with the grass 
he had cut, and Madho Singh on the tree was alternately 
shouting and singing lustily, while I stood on the rock smoking, 
with the rifle in the hollow of my left arm, when, all at once, I 
became aware that the man-eater had arrived. Beckoning 
urgently to the man on the ground to come to me, I whistled to 
attract Madho Singh's attention and signalled to him to remain 
quiet. The ground on three sides was comparatively open. 
Madho Singh on the tree was to my left front, the man cutting 
grass had been in front of me, while the buffalo— now showing 
signs of uneasiness— was to my right front. In this area the 
tigress could not have approached without my seeing her; and 
as she had approached, there was only one place where she 
could now be, and that was behind and immediately below me. 



When taking up my position I had noticed that the further side 
of the rock was steep and smooth, that it extended down the 
hill for eight or ten feet, and that the lower portion of it was 
masked by thick undergrowth and young pine saplings. It 
would have been a little difficult, but quite possible, for the 
tigress to have climbed the rock, and I relied for my safety on 
hearing her in the undergrowth should she make the attempt. 

I have no doubt that the tigress, attracted, as I had intended 
she should be, by the noise Madho Singh was making, had 
come to the rock, and that it was while she was looking up at 
me and planning her next move that I had become aware of her 
presence. My change of front, coupled with the silence of the 
men, may have made her suspicious; anyway, after a lapse of a 
few minutes, I heard a dry twig snap a little way down the hill; 
thereafter the feeling of unease left me, and the tension 
relaxed. An opportunity lost; but there was still a very good 
chance of my getting a shot, for she would undoubtedly return 
before long, and when she found us gone would probably 
content herself with killing the buffalo. There were still four or 
five hours of daylight, and by crossing the valley and going up 
the opposite slope I should be able to overlook the whole of the 
hillside on which the buffalo was tethered. The shot, if I did get 
one, would be a long one of from two to three hundred yards, 
but the *275 rifle I was carrying was accurate, and even if I 
only wounded the tigress I should have a blood trail to follow, 
which would be better than feeling about for her in hundreds of 
square miles of jungle, as I had been doing these many months. 

The men were a difficulty. To have sent them back to the 
bungalow alone would have been nothing short of murder, so of 
necessity I kept them with me. 

Tying the buffalo to the stump in such a manner as to make it 
impossible for the tigress to cany it away, I left the open ground 
and rejoined the path to carry out the plan I have outlined, of 
trying to get a shot from the opposite hill. 

About a hundred yards along the path I came to a ravine. On 



the far side of this the path entered very heavy undergrowth, 
and as it was inadvisable to go into thick cover with two men 
following me, I decided to take to the ravine, follow it down to 
its junction with the valley, work up the valley and pick up the 
path on the far side of the undergrowth. 

The ravine was about ten yards wide and four or five feet deep, 
and as I stepped down into it a nightjar fluttered off a rock on 
which I had put my hand. On looking at the spot from which the 
bird had risen, I saw two eggs. These eggs, straw-coloured, 
with rich brown markings, were of a most unusual shape, one 
being long and very pointed, while the other was as round as a 
marble; and as my collection lacked nightjar eggs I decided to 
add this odd clutch to it. I had no receptacle of any kind in 
which to carry the eggs, so cupping my left hand I placed the 
eggs in it and packed them round with a little moss. 

As I went down the ravine the banks became higher, and sixty 
yards from where I had entered it I came on a deep drop of 
some twelve to fourteen feet. The water that rushes down all 
these hill ravines in the rains had worn the rock as smooth as 
glass, and as it was too steep to offer a foothold I handed the 
rifle to the men and, sitting on the edge, proceeded to slide 
down. My feet had hardly touched the sandy bottom when the 
two men, with a flying leap, landed one on either side of me, 
and thrusting the rifle into my hand asked in a very agitated 
manner if I had heard the tiger. As a matter of fact I had heard 
nothing, possibly due to the scraping of my clothes on the 
rocks, and when questioned, the men said that what they had 
heard was a deep-throated growl from somewhere close at 
hand, but exactly from which direction the sound had come, 
they were unable to say. Tigers do not betray their presence by 
growling when looking for their dinner and the only, and very 
unsatisfactory, explanation I can offer is that the tigress 
followed us after we left the open ground, and on seeing that 
we were going down the ravine had gone ahead and taken up a 
position where the ravine narrowed to half its width; and that 
when she was on the point of springing out on me, I had 



disappeared out of sight down the slide and she had 
involuntarily given vent to her disappointment with a low 
growl. Not a satisfactory reason, unless one assumes— without 
any reason— that she had selected me for her dinner, and 
therefore had no interest in the two men. 

Where the three of us now stood in a bunch we had the smooth 
steep rock behind us, to our right a wall of rock slightly leaning 
over the ravine and fifteen feet high, and to our left a tumbled 
bank of big rocks thirty or forty feet high. The sandy bed of the 
ravine, on which we were standing, was roughly forty feet long 
and ten feet wide. At the lower end of this sandy bed a great 
pine tree had fallen across, damming the ravine, and the 
collection of the sand was due to this dam. The wall of 
overhanging rock came to an end twelve or fifteen feet from 
the fallen tree, and as I approached the end of the rock, my feet 
making no sound on the sand, I very fortunately noticed that 
the sandy bed continued round to the back of the rock. 

This rock about which I have said so much I can best describe 
as a giant school slate, two feet thick at its lower end, and 
standing up— not quite perpendicularly— on one of its long 
sides. 

As I stepped clear of the giant slate, I looked behind me over 
my right shoulder and— looked straight into the tigress's face. 

I would like you to have a clear picture of the situation. 

The sandy bed behind the rock was quite flat. To the right of it 
was the smooth slate fifteen feet high and leaning slightly 
outwards, to the left of it was a scoured-out steep bank also 
some fifteen feet high overhung by a dense tangle of thorn 
bushes, while at the far end was a slide similar to, but a little 
higher than, the one I had glissaded down. The sandy bed, 
enclosed by these three natural walls, was about twenty feet 
long and half as wide, and lying on it, with her fore-paws 
stretched out and her hind legs well tucked under her, was the 
tigress. Her head, which was raised a few inches off her paws. 



was eight feet (measured later) from me, and on her face was a 
smile, similar to that one sees on the face of a dog welcoming 
his master home after a long absence. 

Two thoughts flashed through my mind, one, that it was up to 
me to make the first move, and the other, that the move would 
have to be made in such a manner as not to alarm the tigress 
or make her nervous. 

The rifle was in my right hand held diagonally across my chest, 
with the safety-catch off, and in order to get it to bear on the 
tigress the muzzle would have to be swung round three- 
quarters of a circle. 

The movement of swinging round the rifle, with one hand, was 
begun very slowly, and hardly perceptibly, and when a quarter 
of a circle had been made, the stock came in contact with my 
right side. It was now necessary to extend my arm, and as the 
stock cleared my side, the swing was very slowly continued. My 
arm was now at full stretch and the weight of the rifle was 
beginning to tell. Only a little further now for the muzzle to go, 
and the tigress— who had not once taken her eyes off mine— 
was still looking up at me, with the pleased expression still on 
her face. 

How long it took the rifle to make the three-quarter circle, I am 
not in a position to say. To me, looking into the tigress's eyes 
and unable therefore to follow the movement of the barrel, it 
appeared that my arm was paralysed, and that the swing would 
never be completed. However, the movement was completed at 
last, and as soon as the rifle was pointing at the tigress's body, 

I pressed the trigger. 

I heard the report, exaggerated in that restricted space, and 
felt the jar of the recoil, and but for these tangible proofs that 
the rifle had gone off, I might, for all the immediate result the 
shot produced, have been in the grip of one of those awful 
nightmares in which triggers are vainly pulled of rifles that 
refuse to be discharged at the critical moment. 



For a perceptible fraction of time the tigress remained 
perfectly still, and then, very slowly, her head sank on to her 
outstretched paws, while at the same time a jet of blood issued 
from the bullet-hole. The bullet had injured her spine and 
shattered the upper portion of her heart. 

The two men who were following a few yards behind me, and 
who were separated from the tigress by the thickness of the 
rock, came to a halt when they saw me stop and turn my head. 
They knew instinctively that I had seen the tigress and judged 
from my behaviour that she was close at hand, and Madho 
Singh said afterwards that he wanted to call out and tell me to 
drop the eggs and get both hands on the rifle. When I had fired 
my shot and lowered the point of the rifle on to my toes, Madho 
Singh, at a sign, came forward to relieve me of it, for very 
suddenly my legs appeared to be unable to support me, so I 
made for the fallen tree and sat down. Even before looking at 
the pads of her feet I knew it was the Chowgarh tigress I had 
sent to the Happy Hunting Grounds, and that the shears that 
had assisted her to cut the threads of sixty-four human lives— 
the people of the district put the number at twice that figure- 
had, while the game was in her hands, turned, and cut the 
thread of her own life. 

Three things, each of which would appear to you to have been 
to my disadvantage, were actually in my favour. These were (a) 
the eggs in my left hand, (b) the light rifle I was carrying, and 
(c) the tiger being a man-eater. If I had not had the eggs in my 
hand I should have had both hands on the rifle, and when I 
looked back and saw the tiger at such close quarters I should 
instinctively have tried to swing round to face her, and the 
spring that was arrested by my lack of movement would 
inevitably have been launched. Again, if the rifle had not been a 
light one it would not have been possible for me to have moved 
it in the way it was imperative I should move it, and then 
discharge it at the full extent of my arm. And lastly, if the tiger 
had been just an ordinary tiger, and not a man-eater, it would, 
on finding itself cornered, have made for the opening and 



wiped me out of the way; and to be wiped out of the way by a 
tiger usually has fatal results. 

While the men made a detour and went up the hill to free the 
buffalo and secure the rope, which was needed for another and 
more pleasant purpose, I climbed over the rocks and went up 
the ravine to restore the eggs to their rightful owner. I plead 
guilty of being as superstitious as my brother sportsmen. For 
three long periods, extending over a whole year, I had tried— 
and tried hard— to get a shot at the tigress, and had failed; and 
now within a few minutes of having picked up the eggs my luck 
had changed. 


The eggs, which all this time had remained safely in the hollow 
of my left hand, were still warm when I replaced them in the 
little depression in the rock that did duty as a nest, and when I 
again passed that way half an hour later, they had vanished 
under the brooding mother whose colouring so exactly matched 
the mottled rock that it was difficult for me, who knew the 
exact spot where the nest was situated, to distinguish her from 
her surroundings. 

The buffalo, who after months of care was now so tame that it 
followed like a dog, came scrambling down the hill in the wake 
of the men, nosed the tigress and lay down on the sand to chew 
the cud of contentment, while we lashed the tigress to the stout 
pole the men had cut. 

I had tried to get Madho Singh to return to the bungalow for 
help, but this he would not hear of doing. With no one would he 
and his companion share the honour of carrying in the man- 
eater, and if I would lend a hand the task, he said, with 
frequent halts for rest, would not be too difficult. We were 
three hefty men— two accustomed from childhood to carrying 
heavy loads— and all three hardened by a life of exposure; but 
even so, the task we set ourselves was a herculean one. 

The path down which we had come was too narrow and too 



winding for the long pole to which the tigress was lashed, so, 
with frequent halts to regain breath and readjust pads to 
prevent the pole biting too deep into shoulder muscles, we 
went straight up the hill through a tangle of raspberry and 
briar bushes, on the thorns of which we left a portion of our 
clothing and an amount of skin which made bathing for many 
days a painful operation. 

The sun was still shining on the surrounding hills when three 
dishevelled and very happy men, followed by a buffalo, carried 
the tigress to the Kala Agar Forest Bungalow, and from that 
evening to this day no human being has been killed— or 
wounded— over the hundreds of square miles of mountain and 
vale over which the Chowgarh tigress, for a period of five 
years, held sway 

I have added one more cross and date to the map of Eastern 
Kumaon that hangs on the wall before me— the cross and the 
date the man-eater earned. The cross is two miles west of Kala 
Agar, and the date under it is 11 April 1930. 

The tigress's claws were broken, and bushed out, and one of 
her canine teeth was broken, and her front teeth were worn 
down to the bone. It was these defects that had made her a 
man-eater and were the cause of her not being able to kill 
outright— and by her own efforts— a large proportion of the 
human beings she had attacked since the day she had been 
deprived of the assistance of the cub I had, on my first visit, 
shot by mistake. 



The Bachelor of Powalgarh 

I 

THREE miles from our winter home, and in the heart of the 
forest, there is an open glade some four hundred yards long 
and half as wide, grassed with emerald-green and surrounded 
with big trees interlaced with cane creepers. It was in this 
glade, which for beauty has no equal, that I first saw the tiger 
who was known throughout the United Provinces as 'The 
Bachelor of Powalgarh 1 , who from 1920 to 1930 was the most 
sought-after big-game trophy in the province. 

The sun had just risen one winter's morning when I crested the 
high ground overlooking the glade. On the far side, a score of 
red jungle fowl were scratching among the dead leaves 
bordering a crystal-clear stream, and scattered over the 
emerald-green grass, now sparkling with dew, fifty or more 
chital were feeding. Sitting on a tree stump and smoking, I had 
been looking at this scene for some time when the hind nearest 
to me raised her head, turned in my direction and called; and a 
moment later the Bachelor stepped into the open, from the 
thick bushes below me. For a long minute he stood with head 
held high surveying the scene, and then with slow unhurried 
steps started to cross the glade. In his rich winter coat, which 
the newly risen sun was lighting up, he was a magnificent sight 
as, with head turning now to the right and now to the left, he 
walked down the wide lane the deer had made for him. At the 
stream he lay down and quenched his thirst, then sprang 
across and, as he entered the dense tree jungle beyond, called 
three times in acknowledgement of the homage the jungle folk 
had paid him, for from the time he had entered the glade every 
chital had called, every jungle fowl had cackled, and every one 
of a troupe of monkeys on the trees had chattered. 

The Bachelor was far afield that morning, for his home was in a 
ravine six miles away. Living in an area in which the majority of 
tigers are bagged with the aid of elephants, he had chosen his 
home wisely. The ravine, running into the foot-hills, was half a 



mile long, with steep hills on either side rising to a height of a 
thousand feet. At the upper end of the ravine there was a 
waterfall some twenty feet high, and at the lower end, where 
the water had cut through red clay, it narrowed to four feet. 

Any sportsman, therefore, who wished to try conclusions with 
the Bachelor, while he was at home, would of a necessity have 
to do so on foot. It was this secure retreat, and the Government 
rules prohibiting night shooting, that had enabled the Bachelor 
to retain possession of his much sought-after skin. 

In spite of the many and repeated attempts that had been made 
to bag him with the aid of buffalo bait, the Bachelor had never 
been fired at, though on two occasions, to my knowledge, he 
had only escaped death by the skin of his teeth. On the first 
occasion, after a perfect beat, a guy rope by which the machan 
was suspended interfered with the movement of Fred 
Anderson's rifle at the critical moment, and on the second 
occasion the Bachelor arrived at the machan before the beat 
started and found Huish Edye filling his pipe. On both these 
occasions he had been viewed at a range of only a few feet, and 
while Anderson described him as being as big as a Shetland 
pony, Edye said he was as big as a donkey. 

The winter following these and other unsuccessful attempts, I 
took Wyndham, our Commissioner, who knows more about 
tigers than any other man in India, to a fire track skirting the 
upper end of the ravine in which the Bachelor lived, to show 
him the fresh pug marks of the tiger which I had found on the 
fire track that morning. Wyndham was accompanied by two of 
his most experienced shikaris, and after the three of them had 
carefully measured and examined the pug marks, Wyndham 
said that in his opinion the tiger was ten feet between pegs, 
and while one shikari said he was 10' 5" over curves, the other 
said he was 10' 6" or a little more. All three agreed that they 
had never seen the pug marks of a bigger tiger. 

In 1930 the Forest Department started extensive fellings in the 
area surrounding the Bachelor's home and annoyed at the 



disturbance he changed his quarters; this I learnt from two 
sportsmen who had taken out a shooting pass with the object of 
hunting down the tiger. Shooting passes are only issued for 
fifteen days of each month, and throughout that winter, 
shooting party after shooting party failed to make contact with 
the tiger. 

Towards the end of the winter an old dak runner, who passes 
our gate every morning and evening on his seven-mile run 
through the forest to a hill village, came to me one evening and 
reported that on his way out that morning he had seen the 
biggest pug marks of a tiger that he had seen during the thirty 
years of his service. The tiger, he said, had come from the west 
and after proceeding along the road for two hundred yards had 
gone east, taking a path that started from near an almond tree. 
This tree was about two miles from our home, and was a well- 
known landmark. The path the tiger had taken runs through 
very heavy jungle for half a mile before crossing a wide 
watercourse, and then joins a cattle track which skirts the foot 
of the hills before entering a deep and well-wooded valley; a 
favourite haunt of tigers. 

Early next morning, with Robin at my heels, I set out to 
prospect, my objective being the point where the cattle track 
entered the valley, for at this point the tracks of all the animals 
entering or leaving the valley are to be found. From the time 
we started Robin appeared to know that we had a special job in 
hand and he paid not the least attention to the jungle fowl we 
disturbed, the kakar (barking deer) that let us get quite close 
to it, and the two sambur that stood and belled at us. Where 
the cattle track entered the valley the ground was hard and 
stony, and when we reached this spot Robin put down his head 
and very carefully smelt the stones, and on receiving a signal 
from me to carry on he turned and started down the track, 
keeping a yard ahead of me; I could tell from his behaviour that 
he was on the scent of a tiger, and that the scent was hot. A 
hundred yards further down, where the track flattens out and 
runs along the foot of the hill, the ground is soft; here I saw the 



pug marks of a tiger, and a glance at them satisfied me we 
were on the heels of the Bachelor and that he was only a 
minute or two ahead of us. 

Beyond the soft ground the track runs for three hundred yards 
over stones, before going steeply down onto an open plain. If 
the tiger kept to the track we should probably see him on this 
open ground. We had gone another fifty yards when Robin 
stopped and, after running his nose up and down a blade of 
grass on the left of the track, turned and entered the grass 
which was here about two feet high. On the far side of the 
grass there was a patch of clerodendron, about forty yards 
wide. This plant grows in dense patches to a height of five feet, 
and has widely spread leaves and a big head of flowers not 
unlike horse-chestnut. It is greatly fancied by tiger, sambur and 
pig because of the shade it gives. When Robin reached the 
clerodendron he stopped and backed towards me, thus telling 
me that he could not see into the bushes ahead and wished to 
be carried. Lifting him up, I put his hind legs into my left-hand 
pocket, and when he had hooked his forefeet over my left arm, 
he was safe and secure, and I had both hands free for the rifle. 
On these occasions Robin was always in deadly earnest, and no 
matter what he saw, or how our quarry behaved before or after 
fired at, he never moved and spoilt my shot, or impeded my 
view. Proceeding very slowly, we had gone half-way through the 
clerodendron when I saw the bushes directly in front of us 
swaying. Waiting until the tiger had cleared the bushes, I went 
forward expecting to see him in the more or less open jungle, 
but he was nowhere in sight, and when I put Robin down he 
turned to the left and indicated that the tiger had gone into a 
deep and narrow ravine nearby. This ravine ran to the foot of 
an isolated hill on which there were caves frequented by tigers, 
and as I was not armed to deal with a tiger at close quarters, 
and further, as it was time for breakfast, Robin and I turned 
and made for home. 

After breakfast I returned alone, armed with a heavy *450 rifle, 
and as I approached the hill, which in the days of the long ago 



had been used by the local inhabitants as a rallying point 
against the Gurkha invaders, I heard the boom of a big buffalo 
bell, and a man shouting. These sounds were coming from the 
top of the hill, which is flat, and about half an acre in extent, so 
I climbed up and saw a man on a tree, striking a dead branch 
with the head of his axe and shouting, while at the foot of the 
tree a number of buffaloes were collected. When he saw me the 
man called out, saying I had just arrived in time to save him 
and his buffaloes from a shaitan of a tiger, the size of a camel, 
that had been threatening them for hours. From his story I 
gathered that he had arrived on the hill shortly after Robin and 
I had left for home, and that as he started to cut bamboo leaves 
for his buffaloes he saw a tiger coming towards him. He 
shouted to drive the tiger away, as he had done on many 
previous occasions with other tigers, but instead of going away 
this one had started to growl. He took to his heels, followed by 
his buffaloes, and climbed up the nearest tree. The tiger, 
paying no heed to his shouts, had then set to pacing round and 
round, while the buffaloes kept their heads towards it. Probably 
the tiger had heard me coming, for it had left only a moment 
before I had arrived. The man was an old friend, who before his 
quarrel with the Headman of his village had done a 
considerable amount of poaching in these jungles with the 
Headman's gun. He now begged me to conduct both himself 
and his cattle safely out of the jungle; so telling him to lead on, 

I followed behind to see that there were no stragglers. At first 
the buffaloes were disinclined to break up their close 
formation, but after a little persuasion we got them to start, 
and we had gone half-way across the open plain I have alluded 
to when the tiger called in the jungle to our right. The man 
quickened his pace, and I urged on the buffaloes, for a mile of 
very thick jungle lay between us and the wide, open 
watercourse beyond which lay my friend's village and safety for 
his buffaloes. 

I have earned the reputation of being keener on photographing 
animals than on killing them, and before I left my friend he 



begged me to put aside photography for this once, and kill the 
tiger, which he said was big enough to eat a buffalo a day, and 
ruin him in twenty-five days. I promised to do my best and 
turned to retrace my steps to the open plain, to meet with an 
experience every detail of which has burnt itself deep into my 
memory. 

On reaching the plain I sat down to wait for the tiger to 
disclose his whereabouts, or for the jungle folk to tell me where 
he was. It was then about 3 p.m., and as the sun was warm and 
comforting, I put my head down on my drawn-up knees and had 
been dozing a few minutes when I was awakened by the tiger 
calling; thereafter he continued to call at short intervals. 

Between the plain and the hills there is a belt, some half-mile 
wide, of the densest scrub jungle for a hundred miles round, 
and I located the tiger as being on the hills on the far side of 
the scrub— about three-quarters of a mile from me— and from 
the way he was calling it was evident he was in search of a 
mate. 

Starting from the upper left-hand corner of the plain, and close 
to where I was sitting, an old cart track, used some years 
previously for extracting timber, ran in an almost direct line to 
where the tiger was calling. This track would take me in the 
direction of the calling animal, but on the hills was high grass, 
and without Robin to help me there would be little chance of 
my seeing him. So instead of my going to look for the tiger, I 
decided he should come and look for me. I was too far away for 
him to hear me, so I sprinted up the cart track for a few 
hundred yards, laid down my rifle, climbed to the top of a high 
tree and called three times. I was immediately answered by the 
tiger. After climbing down, I ran back, calling as I went, and 
arrived on the plain without having found a suitable place in 
which to sit and await the tiger. Something would have to be 
done and done in a hurry, for the tiger was rapidly coming 
nearer, so, after rejecting a little hollow which I found to be full 
of black stinking water, I lay down flat in the open, twenty 



yards from where the track entered the scrub. From this point I 
had a clear view up the track for fifty yards, to where a bush, 
leaning over it, impeded my further view. If the tiger came 
down the track, as I expected him to, I decided to fire at him as 
soon as he cleared the obstruction. 

After opening the rifle to make quite sure it was loaded, I threw 
off the safety-catch, and with elbows comfortably resting on the 
soft ground waited for the tiger to appear. I had not called 
since I came out on the plain, so to give him direction I now 
gave a low call, which he immediately answered from a 
distance of a hundred yards. If he came on at his usual pace, I 
judged he would clear the obstruction in thirty seconds. I 
counted this number very slowly, and went on counting up to 
eighty, when out of the corner of my eye I saw a movement to 
my right front, where the bushes approached to within ten 
yards of me. Turning my eyes in that direction I saw a great 
head projecting above the bushes, which here were four feet 
high. The tiger was only a foot or two inside the bushes, but all 
I could see of him was his head. As I very slowly swung the 
point of the rifle round and ran my eyes along the sights I 
noticed that his head was not quite square on to me, and as I 
was firing up and he was looking down, I aimed an inch below 
his right eye, pressed the trigger, and for the next half-hour 
nearly died of fright. 

Instead of dropping dead as I expected him to, the tiger went 
straight up into the air above the bushes for his full length, 
falling backwards onto a tree a foot thick which had been 
blown down in a storm and was still green. With unbelievable 
fury he attacked this tree and tore it to bits, emitting as he did 
so roar upon roar, and what was even worse, a dreadful 
bloodcurdling sound as though he was savaging his worst 
enemy. The branches of the tree tossed about as though struck 
by a tornado, while the bushes on my side shook and bulged 
out, and every moment I expected to have him on top of me, for 
he had been looking at me when I fired, and knew where I was. 



Too frightened even to recharge the rifle for fear the slight 
movement and sound should attract the attention of the tiger, I 
lay and sweated for half an hour with my finger on the left 
trigger. At last the branches of the tree and the bushes ceased 
waving about, and the roaring became less frequent, and 
eventually, to my great relief, ceased. For another half-hour I 
lay perfectly still, with arms cramped by the weight of the 
heavy rifle, and then started to pull myself backwards with my 
toes. After progressing for thirty yards in this manner I got to 
my feet, and, crouching low, made for the welcome shelter of 
the nearest tree. Here I remained for some minutes, and as all 
was now silent I turned and made for home. 

II 

Next morning I returned accompanied by one of my men, an 
expert tree-climber. I had noticed the previous evening that 
there was a tree growing on the edge of the open ground, and 
about forty yards from where the tiger had fallen. We 
approached this tree very cautiously, and I stood behind it 
while the man climbed to the top. After a long and a careful 
scrutiny he looked down and shook his head, and when he 
rejoined me on the ground he told me that the bushes over a 
big area had been flattened down, but that the tiger was not in 
sight. 

I sent him back to his perch on the tree with instructions to 
keep a sharp lookout and warn me if he saw any movement in 
the bushes, and went forward to have a look at the spot where 
the tiger had raged. He had raged to some purpose, for, in 
addition to tearing branches and great strips of wood off the 
tree, he had torn up several bushes by the roots, and bitten 
down others. Blood in profusion was sprinkled everywhere, and 
on the ground were two congealed pools, near one of which 
was lying a bit of bone two inches square, which I found on 
examination to be part of the tiger's skull. 

No blood trail led away from this spot and this, combined with 
the two pools of blood, was proof that the tiger was still here 


when I left and that the precautions I had taken the previous 
evening had been very necessary for when I started on my 'get¬ 
away' I was only ten yards from the most dangerous animal in 
the world— a freshly wounded tiger. On circling round the spot 
I found a small smear of blood here and there on leaves that 
had brushed against his face. Noting that these indications of 
the tiger's passage led in a direct line to a giant semul tree 
(Bombax malabaricum, the silk cotton tree.) two hundred yards 
away I went back and climbed the tree my man was on in order 
to get a bird's-eye view of the ground I should have to go over, 
for I had a very uneasy feeling that I should find him alive: a 
tiger shot in the head can live for days and can even recover 
from the wound. True, this tiger had a bit of his skull missing, 
and as I had never dealt with an animal in his condition before 
I did not know whether he was likely to live for a few hours or 
days, or live on to die of old age. For this reason I decided to 
treat him as an ordinary wounded tiger, and not to take any 
avoidable risks when following him up. 

From my elevated position on the tree I saw that, a little to the 
left of the line to the semul tree, there were two trees, the 
nearer one thirty yards from where the blood was, and the 
other fifty yards further on. Leaving my man on the tree, I 
climbed down, picked up my rifle and a shot-gun and bag of a 
hundred cartridges, and very cautiously approached the nearer 
tree and climbed up it to a height of thirty feet, pulling the rifle 
and gun, which I had tied to one end of a strong cord, up after 
me. After fixing the rifle in a fork of the tree where it would be 
handy if needed, I started to spray the bushes with small shot, 
yard by yard up to the foot of the second tree. I did this with 
the object of locating the tiger, assuming he was alive and in 
that area, for a wounded tiger, on hearing a shot fired close to 
him, or on being struck by a pellet, will either growl or charge. 
Receiving no indication of the tiger's presence I went to the 
second tree, and sprayed the bushes to within a few yards of 
the semul tree, firing the last shot at the tree itself. After this 
last shot I thought I heard a low growl, but it was not repeated 



and I put it down to my imagination. My bag of cartridges was 
now empty so after recovering my man I called it a day and 
went home. 

When I returned next morning I found my friend the buffalo 
man feeding his buffaloes on the plain. He appeared to be very 
much relieved to see me, and the reason for this I learnt later. 
The grass was still wet with dew, but we found a dry spot and 
there sat down to have a smoke and relate our experiences. My 
friend, as I have already told you, had done a lot of poaching, 
and having spent all his life in tiger-infested jungles tending his 
buffaloes, or shooting, his jungle knowledge was considerable. 

After I had left him that day at the wide, open water-course, he 
had crossed to the far side and had sat down to listen for 
sounds coming from the direction in which I had gone. He had 
heard two tigers calling; he had heard my shot followed by the 
continuous roaring of a tiger, and very naturally concluded I 
had wounded one of the tigers and that it had killed me. On his 
return next morning to the same spot, he had been greatly 
mystified by hearing a hundred shots fired, and this morning, 
not being able to contain his curiosity any longer, he had come 
to see what had happened. Attracted by the smell of blood, his 
buffaloes had shown him where the tiger had fallen, and he had 
seen the patches of dry blood and had found the bit of bone. No 
animal in his opinion could possibly live for more than a few 
hours after having a bit of its skull blown away, and so sure was 
he that the tiger was dead that he offered to take his buffaloes 
into the jungle and find it for me. I had heard of this method of 
recovering tigers with the help of buffaloes but had never tried 
it myself, and after my friend had agreed to accepting 
compensation for any damage to his cattle I accepted his offer. 

Rounding up the buffaloes, twenty-five in number, and keeping 
to the line I had sprinkled with shot the previous day, we made 
for the semul tree, followed by the buffaloes. Our progress was 
slow, for not only had we to move the chin-high bushes with our 
hands to see where to put our feet, but we also had frequently 



to check a very natural tendency on the part of the buffaloes to 
stray As we approached the semul tree, where the bushes were 
lighter, I saw a little hollow filled with dead leaves that had 
been pressed flat and on which were several patches of blood, 
some dry, others in process of congealing, and one quite fresh; 
and when I put my hand to the ground I found it was warm. 
Incredible as it may appear, the tiger had lain in this hollow the 
previous day while I had expended a hundred cartridges, and 
had only moved off when he saw us and the buffaloes 
approaching. The buffaloes had now found the blood and were 
pawing up the ground and snorting, and as the prospect of 
being caught between a charging tiger and angry buffaloes did 
not appeal to me, I took hold of my friend's arm, turned him 
round and made for the open plain, followed by the buffaloes. 
When we were back on safe ground I told the man to go home, 
and said I would return next day and deal with the tiger alone. 

The path through the jungles that I had taken each day when 
coming from and going home ran for some distance over soft 
ground, and on this soft ground, on this fourth day, I saw the 
pug marks of a big male tiger. By following these pug marks I 
found the tiger had entered the dense brushwood a hundred 
yards to the right of the semul tree. Here was an unexpected 
complication, for if I now saw a tiger in this jungle I should not 
know— unless I got a very close look at it— whether it was the 
wounded or the unwounded one. However, this contingency 
would have to be dealt with when met, and in the meantime 
worrying would not help, so I entered the bushes and made for 
the hollow at the foot of the semul tree. 

There was no blood trail to follow so I zigzagged through the 
bushes, into which it was impossible to see further than a few 
inches, for an hour or more, until I came to a ten-foot-wide dry 
watercourse. Before stepping down into this watercourse I 
looked up it, and saw the left hind leg and tail of a tiger. The 
tiger was standing perfectly still with its body and head hidden 
by a tree, and only this one leg visible. I raised the rifle to my 
shoulder, and then lowered it. To have broken the leg would 



have been easy; for the tiger was only ten yards away and it 
would have been the right thing to do if its owner was the 
wounded animal; but there were two tigers in this area, and to 
have broken the leg of the wrong one would have doubled my 
difficulties, which were already considerable. Presently the leg 
was withdrawn and I heard the tiger moving away, and going to 
the spot where he had been standing I found a few drops of 
blood— too late now to regret not having broken that leg. 

A quarter of a mile further on there was a little stream, and it 
was possible that the tiger, now recovering from his wound, 
was making for this stream. With the object of intercepting him 
or failing that, waiting for him at the water, I took a game path 
which I knew went to the stream and had proceeded along it 
for some distance when a sambur belled to my left, and went 
dashing off through the jungle. It was evident now that I was 
abreast of the tiger, and I had only taken a few more steps 
when I heard the loud crack of a dry stick breaking as though 
some heavy animal had fallen on it; the sound had come from a 
distance of fifty yards and from the exact spot where the 
sambur had belled. The sambur had in unmistakable tones 
warned the jungle folk of the presence of a tiger, and the stick 
therefore could only have been broken by the same animal; so 
getting down on my hands and knees I started to crawl in the 
direction from which the sound had come. 

The bushes here were from six to eight feet high, with dense 
foliage on the upper branches and very few leaves on the 
stems, so that I could see through them for a distance of ten to 
fifteen feet. I had covered thirty yards, hoping fervently that if 
the tiger charged he would come from in front (for in no other 
direction could I have fired), when I caught sight of something 
red on which the sun, drifting through the upper leaves, was 
shining; it might only be a bunch of dead leaves; on the other 
hand, it might be the tiger. I could get a better view of this 
object from two yards to the right so, lowering my head until 
my chin touched the ground, I crawled this distance with belly 
to ground, and on raising my head saw the tiger in front of me. 



He was crouching down looking at me, with the sun shining on 
his left shoulder, and on receiving my two bullets he rolled over 
on his side without making a sound. 

As I stood over him and ran my eyes over his magnificent 
proportions it was not necessary to examine the pads of his feet 
to know that before me lay the Bachelor of Powalgarh. 

The entry of the bullet fired four days previously was hidden by 
a wrinkle of skin, and at the back of his head was a big hole 
which, surprisingly, was perfectly clean and healthy 

The report of my rifle was, I knew, being listened for, so I 
hurried home to relieve anxiety, and while I related the last 
chapter of the hunt and drank a pot of tea my men were 
collecting. 

Accompanied by my sister and Robin and a carrying party of 
twenty men, I returned to where the tiger was lying, and before 
he was roped to a pole my sister and I measured him from nose 
to tip of tail, and from tip of tail to nose. At home we again 
measured him to make quite sure we had made no mistake the 
first time. These measurements are valueless, for there were 
no independent witnesses present to certify them; they are 
however interesting as showing the accuracy with which 
experienced woodsmen can judge the length of a tiger from his 
pug marks. Wyndham, you will remember, said the tiger was 
ten feet between pegs, which would give roughly 10' 6" over 
curves; and while one shikari said he was 10' 5" over curves, 
the other said he was 10' 6" or a little more. Shot seven years 
after these estimates were made, my sister and I measured the 
tiger as being 10' 7" over curves. 

I have told the story at some length, as I feel sure that those 
who hunted the tiger between 1920 and 1930 will be interested 
to know how the Bachelor of Powalgarh met his end. 



he Mohan Man-Eater 


I 

EIGHTEEN miles from our summer home in the Himalayas 
there is a long ridge running east and west, some 9,000 feet in 
height. On the upper slopes of the eastern end of this ridge 
there is a luxuriant growth of oat grass; below this grass the 
hill falls steeply away in a series of rock cliffs to the Kosi river 
below. 

One day a party of women and girls from the village on the 
north face of the ridge were cutting the oat grass, when a tiger 
suddenly appeared in their midst. In the stampede that 
followed an elderly woman lost her footing, rolled down the 
steep slope, and disappeared over the cliff. The tiger, evidently 
alarmed by the screams of the women, vanished as 
mysteriously as it had appeared, and when the women had 
reassembled and recovered from their fright, they went down 
the grassy slope and, looking over the cliff, saw their 
companion lying on a narrow ledge some distance below them. 

The woman said she was badly injured— it was found later that 
she had broken a leg and fractured several ribs— and that she 
could not move. Ways and means of a rescue were discussed, 
and it was finally decided that it was a job for men; and as no 
one appeared to be willing to remain at the spot, they informed 
the injured woman that they were going back to the village for 
help. The woman begged not to be left alone, however, and at 
her entreaty a girl, sixteen years of age, volunteered to stay 
with her. So, while the rest of the party set off for the village, 
the girl made her way down to the right, where a rift in the cliff 
enabled her to get a foothold on the ledge. 

This ledge only extended half-way across the face of the cliff 
and ended, a few yards from where the woman was lying, in a 
shallow depression. Fearing that she might fall off the ledge 
and be killed on the rocks hundreds of feet below the woman 
asked the girl to move her to this depression, and this difficult 



and dangerous feat the girl successfully accomplished. There 
was only room for one in the depression, so that the girl 
squatted, as only an Indian can squat, on the ledge facing the 
woman. 

The village was four miles away, and once, and once again, the 
two on the ledge speculated as to the length of time it would 
take their companions to get back to the village; what men they 
were likely to find in the village at that time of day; how long it 
would take to explain what had happened, and finally, how long 
it would take the rescue party to arrive. 

Conversation had been carried on in whispers for fear the tiger 
might be lurking in the vicinity and hear them and then, 
suddenly, the woman gave a gasp and the girl, seeing the look 
of horror on her face and the direction in which she was 
looking, turned her head and over her shoulder saw the tiger, 
stepping out of the rift in the cliff onto the ledge. 

Few of us, I imagine, have escaped that worst of all nightmares 
in which, while our limbs and vocal cords are paralysed with 
fear, some terrible beast in monstrous form approaches to 
destroy us; the nightmare from which, sweating fear in every 
pore, we waken with a cry of thankfulness to Heaven that it 
was only a dream. There was no such happy awakening from 
the nightmare of that unfortunate girl, and little imagination is 
needed to picture the scene. A rock cliff with a narrow ledge 
running partly across it and ending in a little depression in 
which an injured woman is lying; a young girl frozen with 
terror squatting on the ledge, and a tiger slowly creeping 
towards her; retreat in every direction cut off, and no help at 
hand. 

Mothi Singh, an old friend of mine, was in the village visiting a 
sick daughter when the women arrived, and he headed the 
rescue party. When this party went down the grassy slope and 
looked over the cliff, they saw the woman lying in a swoon, and 
on the ledge they saw splashes of blood. 



The injured woman was carried back to the village, and when 
she had been revived and had told her story, Mothi Singh set 
out on his eighteen-mile walk to me. He was an old man well 
over sixty, but he scouted the suggestion that he was tired and 
needed a rest, so we set off together to make investigations. 

But there was nothing that I could do, for twenty-four hours 
had elapsed and all that the tiger had left of the brave young 
girl, who had volunteered to stay with her injured companion, 
were a few bits of bone and her torn and blood-stained clothes. 

This was the first human being killed by the tiger which later 
received recognition in Government records as 'The Mohan 
Man-eater'. 

After killing the girl, the tiger went down the Kosi valley for the 
winter, killing on its way— among other people— two men of 
the Public Works Department, and the daughter-in-law of our 
member of the Legislative Council. As summer approached it 
returned to the scene of its first kill, and for several years 
thereafter its beat extended up and down the Kosi valley from 
Kakrighat to Gargia— a distance of roughly forty miles— until 
it finally took up its quarters on the hill above Mohan, in the 
vicinity of a village called Kartkanoula. 

At the District Conference, to which reference has been made 
in a previous story, the three man-eating tigers operating at 
that time in the Kumaon Division were classed as follows in 
their order of importance: — 

1st— Chowgarh, Naini Tal District. 

2nd— Mohan, Almora District. 

3rd— Kanda, Garhwal District. 

After the Chowgarh tiger had been accounted for I was 
reminded by Baines, Deputy Commissioner, Almora, that only a 
part of my promise made at the conference had been fulfilled, 
and that the Mohan tiger was next on the list. The tiger, he 
stated, was becoming more active and a greater menace every 



day, and had during the previous week killed three human 
beings, residents of Kartkanoula village. It was to this village 
Baines now suggested I should go. 

While I had been engaged with the Chowgarh tiger, Baines had 
persuaded some sportsmen to go to Kartkanoula, but though 
they had sat up over human and animal kills they had failed to 
make contact with the man-eater and had returned to their 
depot at Ranikhet. Baines informed me I should now have the 
ground to myself— a very necessary precaution, for nerves 
wear thin when hunting man-eaters, and accidents are apt to 
result when two or more parties are hunting the same animal. 

II 

It was on a blistering hot day in May that I, my two servants, 
and the six Garhwalis I had brought with me from Naini Tal 
alighted from the 1 p.m. train at Ramnagar and set off on our 
twenty-four-mile foot journey to Kartkanoula. Our first stage 
was only seven miles, but it was evening before we arrived at 
Gargia. I had left home in a hurry on receiving Baines' letter, 
and had not had time to ask for permission to occupy the 
Gargia Forest Bungalow, so I slept out in the open. 

On the far side of the Kosi river at Gargia there is a cliff several 
hundred feet high, and while I was trying to get sleep I heard 
what I thought were stones falling off the cliff on the rocks 
below. The sound was exactly the same as would be made by 
bringing two stones violently together. After some time this 
sound worried me, as sounds will on a hot night, and as the 
moon was up and the light good enough to avoid stepping on 
snakes, I left my camp bed and set out to make investigations. I 
found that the sound was being made by a colony of frogs in a 
marsh by the side of the road. I have heard land-, water- and 
tree-frogs making strange sounds in different parts of the 
world, but I have never heard anything so strange as the sound 
made by the frogs at Gargia in the month of May. 

After a very early start next morning we did the twelve miles to 
Mohan before the sun got hot, and while my men were cooking 


their food and my servants were preparing my breakfast, the 
chowkidar of the bungalow, two Forest Guards, and several 
men from the Mohan bazaar, entertained me with stories of the 
man-eater, the most recent of which concerned the exploits of a 
fisherman who had been fishing the Kosi river. One of the 
Forest Guards claimed to be the proud hero of this exploit, and 
he described very graphically how he had been out one day 
with the fisherman and, on turning a bend in the river, they had 
come face to face with the man-eater; and how the fisherman 
had thrown away his rod and had grabbed the rifle off his— the 
Forest Guard's— shoulder; and how they had run for their lives 
with the tiger close on their heels. 'Did you look back? 1 I asked. 
'No, sahib/ said he, pitying my ignorance. 'How could a man 
who was running for his life from a man-eater look back?'; and 
how the fisherman, who was leading by a head, in a thick patch 
of grass had fallen over a sleeping bear, after which there had 
been great confusion and shouting and everyone, including the 
bear, had run in different directions and the fisherman had got 
lost; and how after a long time the fisherman had eventually 
found his way back to the bungalow and had said a lot to him— 
the Forest Guard— on the subject of having run away with his 
rifle and left him emptyhanded to deal with a man-eating tiger 
and an angry bear. The Forest Guard ended up his recital by 
saying that the fisherman had left Mohan the following day 
saying that he had hurt his leg when he fell over the bear, and 
that anyway there were no fish to be caught in the Kosi river. 

By midday we were ready to continue our journey, and, with 
many warnings from the small crowd that had collected to see 
us off to keep a sharp lookout for the man-eater while going 
through the dense forest that lay ahead of us, we set out on our 
four-thousand-foot climb to Kartkanoula. 

Our progress was slow, for my men were carrying heavy loads 
and the track was excessively steep, and the heat terrific. 

There had been some trouble in the upper villages a short time 
previously, necessitating the dispatch from Naini Tal of a small 
police force, and I had been advised to take everything I 



needed for myself and my men with me, as owing to the 
unsettled conditions it would not be possible to get any stores 
locally This was the reason for the heavy loads my men were 
carrying. 

After many halts we reached the edge of the cultivated land in 
the late afternoon, and as there was now no further danger to 
be apprehended for my men from the man-eater, I left them 
and set out alone for the Foresters' Hut which is visible from 
Mohan, and which had been pointed out to me by the Forest 
Guards as the best place for my stay while at Kartkanoula. 

The hut is on the ridge of the high hill overlooking Mohan, and 
as I approached it along the level stretch of road running 
across the face of the hill, in turning a corner in a ravine where 
there is some dense undergrowth, I came on a woman filling an 
earthenware pitcher from a little trickle of water flowing down 
a wooden trough. Apprehending that my approach on rubber- 
soled shoes would frighten her, I coughed to attract her 
attention, noticed that she started violently as I did so, and a 
few yards beyond her, stopped to light a cigarette. A minute or 
two later I asked, without turning my head, if it was safe for 
anyone to be in this lonely spot, and after a little hesitation the 
woman answered that it was not safe, but that water had to be 
fetched and as there was no one in the home to accompany her, 
she had come alone. Was there no man? Yes, there was a man, 
but he was in the fields ploughing, and in any case it was the 
duty of women to fetch water. How long would it take to fill the 
pitcher? Only a little longer. The woman had got over her fright 
and shyness, and I was now subjected to a close cross- 
examination. Was I a policeman? No. Was I a Forest Officer? 

No, Then who was I? Just a man. Why had I come? To try and 
help the people of Kartkanoula. In what way? By shooting the 
man-eater. Where had I heard about the man-eater? Why had I 
come alone? Where were my men? How many were there? How 
long would I stay? And so on. 

The pitcher was not declared full until the woman had satisfied 



her curiosity, and as she walked behind me she pointed to one 
of several ridges running down the south face of the hill, and 
pointing out a big tree growing on a grassy slope said that 
three days previously the man-eater had killed a woman under 
it; this tree I noted, with interest, was only two or three 
hundred yards from my objective— the Foresters' Hut. We had 
now come to a footpath running up the hill, and as she took it 
the woman said the village from which she had come was just 
round the shoulder of the hill, and added that she was now 
quite safe. 

Those of you who know the women of India will realize that I 
had accomplished a lot, especially when it is remembered that 
there had recently been trouble in this area with the police. So 
far from alarming the woman and thereby earning the hostility 
of the entire countryside I had, by standing by while she filled 
her pitcher and answering a few questions, gained a friend who 
would in the shortest time possible acquaint the whole 
population of the village of my arrival; that I was not an officer 
of any kind, and that the sole purpose of my visit was to try to 
rid them of the man-eater. 

Ill 

The Foresters' Hut was on a little knoll some twenty yards to 
the left of the road, and as the door was only fastened with a 
chain I opened it and walked inside. The room was about ten 
feet square and quite clean, but had a mouldy disused smell; I 
learnt later that the hut had not been occupied since the 
advent of the man-eater in that area eighteen months 
previously. On either side of the main room there were two 
narrow slips of rooms, one used as a kitchen, and the other as a 
fuel store. The hut would make a nice safe shelter for my men, 
and having opened the back door to let a current of air blow 
through the room, I went outside and selected a spot between 
the hut and the road for my 40-lb. tent. There was no furniture 
of any kind in the hut, so I sat down on a rock near the road to 
await the arrival of my men. 



The ridge at this point was about fifty yards wide, and as the 
hut was on the south edge of the ridge, and the village on the 
north face of the hill, the latter was not visible from the former. 
I had been sitting on the rock for about ten minutes when a 
head appeared over the crest from the direction of the village, 
followed by a second and a third. My friend the watercarrier 
had not been slow in informing the village of my arrival. 

When strangers meet in India and wish to glean information on 
any particular subject from each other, it is customary to 
refrain from broaching the subject that has brought them 
together— whether accidentally or of set purpose— until the 
very last moment, and to fill up the interval by finding out 
everything concerning each other's domestic and private 
affairs; as for instance, whether married and if so the number 
and sex of children and their ages; if not married, why not; 
occupation and amount of pay, and so on. Questions that would 
in any other part of the world earn one a thick ear are in India 
— and especially in our hills— asked so artlessly and 
universally that no one who has lived among the people dreams 
of taking offence at them. 

In my conversation with the woman I had answered many of 
the set questions, and the ones of a domestic nature which it is 
not permissible for a woman to ask of a man were being put to 
me when my men arrived. They had filled a kettle at the little 
spring, and in an incredibly short time dry sticks were 
collected, a fire lit, the kettle boiled, and tea and biscuits 
produced. As I opened a tin of condensed milk I heard the men 
asking my servants why condensed milk was being used 
instead of fresh milk and receiving the answer that there was 
no fresh milk; and further that, as it had been apprehended 
that owing to some previous trouble in this area no fresh milk 
would be available, a large supply of tinned milk had been 
brought. The men appeared to be very distressed on hearing 
this and after a whispered conversation one of them, who I 
learnt later was the Headman of Kartkanoula, addressed me 
and said it was an insult to them to have brought tinned milk. 



when all the resources of the village were at my disposal. I 
admitted my mistake, which I said was due to my being a 
stranger to that locality and told the Headman that if he had 
any milk to spare I would gladly purchase a small quantity for 
my daily requirements, but that beyond the milk, I wanted for 
nothing. 

My loads had now been unstrapped, while more men had 
arrived from the village, and when I told my servants where I 
wanted them to pitch my tent there was a horrified exclamation 
from the assembled villagers. Live in a tent— indeed! Was I 
ignorant of the fact that there was a man-eating tiger in this 
area and that it used this road regularly every night? If I 
doubted their word, let me come and see the claw marks on the 
doors of the houses where the road ran through the upper end 
of the village. Moreover, if the tiger did not eat me in the tent it 
would certainly eat my men in the hut, if I was not there to 
protect them. This last statement made my men prick up their 
ears and add their entreaties to the advice of the villagers, so 
eventually I agreed to stay in the main room, while my two 
servants occupied the kitchen, and the six Garhwalis the fuel 
store. 

The subject of the man-eater having been introduced, it was 
now possible for me to pursue it without admitting that it was 
the one object I had wished to introduce from the moment the 
first man had put his head over the ridge. The path leading 
down to the tree where the tiger had claimed its last victim was 
pointed out to me, and the time of day, and the circumstances 
tinder which the woman had been killed, explained. The road 
along which the tiger came every night, I was informed, ran 
eastward to Baital Ghat with a branch down to Mohan, and 
westward to Chaknakl on the Ramganga river. The road going 
west, after running through the upper part of the village and 
through cultivated land for half a mile, turned south along the 
face of the hill, and on rejoining the ridge on whigh the hut 
was, followed the ridge right down to Chaknakl. This portion of 
the road between Kartkanoula and Chaknakl, some six miles 



long, was considered to be very dangerous, and had not been 
used since the advent of the man-eater; I subsequently found 
that after leaving the cultivated land the road entered dense 
tree and scrub jungle, which extended right down to the river. 

The main cultivation of Kartkanoula village is on the north face 
of the hill, and beyond this cultivated land there are several 
small ridges with deep ravines between. On the nearest of 
these ridges, and distant about a thousand yards from the 
Foresters' Hut, there is a big pine tree. Near this tree, some 
ten days previously, the tiger had killed, partly eaten and left, a 
woman, and as the three sportsmen who were staying in a 
Forest Bungalow four miles away were unable to climb the pine 
tree the villagers had put up three machans in three separate 
trees, at distances varying from one hundred to one hundred 
and fifty yards from the kill, and the machans had been 
occupied by the sportsmen and their servants a little before 
sunset. There was a young moon at the time, and after it had 
set the villagers heard a number of shots being fired, and when 
they questioned the servants next morning the servants said 
they did not know what had been fired at for they themselves 
had not seen anything. 

Two days later a cow had been killed over which the sportsmen 
had sat, and again; as on the previous occasion, shots had been 
fired after the moon had set. It is these admittedly sporting but 
unsuccessful attempts to bag man-eaters that makes them so 
wary, and the more difficult to shoot the longer they live. 

The villagers gave me one very interesting item of news in 
connexion with the tiger. They said they always knew when it 
had come into the village by the low moaning sound it made. 

On questioning them closely I learnt that at times the sound 
was continuous as the tiger passed between the houses, while 
at other times the sound stopped for sometimes short, and 
other times long periods. 

From this information I concluded (a) that the tiger was 
suffering from a wound, (b) that the wound was of such a 



nature that the tiger only felt it when in motion, and that 
therefore, (c) the wound was in one of its legs. I was assured 
that the tiger had not been wounded by any local shikari, or by 
any of the sportsmen from Ranikhet who had sat up for it; 
however, this was of little importance, for the tiger had been a 
man-eater for years, and the wound that I believed it was 
suffering from might have been the original cause of its 
becoming a man-eater. A very interesting point and one that 
could only be cleared up by examining the tiger— after it was 
dead. 

The men were curious to know why I was so interested in the 
sound made by the tiger, and when I told them that it indicated 
the animal had a wound in one of its legs and that the wound 
had been caused either by a bullet, or porcupine quills, they 
disagreed with my reasoning and said that on the occasions 
they had seen the tiger it appeared to be in sound condition, 
and further, that the ease with which it killed and carried off its 
victims was proof that it was not crippled in any way. However, 
what I told them was remembered and later earned me the 
reputation of being gifted with second sight. 

IV 

When passing through Ramnagar I had asked the Tahsildar to 
purchase two young male buffaloes for me and to send them to 
Mohan, where my men would take them over. 

I told the villagers I intended tying up one of the buffaloes near 
the tree where three days previously the woman had been 
killed and the other on the road to Chaknakl, and they said they 
could think of no better sites, but that they would talk the 
matter over among themselves, and let me know in the 
morning if they had any other suggestions to make. Night was 
now drawing in, and before leaving the Headman promised to 
send word to all the adjoining villages in the morning to let 
them know of my arrival, the reason for my coming, and to 
impress on them the urgency of letting me know without loss of 
time of any kills, or attacks by the tiger in their areas. 


The musty smell in the room had much decreased though it 
was still noticeable. However, I paid no attention to it, and after 
a bath and dinner put two stones against the doors— there 
being no other way of keeping them shut— and being bone- 
tired after my day's exertions went to bed and to sleep. I am a 
light sleeper, and two or three hours later I awoke on hearing 
an animal moving about in the jungle. It came right up to the 
back door. Getting hold of a rifle and a torch, I moved the stone 
aside with my foot and heard an animal moving off as I opened 
the door— it might from the sound it was making have been the 
tiger, but it might also have been a leopard or a porcupine. 
However, the jungle was too thick for me to see what it was. 
Back in the room and with the stone once more in position, I 
noticed I had developed a sore throat, which I attributed to 
having sat in the wind after the hot walk up from Mohan; but 
when my servant pushed the door open and brought in my 
early-morning cup of tea, I found I was suffering from an attack 
of laryngitis, due possibly to my having slept in a long-disused 
hut, the roof of which was swarming with bats. 

My servant informed me that he and his companion had 
escaped infection, but that the six Garhwalis in the fuel store 
were all suffering from the same complaint as I was. My stock 
of medicine consisted of a two-ounce bottle of iodine and a few 
tablets of quinine, and on rummaging in my gun-case I found a 
small paper packet of permanganate which my sister had 
provided for me on a previous occasion. The packet was soaked 
through with gun oil, but the crystals were still soluble, and I 
put a liberal quantity of the crystals into a tin of hot water, 
together with some iodine. The resulting gargle was very 
potent, and while it blackened our teeth it did much to relieve 
the soreness in our throats. 

After an early breakfast I sent four men down to Mohan to 
bring up the two buffaloes, and myself set off to prospect the 
ground where the woman had been killed. From the directions 
I had received overnight I had no difficulty in finding the spot 
where the tiger had attacked and killed the woman, as she was 



tying the grass she had cut into a bundle. The grass, and the 
rope she was using, were lying just as they had been left, as 
were also two bundles of grass left by her companions when 
they had run off in fright to the village. The men had told me 
that the body of the woman had not been found, but from the 
fact that three perfectly good lengths of rope and the dead 
woman's sickle had been left in the jungle, I am inclined to 
think that no attempt had been made to find her. 

The woman had been killed at the upper end of a small 
landslide, and the tiger had taken her down the slide and into a 
thick patch of undergrowth. Here the tiger had waited, possibly 
to give the two women time to get out of sight, and had then 
crossed the ridge visible from the hut, after which it had gone 
with its kill straight down the hill for a mile or more into dense 
tree and scrub jungle. The tracks were now four days old, and 
as there was nothing to be gained by following them further, I 
turned back to the hut. 

The climb back to the ridge was a very steep one, and when I 
reached the hut at about midday I found an array of pots and 
pans of various shapes and sizes on the verandah, all 
containing milk. In contrast to the famine of the day before 
there was now abundance, sufficient milk in fact for me to have 
bathed in. My servants informed me they had protested to no 
effect and that each man had said, as he deposited his vessel 
on the verandah, that he would take good care that I used no 
more condensed milk while I remained in their midst. 

I did not expect the men to return from Mohan with the 
buffaloes before nightfall, so after lunch I set out to have a look 
at the road to Chaknakl. 

From the hut the hill sloped gradually upwards to a height of 
about five hundred feet, and was roughly triangular in shape. 
The road, after running through cultivated land for half a mile, 
turned sharply to the left, went across a steep rocky hill until it 
regained the ridge, and then turned to the right and followed 
the ridge down to Chaknakl. The road was level for a short 



distance after coming out on the ridge, and then went steeply 
down, the gradient in places being eased by hairpin bends. 

I had the whole afternoon before me, and examined about 
three miles of the road very carefully When a tiger uses a road 
regularly it invariably leaves signs of its passage by making 
scratch marks on the side of the road. These scratch marks, 
made for the same purpose as similar marks made by domestic 
cats and all other members of the cat family, are of very great 
interest to the sportsman, for they provide him with the 
following very useful information, (1) whether the animal that 
has made the mark is a male or a female, (2) the direction in 
which it was travelling, (3) the length of time that has elapsed 
since it passed, (4) the direction and approximate distance of 
its headquarters, (5) the nature of its kills, and finally (6) 
whether the animal has recently had a meal of human flesh. 

The value of this easily-acquired information to one who is 
hunting a man-eater on strange ground will be easily 
understood. Tigers leave their pug marks on the roads they use 
and these pug marks can provide one with quite a lot of useful 
information, as for instance the direction and speed at which 
the animal was travelling, its sex and age, whether all four 
limbs are sound, and if not sound, which particular limb, is 
defective. 

The road I was on had through long disuse got overgrown with 
short stiff grass and was therefore not, except in one or two 
damp places, a good medium on which to leave pug marks. One 
of these damp places was within a few yards of where the road 
came out on the ridge, and just below this spot there was a 
green and very stagnant pool of water; a regular drinking place 
for sambur. 

I found several scratch marks just round the corner where the 
road turned to the left after leaving the cultivated ground, the 
most recent of which was three days old. Two hundred yards 
from these scratch marks the road, for a third of its width, ran 
under an overhanging rock. This rock was ten feet high and at 



the top of it there was a flat piece of ground two or three yards 
wide, which was only visible from the road when approaching 
the rock from the village side. On the ridge I found more 
scratch marks, but I did not find any pug marks until I got to 
the first hairpin bend. Here, in cutting across the bend, the 
tiger had left its tracks where it had jumped down onto some 
soft earth. The tracks, which were a day old, were a little 
distorted, but even so it was possible to see that they had been 
made by a big, old, male tiger. 

When one is moving in an area in which a man-eating tiger is 
operating progress is of necessity very slow, for every 
obstruction in one's line of walk, be it a bush, a tree, rock, or 
an inequality in the ground capable of concealing death, has to 
be cautiously approached, while at the same time, if a wind is 
not blowing— and there was no wind that evening— a careful 
and constant lookout has to be maintained behind and on 
either side. Further, there was much of interest to be looked at, 
for it was the month of May, when orchids at this elevation— 
4,000 to 5,000 feet— are at their best, and I have never seen a 
greater variety or a greater wealth of bloom than the forests on 
that hill had to show. The beautiful white butterfly orchid was 
in greatest profusion, and every second tree of any size 
appeared to have decked itself out with them. 

It was here that I first saw a bird that Prater of the Bombay 
Natural History Society later very kindly identified for me as 
the Mountain Crag Martin, a bird of a uniform ash colour, with 
a slight tinge of pink on its breast, and in size a little smaller 
than a Rosy Pastor. These birds had their broods with them, 
and while the young ones— four to a brood— sat in a row on a 
dry twig at the top of a high tree, the parent birds kept darting 
away— often to a distance of two or three hundred yards— to 
catch insects. The speed at which they flew was amazing, and I 
am quite sure there is nothing in feathers in North India, not 
excluding our winter visitor the great Tibetan Swallow, that 
these Martins could not make rings round. Another thing about 
these birds that was very interesting was their wonderful 



eyesight. On occasions they would fly in a dead straight line for 
several hundred yards before turning and coming back. It was 
not possible, at the speed they were going, that they were 
chasing insects on these long flights, and as after each flight 
the bird invariably thrust some minute object into one of the 
gaping mouths, I believe they were able to see insects at a 
range at which they would not have been visible to the human 
eye through the most powerful field-glasses. 

Safeguarding my neck, looking out for tracks, enjoying nature 
generally, and listening to all the jungle sounds— a sambur a 
mile away down the hillside in the direction of Mohan was 
warning the jungle folk of the presence of a tiger, and a kakar 
and a langur (Entellus monkey) on the road to Chaknakl were 
warning other jungle folk of the presence of a leopard— time 
passed quickly, and I found myself back at the overhanging 
rock as the sun was setting. As I approached this rock I marked 
it as being quite the most dangerous spot in all the ground I 
had so far gone over. A tiger lying on the grass-covered bit of 
ground above the rock would only have to wait until anyone 
going either up or down the road was under or had passed it to 
have them at his mercy— a very dangerous spot indeed, and 
one that needed remembering. 

When I got back to the hut I found the two buffaloes had 
arrived, but it was too late to do anything with them that 
evening. 

My servants had kept a fire going most of the day in the hut, 
the air of which was now sweet and clean, but even so I was 
not going to risk sleeping in a closed room again; so I made 
them cut two thorn bushes and wedge them firmly into the 
doorways before going to bed. There was no movement in the 
jungle near the back door that night, and after a sound sleep I 
woke in the morning with my throat very much better. 

I spent most of the morning talking to the village people and 
listening to the tales they had to tell of the man-eater and the 
attempts that had been made to shoot it, and after lunch I tied 



up one buffalo on the small ridge the tiger had crossed when 
carrying away the woman, and the other at the hairpin bed 
where I had seen the pug marks. 

Next morning I found both buffaloes sleeping peacefully after 
having eaten most of the big feed of grass I had provided them 
with. I had tied bells round the necks of both animals, and the 
absence of any sound from these bells as I approached each 
buffalo gave me two disappointments for, as I have said, I found 
both of them asleep. That evening I changed the position of the 
second buffalo from the hairpin bend to where the road came 
out on the ridge, close to the pool of stagnant water. 

The methods most generally employed in tiger shooting can 
briefly be described as (a) sitting up, and (b) beating, and 
young male buffaloes are used as bait in both cases. The 
procedure followed is to select the area most convenient for a 
sit-up, or for a beat, and to tie the bait out in the late evening 
using a rope which the bait cannot, but which the tiger can, 
break; and when the bait is taken to either sit up over the kill 
on a machan in a tree, or beat the cover into which the kill has 
been taken. 

In the present case neither of these methods was feasible. My 
throat, though very much better, was still sore and it would not 
have been possible for me to have sat up for any length of time 
without coughing, and a beat over that vast area of heavily 
wooded and broken ground would have been hopeless even if I 
had been able to muster a thousand men, so I decided to stalk 
the tiger, and to this end carefully sited my two buffaloes and 
tied them to stout saplings with four one-inch-thick hemp 
ropes, and left them out in the jungle for the whole twenty-four 
hours. 

I now stalked the buffaloes in turn each morning as soon as 
there was sufficient light to shoot by, and again in the evening, 
for tigers, be they man-eaters or not, kill as readily in the day 
as they do at night in areas in which they are not disturbed, 
and during the day, while I waited for news from outlying 



villages, nursed my throat, and rested, my six Garhwalis fed 
and watered the buffaloes. 

On the fourth evening when I was returning at sunset after 
visiting the buffalo on the ridge, as I came round a bend in the 
road thirty yards from the overhanging rock, I suddenly, and 
for the first time since my arrival at Kartkanoula, felt I was in 
danger, and that the danger that threatened me was on the 
rock in front of me. For five minutes I stood perfectly still with 
my eyes fixed on the upper edge of the rock, watching for 
movement. At that short range the flicker of an eyelid would 
have caught my eyes, but there was not even this small 
movement; and after going forward ten paces, I again stood 
watching for several minutes. The fact that I had seen no 
movement did not in any way reassure me— the man-eater was 
on the rock, of that I was sure; and the question was, what was 
I going to do about it? The hill, as I have already told you, was 
very steep, had great rocks jutting out of it, and was overgrown 
with long grass and tree and scrub jungle. Bad as the going 
was, had it been earlier in the day I would have gone back and 
worked round and above the tiger to try to get a shot at him, 
but with only half an hour of daylight left, and the best part of a 
mile still to go, it would have been madness to have left the 
road. So, slipping up the safety-catch and putting the rifle to 
my shoulder, I started to pass the rock. 

The road here was about eight feet wide, and going to the 
extreme outer edge I started walking crab-fashion, feeling each 
step with my feet before putting my weight down to keep from 
stepping off into space. Progress was slow and difficult, but as I 
drew level with the overhanging rock and then began to pass it, 
hope rose high that the tiger would remain where he was until 
I reached that part of the road from which the flat bit of ground 
above the rock, on which he was lying, was visible. The tiger, 
however, having failed to catch me off my guard was taking no 
chances, and I had just got clear of the rock when I heard a low 
muttered growl above me, and a little later first a kakar went 
off barking to the right, and then two hind sambur started 



belling near the crest of the triangular hill. 

The tiger had got away with a sound skin, but for the matter of 
that, so had I, so there was no occasion for regrets, and from 
the place on the hill where the sambur said he was, I felt sure 
he would hear the bell I had hung round the neck of the buffalo 
that was tied on the ridge near the stagnant pool. 

When I reached the cultivated land I found a group of men 
waiting for me. They had heard the kakar and sambur and were 
very disappointed that I had not seen the tiger, but cheered up 
when I told them I had great hopes for the morrow. 

V 

During the night a dust-storm came on, followed by heavy rain, 
and I found to my discomfort that the roof of the hut was very 
porous. However, I eventually found a spot where it was 
leaking less than in others, dragged my camp bed to it and 
continued my sleep. It was a brilliantly clear morning when I 
awoke; the rain had washed the heat haze and dust out of the 
atmosphere, and every leaf and blade of grass was glistering in 
the newly risen sun. 

Hitherto I had visited the nearer buffalo first, but this morning 
I had an urge to reverse the daily procedure, and after 
instructing my men to wait until the sun was well up and then 
go to feed and water the nearer buffalo, I set off with high 
hopes down the Chaknakl road; having first cleaned and oiled 
my 450/400 rifle— a very efficient weapon, and a good and 
faithful friend of many years' standing. 

The overhanging rock that I passed with such trouble the 
previous evening did not give me a moment's uneasiness now, 
and after passing it I started looking for tracks, for the rain had 
softened the surface of the road. I saw nothing however until I 
came to the damp place on the road, which, as I have said, was 
on the near side of the ridge and close to the pool where the 
buffalo was tied. Here in the soft earth I found the pug marks 
of the tiger, made before the storm had come on, and going in 


the direction of the ridge. Close to this spot there is a rock 
about three feet high, on the khud side of the road. On the 
previous occasions that I had stalked down the road I had 
found that by standing on this rock I could look over a hump in 
the road and see the buffalo where it was tied forty yards away. 
When I now climbed on to the rock and slowly raised my head, 

I found that the buffalo had gone. This discovery was as 
disconcerting as it was inexplicable. To prevent the tiger from 
carrying the buffalo away to some distant part of the jungle, 
where the only method of getting a shot would have been by 
sitting up on the ground or in a tree— a hopeless proceeding 
with my throat in the condition it was in— I had used four 
thicknesses of strong one-inch-thick hemp rope, and even so 
the tiger had got away with the kill. 

I was wearing the thinnest of rubber-soled shoes, and very 
silently I approached the sapling to which the buffalo had been 
tied and examined the ground. The buffalo had been killed 
before the storm, but had been carried away after the rain had 
stopped, without any portion of it having been eaten. Three of 
the ropes I had twisted together had been gnawed through, 
and the fourth had been broken. Tigers do not usually gnaw 
through ropes; however, this one had done so, and had carried 
off the kill down the hill facing Mohan. My plans had been 
badly upset, but very fortunately the rain had come to my 
assistance. The thick carpet of dead leaves which the day 
before had been as dry as tinder were now wet and pliable, and 
provided I made no mistakes, the pains the tiger had been to in 
getting away with the kill might yet prove his undoing. 

When entering a jungle in which rapid shooting might at any 
moment become necessary, I never feel happy until I have 
reassured myself that my rifle is loaded. To pull a trigger in an 
emergency and wake up in the Happy Hunting Grounds— or 
elsewhere— because one had omitted to load a weapon, would 
be one of those acts of carelessness for which no excuse could 
be found; so though I knew I had loaded my rifle before I came 
to the overhanging rock, I now opened it and extracted the 



cartridges. I changed one that was discoloured and dented, and 
after moving the safety-catch up and down several times to 
make sure it was working smoothly— I have never carried a 
cocked weapon— I set off to follow the drag. 

This word 'drag', when it is used to describe the mark left on 
the ground by a tiger when it is moving its kill from one place 
to another, is misleading, for a tiger when taking its kill any 
distance (I have seen a tiger carry a full-grown cow for four 
miles) does not drag it, it carries it; and if the kill is too heavy 
to be carried, it is left. The drag is distinct or faint according to 
the size of the animal that is being carried, and the manner in 
which it is being held. For instance, assuming the kill is a 
sambur and the tiger is holding it by the neck the hind quarters 
will trail on the ground leaving a distinct drag mark. On the 
other hand, if the sambur is being held by the middle of the 
back, there may be a faint drag mark, or there may be none at 
all. 

In the present case the tiger was carrying the buffalo by the 
neck, and the hind quarters trailing on the ground were leaving 
a drag mark it was easy to follow. For a hundred yards the tiger 
went diagonally across the face of the hill until he came to a 
steep clay bank. In attempting to cross this bank he had slipped 
and relinquished his hold of the kill, which had rolled down the 
hill for thirty or forty yards until it had fetched up against a 
tree. On recovering the kill the tiger picked it up by the back, 
and from now on only one leg occasionally touched the ground, 
leaving a faint drag mark, which nevertheless, owing to the 
hillside being carpeted with bracken, was not very difficult to 
follow. In his fall the tiger had lost direction, and he now 
appeared to be undecided where to take the kill. First he went 
a couple of hundred yards to the right, then a hundred yards 
straight down the hill through a dense patch of ringals (stunted 
bamboo). After forcing his way with considerable difficulty 
through the ringals he turned to the left and went diagonally 
across the hill for a few hundred yards until he came to a great 
rock, to the right of which he skirted. This rock was flush with 



the ground on the approach side, and, rising gently for twenty 
feet, appeared to project out over a hollow or dell of 
considerable extent. If there was a cave or recess under the 
projection, it would be a very likely place for the tiger to have 
taken his kill to, so leaving the drag I stepped on to the rock 
and moved forward very slowly, examining every yard of 
ground below, and on either side of me, as it came into view. On 
reaching the end of the projection and looking over I was 
disappointed to find that the hill came up steeply to meet the 
rock, and that there was no cave or recess under it as I had 
expected there would be. 

As the point of the rock offered a good view of the dell and of 
the surrounding jungle— and was comparatively safe from an 
attack from the man-eater— I sat down; and as I did so, I 
caught sight of a red and white object in a dense patch of short 
undergrowth, forty or fifty yards directly below me. When one 
is looking for a tiger in heavy jungle everything red that 
catches the eye is immediately taken for the tiger, and here, 
not only could I see the red of the tiger, but I could also see his 
stripes. For a long minute I watched the object intently, and 
then, as the face you are told to look for in a freak picture 
suddenly resolves itself, I saw that the object I was looking at 
was the kill, and not the tiger; the red was blood where he had 
recently been eating, and the stripes were the ribs from which 
he had torn away the skin. I was thankful for having held my 
fire for that long minute, for in a somewhat similar case a 
friend of mine ruined his chance of bagging a very fine tiger by 
putting two bullets into a kill over which he had intended 
sitting; fortunately he was a good shot, and the two men whom 
he had sent out in advance to find the kill and put up a machan 
over it, and who were, at the time he fired, standing near the 
kill screened by a bush, escaped injury. 

When a tiger that has not been disturbed leaves his kill out in 
the open, it can be assumed that he is lying up close at hand to 
guard the kill from vultures and other scavengers, and the fact 
that I could not see the tiger did not mean that he was not lying 



somewhere close by in the dense undergrowth. 

Tigers are troubled by flies and do not lie long in one position, 
so I decided to remain where I was and watch for movement; 
but hardly had I come to this decision, when I felt an irritation 
in my throat. I had not quite recovered from my attack of 
laryngitis and the irritation grew rapidly worse until it became 
imperative for me to cough. The usual methods one employs on 
these occasions, whether in church or the jungle, such as 
holding the breath and swallowing hard, gave no relief until it 
became a case of cough, or burst; and in desperation I tried to 
relieve my throat by giving the alarm-call of the langur. Sounds 
are difficult to translate into words and for those of you who 
are not acquainted with our jungles I would try to describe this 
alarm-call, which can be heard for half a mile, as khok, khok, 
khok, repeated again and again at short intervals, and ending 
up with khokorror. All langurs do not call at tigers, but the ones 
in our hills certainly do, and as this tiger had probably heard 
the call every day of his life it was the one sound I could make 
to which he would not pay the slightest attention. My rendering 
of the call in this emergency did not sound very convincing, but 
it had the desired effect of removing the irritation from my 
throat. 

For half an hour thereafter I continued to sit on the rock, 
watching for movement and listening for news from the jungle 
folk, and when I had satisfied myself that the tiger was not 
anywhere within my range of vision, I got off the rock, and, 
moving with the utmost caution, went down to the kill. 

VI 

I regret I am not able to tell you what weight of flesh a full- 
grown tiger can consume at a meal, but you will have some 
idea of his capacity when I tell you he can eat a sambur in two 
days, and a buffalo in three, leaving possibly a small snack for 
the fourth day. 

The buffalo I had tied up was not full-grown but he was by no 
means a small animal, and the tiger had eaten approximately 


half of him. With a meal of that dimension inside of him I felt 
sure he had not gone far, and as the ground was still wet, and 
would remain so for another hour or two, I decided to find out 
in what direction he had gone, and if possible, stalk him. 

There was a confusion of tracks near the kill but by going 
round in widening circles I found the track the tiger had made 
when leaving. Soft-footed animals are a little more difficult to 
track than hard-footed ones, yet after long years of experience 
tracking needs as little effort as a gun dog exerts when 
following a scent. As silently and as slowly as a shadow I took 
up the track, knowing that the tiger would be close at hand. 
When I had gone a hundred yards I came on a flat bit of 
ground, twenty feet square, and carpeted with that variety of 
short soft grass that has highly scented roots; on this grass the 
tiger had lain, the imprint of his body being clearly visible. 

As I was looking at the imprint and guessing at the size of the 
animal that had made it, I saw some of the blades of grass that 
had been crushed down, spring erect. This indicated that the 
tiger had been gone only a minute or so. 

You will have some idea of the lay-out when I tell you that the 
tiger had brought the kill down from the north, and on leaving 
it had gone west, and that the rock on which I had sat, the kill, 
and the spot where I was now standing, formed the points of a 
triangle, one side of which was forty yards, and the other two 
sides a hundred yards long. 

My first thought on seeing the grass spring erect was that the 
tiger had seen me and moved off, but this I soon found was not 
likely, for neither the rock nor the kill was visible from the 
grass plot, and that he had not seen me and moved after I had 
taken up his track I was quite certain. Why then had he left his 
comfortable bed and gone away? The sun shining on the back 
of my neck provided the answer. It was now nine o'clock of an 
unpleasantly hot May morning, and a glance at the sun and the 
tree-tops over which it had come showed that it had been 
shining on the grass for ten minutes. The tiger had evidently 



found it too hot, and gone away a few minutes before my 
arrival to look for a shady spot. 

I have told you that the grass plot was twenty feet square. On 
the far side to that from which I had approached there was a 
fallen tree, lying north and south. This tree was about four feet 
in diameter, and as it was lying along the edge of the grass plot 
in the middle of which I was standing, it was ten feet away 
from me. The root end of the tree was resting on the hillside, 
which here went up steeply and was overgrown with 
brushwood, and the branch end (which had been snapped off 
when the tree had fallen) was projecting out over the hillside. 
Beyond the tree the hill appeared to be more or less 
perpendicular, and running across the face of it was a narrow 
ledge of rock, which disappeared into dense jungle thirty yards 
further on. 

If my surmise, that the sun had been the cause of the tiger 
changing his position, was correct, there was no more suitable 
place than the lee of the tree for him to have taken shelter in, 
and the only way of satisfying myself on this point was, to walk 
up to the tree— and look over. Here a picture seen long years 
ago in Punch flashed into memory. The picture was of a lone 
sportsman who had gone out to hunt lions and who on glancing 
up, on to the rock he was passing, looked straight into the 
grinning face of the most enormous lion in Africa. Underneath 
the picture was written, 'When you go out looking for a lion, be 
quite sure that you want to see him 1 . True, there would be this 
small difference, that whereas my friend in Africa looked up— 
into the lion's face, I would look down— into the tiger's; 
otherwise the two cases— assuming that the tiger was on the 
far side of the tree— would be very similar. 

Slipping my feet forward an inch at a time on the soft grass, I 
now started to approach the tree, and had covered about half 
the distance that separated me from it when I caught sight of a 
black-and-yellow object about three inches long on the rocky 
ledge, which I now saw was a well-used game path. For a long 



minute I stared at this motionless object, until I was convinced 
that it was the tip of the tiger's tail. If the tail was pointing 
away from me the head must obviously be towards me, and as 
the ledge was only some two feet wide, the tiger could only be 
crouching down and waiting to spring the moment my head 
appeared over the bole of the tree. The tip of the tail was 
twenty feet from me, and allowing eight feet for the tiger's 
length while crouching, his head would be twelve feet away 
But I should have to approach much nearer before I should be 
able to see enough of his body to get in a crippling shot, and a 
crippling shot it would have to be if I wanted to leave on my 
feet. And now, for the first time in my life, I regretted my habit 
of carrying an uncocked rifle. The safety-catch of my 450/400 
makes a very distinct click when thrown off, and to make any 
sound now would either bring the tiger right on top of me, or 
send him straight down the steep hillside without any 
possibility of my getting in a shot. 

Inch by inch I again started to creep forward, until the whole of 
the tail, and after it the hind quarters, came into view. When I 
saw the hind quarters, I could have shouted with delight, for 
they showed that the tiger was not crouching and ready to 
spring, but was lying down. As there was only room for his 
body on the two-foot-wide ledge, he had stretched his hind legs 
out and was resting them on the upper branches of an oak 
sapling growing up the face of the almost perpendicular 
hillside. Another foot forward and his belly came into view, and 
from the regular way in which it was heaving up and down I 
knew that he was asleep. Less slowly now I moved forward, 
until his shoulder, and then his whole length, was exposed to 
my view. The back of his head was resting on the edge of the 
grass plot, which extended for three or four feet beyond the 
fallen tree; his eyes were fast shut, and his nose was pointing 
to heaven. 

Aligning the sights of the rifle on his forehead I pressed the 
trigger and, while maintaining a steady pressure on it, pushed 
up the safety-catch. I had no idea how this reversal of the usual 



method of discharging a rifle would work, but it did work; and 
when the heavy bullet at that short range crashed into his 
forehead not so much as a quiver went through his body His 
tail remained stretched straight out; his hind legs continued to 
rest on the upper branches of the sapling; and his nose still 
pointed to heaven. Nor did his position change in the slightest 
when I sent a second, and quite unnecessary, bullet to follow 
the first. The only change noticeable was that his stomach had 
stopped heaving up and down, and that blood was trickling 
down his forehead from two surprisingly small holes. 

I do not know how the close proximity of a tiger reacts on 
others, but me it always leaves with a breathless feeling— due 
possibly as much to fear as to excitement— and a desire for a 
little rest. I sat down on the fallen tree and lit the cigarette I 
had denied myself from the day my throat had got bad, and 
allowed my thoughts to wander. Any task well accomplished 
gives satisfaction, and the one just completed was no 
exception. The reason for my presence at that spot was the 
destruction of the man-eater, and from the time I had left the 
road two hours previously right up to the moment I pushed up 
the safety-catch everything— including the langur call— had 
worked smoothly and without a single fault. In this there was 
great satisfaction, the kind of satisfaction I imagine an author 
must feel when he writes FINIS to the plot that, stage by stage, 
has unfolded itself just as he desired it to. In my case, however, 
the finish had not been satisfactory, for I had killed the animal, 
that was lying five feet from me, in his sleep. 

My personal feelings in the matter are I know of little interest 
to others, but it occurs to me that possibly you also might think 
it was not cricket, and in that case I should like to put the 
arguments before you that I used on myself, in the hope that 
you will find them more satisfactory than I did. These 
arguments were (a) The tiger was a man-eater that was better 
dead than alive, (b) therefore it made no difference whether he 
was awake or asleep when killed, and (c) that had I walked 
away when I saw his belly heaving up and down I should have 



been morally responsible for the deaths of all the human beings 
he killed thereafter. All good and sound arguments, you will 
admit, for my having acted as I did; but the regret remains that 
through fear of the consequences to myself, or fear of losing 
the only chance I might ever get, or possibly a combination of 
the two, I did not awaken the sleeping animal and give him a 
sporting chance. 

The tiger was dead, and if my trophy was to be saved from 
falling into the valley below and ruined, it was advisable to get 
him off the ledge with as little delay as possible. Leaning the 
rifle, for which I had no further use, against the fallen tree, I 
climbed up to the road and, once round the corner near the 
cultivated land, I cupped my hands and sent a cooee echoing 
over the hills and valleys. I had no occasion to repeat the call, 
for my men had heard my two shots when returning from 
attending to the first buffalo and had run back to the hut to 
collect as many villagers as were within calling distance. Now, 
on hearing my cooee, the whole crowd came helter-skelter 
down the road to meet me. 

When stout ropes and an axe had been procured I took the 
crowd back with me, and after I had secured the ropes round 
the tiger, willing hands half carried and half dragged him off 
the ledge and over the fallen tree, on to the plot of grass. Here 
I would have skinned him, but the villagers begged me not to 
do so, saying that the women and children of Kartkanoula and 
the adjoining villages would be very disappointed if they were 
not given an opportunity of seeing the tiger with their own eyes 
and satisfying themselves that the man-eater, in fear of whom 
they had lived for so many years, and who had established a 
reign of terror over the whole district, was really and truly 
dead. 

While a couple of saplings to assist in carrying the tiger back to 
the hut were being felled, I saw some of the men passing their 
hands over the tiger's limbs, and knew they were satisfying 
themselves that their assertion that the tiger had not been 



suffering from any old, or crippling, wounds was correct. At the 
hut the tiger was placed in the shade of a wide-spreading tree 
and the villagers informed that it was at their disposal up to 
two o'clock— longer I could not give them, for it was a very hot 
day and there was fear of the hair slipping, and the skin being 
ruined. 

I myself had not looked closely at the tiger, but at 2 p.m., when 
I laid him on his back to start the skinning, I noticed that most 
of the hair from the inner side of his left foreleg was missing, 
and that there were a number of small punctures in the skin, 
from which yellow fluid was exuding. I did not draw attention 
to these punctures, and left the skinning of the leg, which was 
considerably thinner than the right leg, to the last. When the 
skin had been removed from the rest of the animal, I made a 
long cut from the chest to the pad of the festering left leg, and 
as I removed the skin, drew out of the flesh, one after another, 
porcupine quills which the men standing round eagerly seized 
as souvenirs; the longest of these quills was about five inches, 
and their total number was between twenty-five and thirty. The 
flesh under the skin, from the tiger's chest to the pad of his 
foot, was soapy, and of a dark yellow colour; cause enough to 
have made the poor beast moan when he walked, and quite 
sufficient reason for his having become— and having remained 
— a man-eater, for porcupine quills do not dissolve no matter 
how long they are embedded in flesh. 

I have extracted, possibly, a couple of hundred porcupine quills 
from the man-eating tigers I have shot. Many of these quills 
have been over nine inches in length and as thick as pencils. 
The majority were embedded in hard muscles, a few were 
wedged firmly between bones, and all were broken off short 
under the skin. 

Unquestionably the tigers acquired the quills when killing 
porcupines for food, but the question arises— to which I regret 
I am unable to give any satisfactory answer— why animals with 
the intelligence, and the agility, of tigers, should have been so 



careless as to drive quills deep into themselves, or be so slow 
in their movements as to permit porcupines— whose only 
method of defending themselves is by walking backwards— to 
do so; and further, why the quills should have been broken off 
short, for porcupine quills are not brittle. 

Leopards are just as partial to porcupines as our hill tigers are, 
but they do not get quills stuck in them, for they kill porcupines 
— as I have seen— by catching them by the head; and why 
tigers do not employ the same safe and obvious method of 
killing as leopards employ, and so avoid injury to themselves is 
a mystery to me. 

And now I have done telling you the story of the second of the 
three man-eating tigers mentioned at that District Conference 
of long ago and, when opportunity offers, I will tell you how the 
third tiger, the Kanda man-eater, died. 



The Fish of My Dreams 

FISHING for mahseer in a well-stocked submontane river is, in 
my opinion, the most fascinating of all field sports. Our 
environments, even though we may not be continuously 
conscious of them, nevertheless play a very important part in 
the sum total of our enjoyment of any form of outdoor sport. I 
am convinced that the killing of the fish of one's dreams in 
uncongenial surroundings would afford an angler as little 
pleasure as the winning of the Davis Cup would to a tennis 
player if the contest were staged in the Sahara. 

The river I have recently been fishing in flows, for some forty 
miles of its length, through a beautifully wooded valley, well 
stocked with game and teeming with bird life. I had the 
curiosity to count the various kinds of animals and birds seen in 
one day, and by the evening of that day my count showed, 
among animals, sambur, chital, kakar, ghooral, pig, langur and 
red monkeys; and among birds seventy-five varieties including 
peafowl, red jungle fowl, kaleege pheasants, black partridge 
and bush quail. 

In addition to these I saw a school of five otter in the river, 
several small mugger and a python. The python was lying on 
the surface of a big still pool, with only the top of its flat head 
and eyes projecting above the gin-clear water. The subject was 
one I had long wished to photograph, and in order to do this it 
was necessary to cross the river above the pool and climb the 
opposite hillside; but unfortunately I had been seen by those 
projecting eyes, and as I cautiously stepped backwards, the 
reptile, which appeared to be about eighteen feet long, 
submerged, to retire to its subterranean home among the piled- 
up boulders at the head of the pool. 

In some places the valley through which the river flows is so 
narrow that a stone can be tossed with ease from one side to 
the other, and in other places it widens out to a mile or more. 

In these open spaces grow amaltas with their two-feet-long 
sprays of golden bloom, karaunda and box bushes with their 



white star-shaped flowers. The combined scent from these 
flowers fills the air, throbbing with the spring songs of a 
multitude of birds, with the most delicate and pleasing of 
perfumes. In these surroundings angling for mahseer might 
well be described as sport fit for kings. My object in visiting 
this sportsman's paradise was not, however, to kill mahseer, 
but to try to secure a daylight picture of a tiger, and it was only 
when light conditions were unfavourable that I laid aside my 
movie camera for a rod. 

I had been out from dawn one day, trying, hour after hour, to 
get a picture of a tigress and her two cubs. The tigress was a 
young animal, nervous as all young mothers are, and as often 
as I stalked her she retired with the cubs into heavy cover. 
There is a limit to the disturbance a tigress, be she young or 
old, will suffer when accompanied by cubs, and when the limit 
on this occasion had been reached I altered my tactics and 
tried sitting up in trees over open glades, and lying in high 
grass near a stagnant pool in which she and her family were 
accustomed to drink, but with no better success. 

When the declining sun was beginning to cast shadows over 
the open places I was watching, I gave up the attempt, and 
added the day to the several hundred days I had already spent 
in trying to get a picture of a tiger in its natural surroundings. 
The two men I had brought from camp had passed the day in 
the shade of a tree on the far side of the river. I instructed them 
to return to camp by way of the forest track, and, exchanging 
my camera for a rod, set off along the river, intent on catching 
a fish for my dinner. 

The fashion in rods and tackle has altered, in recent years, as 
much as the fashion in ladies' dress. Gone, one often wonders 
where, are the 18-foot greenheart rods with their unbreakable 
accompaniments, and gone the muscles to wield them, and 
their place has been taken by light one-handed fly rods. 

I was armed with an 11-foot tournament trout rod, a reel 
containing 50 yards of casting line and 200 yards of fine silk 



backing, a medium gut cast, and a one-inch home-made brass 
spoon. 

When one has unlimited undisturbed water to fish one is apt to 
be over-critical. A pool is discarded because the approach to it 
is over rough ground, or a run is rejected because of a 
suspected snag. On this occasion, half a mile had been 
traversed before a final selection was made: a welter of white 
water cascading over rocks at the head of a deep oily run 80 
yards long, and at the end of the run a deep still pool 200 yards 
long and 70 yards wide. Here was the place to catch the fish 
for my dinner. 

Standing just clear of the white water I flicked the spoon into 
the run, pulling a few yards of line off the reel as I did so, and 
as I raised the rod to allow the line to run through the rings the 
spoon was taken by a fish, near the bank, and close to where I 
was standing. By great good luck the remaining portion of the 
slack line tightened on the drum of the reel and did not foul the 
butt of the rod or handle of the reel, as so often happens. 

In a flash the fish was off downstream, the good well-oiled reel 
singing a paean of joy as the line was stripped off it. The 50 
yards of casting line followed by 100 yards of backing were 
gone, leaving in their passage burned furrows in the fingers of 
my left hand, when all at once the mad rush ceased as abruptly 
as it had begun, and the line went dead. 

The speculations one makes on these occasions chased each 
other through my mind, accompanied by a little strong 
language to ease my feelings. The hold had been good without 
question. The cast, made up a few days previously from short 
lengths of gut procured from the Pilot Gut Coy., had been 
carefully tied and tested. Suspicion centred on the split ring: 
possibly, cracked on a stone on some previous occasion, it had 
now given way. 

Sixty yards of the line are back on the reel, when the slack line 
is seen to curve to the left, and a moment later is cutting a 



strong furrow upstream— the fish is still on, and is heading for 
the white water. Established here, pulling alternately from 
upstream, at right angles, and downstream fails to dislodge 
him. Time drags on, and the conviction grows that the fish has 
gone, leaving the line hung up on a snag. Once again and just 
as hope is being abandoned the line goes slack, and then 
tightens a moment later, as the fish for the second time goes 
madly downstream. 

And now he appears to have made up his mind to leave this 
reach of the river for the rapids below the pool. In one strong 
steady run he reaches the tail of the pool. Here, where the 
water fans out and shallows, he hesitates, and finally returns to 
the pool. A little later he shows on the surface for the first time, 
and but for the fact that the taut line runs direct from the point 
of the rod to the indistinctly seen object on the far side of the 
pool, it would be impossible to believe that the owner of that 
great triangular fin, projecting five inches out of the water, had 
taken a fly spoon a yard or two from my feet. 

Back in the depths of the pool, he was drawn inch by inch into 
slack water. To land a big fish single-handed on a trout rod is 
not an easy accomplishment. Four times he was stranded with 
a portion of his great shoulders out of water, and four times at 
my very cautious approach he lashed out, and, returning to the 
pool, had to be fought back inch by inch. At the fifth attempt, 
with the butt of the rod held at the crook of my thumb and 
reversed, rings upwards to avoid the handle of the reel coming 
into contact with him, he permits me to place one hand and 
then the other against his sides and very gently propel him 
through the shallow water up on to dry land. 

A fish I had set out to catch, and a fish I had caught, but he 
would take no part in my dinner that night, for between me and 
camp lay three and a half miles of rough ground, half of which 
would have to be covered in the dark. 

When sending away my 11-lb. camera I had retained the cotton 
cord I use for drawing it up after me when I sit in trees. One 



end of this cord was passed through the gills of the fish and out 
at his mouth, and securely tied in a loop. The other end was 
made fast to the branch of a tree. When the cord was paid out 
the fish lay snugly against a great slab of rock, in 
comparatively still water. Otter were the only danger, and to 
scare them off I made a flag of my handkerchief, and fixed the 
end of the improvised flagstaff in the bed of the river a little 
below the fish. 

The sun was gilding the mountain tops next morning when I 
was back at the pool, and found the fish lying just where I had 
left it the previous evening. Having unfastened the cord from 
the branch, I wound it round my hand as I descended the slab 
of rock towards the fish. Alarmed at my approach, or feeling 
the vibration of the cord, the fish suddenly galvanized into life, 
and with a mighty splash dashed upstream. Caught at a 
disadvantage, I had no time to brace my feet on the sloping and 
slippery rock, but was jerked headlong into the pool. 

I have a great distaste for going over my depth in these 
submontane rivers, for the thought of being encircled by a 
hungry python is very repugnant to me, and I am glad there 
were no witnesses to the manner in which I floundered out of 
that pool. I had just scrambled out on the far side, with the fish 
still attached to my right hand, when the men I had instructed 
to follow me arrived. Handing the fish over to them to take 
down to our camp on the bank of the river, I went on ahead to 
change and get my camera ready. 

I had no means of weighing the fish and at a rough guess both 
the men and I put it at 50 lb. 

The weight of the fish is immaterial, for weights are soon 
forgotten. Not so forgotten are the surroundings in which the 
sport is indulged in. The steel blue of the fern-fringed pool 
where the water rests a little before cascading over rock and 
shingle to draw breath again in another pool more beautiful 
than the one just left— the flash of the gaily-coloured kingfisher 
as he breaks the surface of the water, shedding a shower of 



diamonds from his wings as he rises with a chirp of delight, a 
silver minnow held firmly in his vermilion bill— the belling of 
the sambur and the clear tuneful call of the chital apprising the 
jungle folk that the tiger, whose pug marks show wet on the 
sand where a few minutes before he crossed the river, is out in 
search of his dinner. These are things that will not be forgotten 
and will live in my memory, the lodestone to draw me back to 
that beautiful valley, as yet unspoiled by the hand of man. 



The Kanda Man-Eater 

HOWEVER little faith we have in the superstitions we share 
with others— thirteen at a table, the passing of wine at dinner, 
walking under a ladder, and so on— our own private 
superstitions, though a source of amusement to our friends, are 
very real to us. 

I do not know if sportsmen are more superstitious than the 
rest of mankind, but I do know that they take their 
superstitions very seriously. One of my friends invariably takes 
five cartridges, never more and never less, when he goes out 
after big game, and another as invariably takes seven 
cartridges. Another, who incidentally was the best-known big- 
game sportsman in Northern India, never started the winter 
shooting season without first killing a mahseer. My own private 
superstition concerns snakes. When after man-eaters I have a 
deep rooted conviction that, however much I may try, all my 
efforts will be unavailing until I have first killed a snake. 

During the hottest days of one May I had from dawn to dark 
climbed innumerable miles up and down incredibly steep hills, 
and through thick thorn bushes that had left my hands and 
knees a mass of ugly scratches, in search of a very wary man- 
eater. I returned on that fifteenth evening, dog-tired, to the 
two-roomed Forest Bungalow I was staying at to find a 
deputation of villagers waiting for me with the very welcome 
news that the man-eater, a tiger, had been seen that day on the 
outskirts of their village. It was too late to do anything that 
night, so the deputation were provided with lanterns and sent 
home with strict injunctions that no one was to leave the 
village the following day. 

The village was situated at the extreme end of the ridge on 
which the bungalow was, and because of its isolated position 
and the thick forest that surrounded it, had suffered more from 
the depredations of the tiger than any other village in the 
district. The most recent victims were two women and a man. 



I had made one complete circle of the village the following 
morning and had done the greater part of a second circle, a 
quarter of a mile below the first, when after negotiating a 
difficult scree of shale I came on a little nullah made by the 
rush of rain-water down the steep hillside. A glance up and 
down the nullah satisfied me that the tiger was not in it, and 
then a movement just in front of me, and about twenty-five feet 
away, caught my eye. At this spot there was a small pool of 
water the size of a bath-tub, and on the far side of it was a 
snake that had evidently been drinking. The lifting of the 
snake's head had caught my eye and it was not until the head 
had been raised some two or three feet from the ground and 
the hood expanded that I realized it was a hamadryad. It was 
the most beautiful snake I had ever seen. The throat, as it faced 
me, was a deep orange red shading to golden yellow where the 
body met the ground. The back, olive green, was banded by 
ivory-coloured chevrons, and some four feet of its length from 
the tip of its tail upwards was shiny black, with white chevrons. 
In length the snake was between thirteen and fourteen feet. 

One hears many tales about hamadryads, their aggressiveness 
when disturbed, and the speed at which they can travel. If, as it 
seemed about to do, the snake attacked, up or down hill I 
should be at a disadvantage, but across the shale scree I felt 
that I could hold my own. A shot at the expanded hood, the size 
of a small plate, would have ended the tension, but the rifle in 
my hands was a heavy one and I had no intention of disturbing 
the tiger that had showed up after so many days of weary 
waiting and toil. After an interminably long minute, during 
which time the only movement was the flicking in and out of a 
long and quivering forked tongue, the snake closed his hood, 
lowered his head to the ground and, turning, made off up the 
opposite slope. Without taking my eyes off him I groped with 
my hand on the hillside and picked up a stone that filled my 
hand as comfortably as a cricket ball. The snake had just 
reached a sharp ridge of hard clay when the stone, launched 
with the utmost energy I was capable of, struck it on the back 



of the head. The blow would have killed any other snake 
outright but the only and very alarming, effect it had on the 
hamadryad was to make it whip round and come straight 
towards me. A second and a larger stone fortunately caught it 
on the neck when it had covered half the distance between us, 
and after that the rest was easy. With a great feeling of 
satisfaction I completed the second circle round the village, 
and though it proved as fruitless as the first, I was elated at 
having killed the snake. Now, for the first time in many days, I 
had a feeling that my search for the man-eater would be 
successful. 

The following day I again searched the forest surrounding the 
village, and towards evening found the fresh pug marks of the 
tiger at the edge of a ploughed field overlooking the village. 

The occupants of the village, numbering about a hundred, were 
by now thoroughly alarmed, and leaving them with the 
assurance that I would return early next day I set out on my 
lonely four-mile walk back to the Forest Bungalow. 

To walk with safety through forests or along deserted roads in 
an area in which a man-eater is operating calls for the utmost 
caution and the strict observance of many rules. It is only when 
the hunter has repeatedly been the hunted that the senses can 
be attuned to the required pitch, and those rules be strictly 
adhered to, the breaking of which would provide the man-eater 
with an easy victim. 

The reader may ask, 'Why a lonely walk? 1 , when I probably had 
men and to spare with me in camp. My answer to this very 
natural question would be: first, because one is apt to get 
careless and rely too much on one's companions, and second, 
because in a mix-up with a tiger one has a better chance when 
one is alone. 

The next morning, as I approached the village, I saw an eager 
throng of men waiting for me, and when within earshot I was 
greeted with the gratifying news that a buffalo had been killed 
during the night. The animal had been killed in the village, and 



after being dragged some distance along the ridge had been 
taken down into a narrow, deep, and very heavily wooded 
valley on the north face of the hill. 

A very careful reconnaissance from a projecting rock on the 
ridge satisfied me that an approach down the steep hill, along 
the line of the drag, would not be advisable, and that the only 
thing to do was to make a wide detour, enter the valley from 
the lower end and work up to the spot where I expected to find 
the kill. 

This manoeuvre was successfully accomplished, and by midday 
I had arrived at the spot— marked from above— where the 
valley flattened out for a hundred yards before going straight 
up three hundred yards to the ridge above. It was at the upper 
end of this flat bit of ground that I expected to find the kill, and 
with luck, the tiger. The long and difficult climb up the valley 
through dense thickets of thorn bush and stunted bamboo had 
brought out a bath of sweat, and as it was not advisable to take 
on a job where quick firing might be necessary with sweaty 
hands, I sat down for a much-needed rest and for a smoke. 

The ground in front of me was strewn with large smooth 
boulders among which a tiny stream meandered, forming 
wherever possible small crystal-clear pools. Shod with the 
thinnest of rubber-soled shoes, the going over these boulders 
was ideal for my purpose, and when I had cooled and dried I 
set off to stalk the kill in the hope of finding the tiger lying 
asleep near it. When three-quarters of the ground had been 
covered I caught sight of the kill tucked away under a bank of 
ferns, and about twenty-five yards away from where the hill 
went steeply up to the ridge. The tiger was not in sight, and, 
very cautiously drawing level with the kill I took up my position 
on a flat boulder to scan every inch of ground visible. 

The premonition of impending danger is too well known and 
established a fact to need any comment. For three or four 
minutes I had stood perfectly still with no thought of danger 
and then all at once I became aware that the tiger was looking 



at me at a very short range. The same sense that had conveyed 
the feeling of impending danger to me had evidently operated 
in the same way on the tiger and awakened him from his sleep. 
To my left front were some dense bushes, growing on a bit of 
flat ground. On these bushes, distant fifteen to twenty feet from 
me, and about the same distance from the kill, my interest 
centred. Presently the bushes were gently stirred and the next 
second I caught sight of the tiger going at full speed up the 
steep hillside. Before I could get the rifle to bear on him he 
disappeared behind a creeper-covered tree, and it was not until 
he had covered about sixty yards that I again saw him, as he 
was springing up the face of a rock. At my shot he fell 
backwards and came roaring down the hill, bringing an 
avalanche of stones with him. A broken back, I concluded; and 
just as I was wondering how best to deal with him when he 
should arrive all-of-a-heap at my feet, the roaring ceased, and 
the next minute, as much to my relief as to my disappointment, 

I saw him going fullout, and apparently unwounded, across the 
side of the hill. The momentary glimpses I caught of him 
offered no shot worth taking, and with a crash through some 
dry bamboos he disappeared round the shoulder of the hill into 
the next valley. 

I subsequently found that my bullet, fired at an angle of 
seventy-five degrees, had hit the tiger on the left elbow and 
chipped out a section from that bone which some cynical 
humourist has named the 'funny bone'. Carrying on, the bullet 
had struck the rock and, splashing back, had delivered a 
smashing blow on the point of the jaw. Neither wound, however 
painful it may have been, was fatal, and the only result of my 
following up the very light blood trail into the next valley was 
to be growled at from a dense thorn thicket, to enter which 
would have been suicidal. 

My shot had been heard in the village and an expectant crowd 
were waiting for me on the ridge. They were even more 
disappointed, if that were possible, than I was at the failure of 
my carefully planned and as carefully executed stalk. 



On visiting the kill the following morning I was very pleased 
and not a little surprised to find that the tiger had returned to 
it during the night and taken a light meal. The only way now of 
getting a second shot was to sit up over the kill; and here a 
difficulty presented itself. There were no suitable trees within 
convenient distance of the kill, and the very unpleasant 
experience I had had on a former occasion had effectively 
cured me of sitting at night on the ground for a man-eater. 
While still undecided where to sit I heard the tiger call, some 
distance down the valley up which I had climbed the previous 
day. The calling of the tiger offered me a very welcome chance 
of shooting it in the most pleasant way it is possible of bringing 
one of these animals to bag. The conditions under which a tiger 
can be called up are (a) when rampaging through the forest in 
search of a mate, and (b) when lightly wounded. It goes without 
saying that the sportsman must be able to call sufficiently well 
to deceive the tiger, and that the call must come from a spot to 
which the tiger will quite naturally come— a dense thicket, or a 
patch of heavy grass— and that the sportsman must be 
prepared to take his shot at a very close range. I am quite 
certain that many sportsmen will be sceptical of the statement 
I have made that a lightly wounded tiger will come to a call. I 
would ask all such to reserve their judgement until they have 
tried to experiment for themselves. On the present occasion, 
however, though the tiger answered me, call for call, for 
upwards of an hour, he refused to come any nearer, and I 
attributed my failure to the fact that I was calling from the spot 
where the previous day the tiger had met with an unfortunate 
experience. 

The tree I finally selected was growing on the very edge of a 
perpendicular bank and had a convenient branch about eight 
feet from the ground. When sitting on this branch I should be 
thirty feet from, and directly above, the boulder-strewn ravine 
up which I expected the tiger to come. The question of the tree 
settled, I returned to the ridge where I had instructed my men 
to meet me with breakfast. 



By four o'clock in the evening I was comfortably seated on the 
branch and prepared for a long and a hard sit-up. Before 
leaving my men I had instructed them to cooee to me from the 
ridge at sunrise next morning. If I answered with the call of a 
leopard they were to sit tight, but if they received no answer, 
they were to form two parties with as many villagers as they 
could collect and come down on either side of the valley, 
shouting and throwing stones. 

I have acquired the habit of sleeping in any position on a tree, 
and as I was tired the evening did not pass unpleasantly. As the 
setting sun was gilding the hilltops above me I was roused to 
full consciousness by the alarm-call of a langur. I soon located 
the monkey, sitting in a tree-top on the far side of the valley, 
and as it was looking in my direction I concluded it had 
mistaken me for a leopard. The alarm-call was repeated at 
short intervals, and finally ceased as darkness came on. 

Hour after hour I strained my eyes and ears, and was suddenly 
startled by a stone rolling down the hillside and striking my 
tree. The stone was followed by the stealthy padding of a heavy, 
soft-footed animal, unmistakably the tiger. At first I comforted 
myself with the thought that his coming in this direction, 
instead of up the valley, was accidental, but this thought was 
soon dispelled when he started to emit low deep growls from 
immediately behind me. Quite evidently he had come into the 
valley while I was having breakfast, and, taking up a position 
on the hill, where the monkey had later seen him, had watched 
me climbing into the tree. Here was a situation I had not 
counted on and one that needed careful handling. The branch 
that had provided a comfortable seat while daylight lasted, 
admitted of little change of position in the dark. I could, of 
course, have fired off my rifle into the air, but the terrible 
results I have seen following an attempt to drive away a tiger 
at very close quarters by discharging a gun dissuaded me from 
taking this action. Further, even if the tiger had not attacked, 
the discharge of the rifle (a 450/400) so near him would 
probably have made him leave the locality and all my toil would 



have gone for nothing. 

I knew the tiger would not spring for that would have carried 
him straight down a drop of thirty feet on to the rocks below. 
But there was no need for him to spring, for by standing on his 
hind legs he could easily reach me. Lifting the rifle off my lap 
and reversing it, I pushed the barrel between my left arm and 
side, depressing the muzzle and slipping up the safety-catch as 
I did so. This movement was greeted by a deeper growl than 
any that had preceded it. If the tiger now reached up for me he 
would in all probability come in contact with the rifle, round 
the triggers, of which my fingers were crooked, and even if I 
failed to kill him the confusion following on my shot would give 
me a sporting cha nee of climbing higher into the tree. Time 
dragged by on leaden feet, and, eventually, tiring of prowling 
about the hillside and growling, the tiger sprang across a little 
ravine on my left and a few minutes later I heard the welcome 
sound of a bone being cracked at the kill. At last I was able to 
relax in my uncomfortable position and the only sounds I heard 
for the rest of the night came from the direction of the kill. 

The sun had been up but a few minutes and the valley was still 
in deep shadow when my men cooeed from the ridge, and 
almost immediately afterwards I caught sight of the tiger 
making off at a fast canter up, and across, the hill on my left. In 
the uncertain light and with my nightlong-strained eyes the 
shot was a very difficult one, but I took it, and had the 
satisfaction of seeing the bullet going home. Turning with a 
great roar, he came straight for my tree, and as he was in the 
act of springing the second bullet, with great good fortune, 
crashed into his chest. Diverted in his spring by the impact of 
the heavy bullet, the tiger struck the tree just short of me, and 
ricochetting off it went headlong into the valley below, where 
his fall was broken by one of the small pools already alluded to. 
He floundered out of the water, leaving it dyed red with his 
blood, and went lumbering down the valley and out of sight. 

Fifteen hours on the hard branch had cramped every muscle in 



my body and it was not until I had swarmed down the tree, 
staining my clothes in the great gouts of blood the tiger had 
left on it, and had massaged my stiff limbs, that I was able to 
follow him. He had gone but a short distance, and I found him 
lying dead at the foot of a rock in another pool of water. 

Contrary to my orders the men, collected on the ridge, hearing 
my shot and the tiger's roar followed by a second shot, came in 
a body down the hill. Arrived at the bloodstained tree, at the 
foot of which my soft hat was lying, they not unnaturally 
concluded I had been carried off by the tiger. Hearing their 
shouts of alarm I called out to them, and again they came 
running down the valley, only to be brought up with a gasp of 
dismay when they saw my blood-stained clothes. Reassured 
that I was not injured and that the blood on my clothes was not 
mine, a moment later they were crowding round the tiger. A 
stout sapling was soon cut and lashed to him with creepers, 
and the tiger, with -no little difficulty and a great deal of 
shouting, was carried up the steep hill to the village. 

In remote areas in which long-established man-eaters are 
operating, many gallant acts of heroism are performed, which 
the local inhabitants accept as everyday occurrences and the 
outside world have no means of hearing about. I should like to 
put on record one such act concerning the Kanda man-eater's 
last human victim. I arrived on the scene shortly after the 
occurrence, and from details supplied by the villagers and from 
a careful examination of the ground, which had not been 
disturbed in the interval, I am able to present you with a story 
which I believe to be correct in every detail. 

In the village near which I shot the Kanda man-eater lived an 
elderly man and his only son. The father had served in the army 
during the 1914-18 war and it was his ambition to get his son 
enlisted in the Royal Garhwal Rifles— not as simple a job in the 
'piping days of peace', when vacancies were few and applicants 
many, as it is today. Shortly after the lad's eighteenth birthday 
a party of men passed through the village on their way to the 



bazaar at Lansdowne. The lad joined this party and 
immediately on arrival at Lansdowne presented himself at the 
Recruiting Office. As his father had taught him to salute with 
military precision and how to conduct himself in the presence 
of a Recruiting Officer, he was accepted without any hesitation, 
and, after enrolment, was given leave to deposit his few 
personal possessions at home before starting his army training. 

He arrived back home at about midday, after an absence of five 
days, and was told by the friends who thronged round him to 
hear his news that his father was away ploughing their small 
holding at the extreme end of the village and would not return 
before nightfall. (The field that was being ploughed was the 
same one on which I had seen the pug marks of the man-eater 
the day I killed the hamadryad.) 

One of the lad's jobs had been to provide fodder for their cattle, 
and after he had partaken of the midday meal in a neighbour's 
house he set out with a party of twenty men to collect leaves. 

The village, as I have told you, is situated on a ridge, and is 
surrounded by forests. Two women had already been killed by 
the man-eater while cutting grass in these forests, and for 
several months the cattle had been kept alive on leaves cut 
from the trees surrounding the village. Each day the men had 
to go further afield to get their requirements, and on this 
particular day the party of twenty-one, after crossing the 
cultivated land, went for a quarter of a mile down a very steep 
rocky hill to the head of the valley which runs east for eight 
miles, through dense forest, to where it meets the Ramganga 
river opposite the Dhikala Forest Bungalow. 

Went headlong into the valley below: Illustrated by Neville 
Dear from the 1985 Reader Digest book of condensed stories 
Great Stories of Men and the Animal World 

At the head of the valley the ground is more or less flat and 
overgrown with big trees. Here the men separated, each 
climbing into a tree of his choice, and after cutting the quantity 



of leaves required they tied them into bundles with rope 
brought for the purpose, and returned to the village in twos 
and threes. 

Either when the party of men were coming down the hill, 
talking at the tops of their voices to keep up their courage and 
scare away the man-eater, or when they were on the trees 
shouting to each other, the tiger, who was lying up in a dense 
patch of cover half a mile down the valley, heard them. Leaving 
the cover, in which it had four days previously killed and eaten 
a sambur hind, the tiger crossed a stream and by way of a 
cattle track that runs the entire length of the valley hurried up 
in the direction of the men. (The speed at which a tiger has 
travelled over any ground on which he has left signs of his 
passage can be easily determined from the relative position of 
his fore and hind pug marks.) 

The lad of my story had selected a Bauhinea tree from which to 
cut leaves for his cattle. This tree was about twenty yards 
above the cattle track, and the upper branches were leaning 
out over a small ravine in which there were two rocks. From a 
bend in the cattle track the tiger saw the lad on the tree, and 
after lying down and watching him for some time it left the 
track and concealed itself behind a fallen silk cotton tree some 
thirty yards from the ravine. When the lad had cut all the 
leaves he needed he descended from the tree and collected 
them in a heap, preparatory to tying them into a bundle. While 
doing this on the open flat ground he was comparatively safe, 
but unfortunately he had noticed that two of the branches he 
had cut had fallen into the ravine between the two big rocks, 
and he sealed his fate by stepping down into the ravine to 
recover them. As soon as he was out of sight the tiger left the 
shelter of the fallen tree and crept forward to the edge of the 
ravine, and as the lad was stooping down to pick up the 
branches, it sprang on him and killed him. Whether the killing 
took place while the other men were still on the trees, or after 
they had left, it was not possible for me to determine. 



The father of the lad returned to the village at sunset and was 
greeted with the very gratifying news that his son had been 
accepted for the army and that he had returned from 
Lansdowne on short leave. Asking where the lad was, he was 
told that he had gone out earlier in the day to get fodder, and 
surprise was expressed that the father had not found him at 
home. After bedding down the bullocks the father went from 
house to house to find his son. All the men who had been out 
that day were questioned in turn, and all had the same tale to 
tell— that they had separated at the head of the valley, and no 
one could remember having seen the lad after that. 

Crossing the terraced cultivated land the father went to the 
edge of the steep hill, and called, and called again, to his son, 
but received no answer. 

Night was by now setting in. The man returned to his home and 
lit a small smoke-dimmed lantern, and as he passed through 
the village he horrified his neighbours by telling them, in reply 
to their questions, that he was going to look for his son. He was 
asked if he had forgotten the man-eater and answered that it 
was because of the man-eater that he was so anxious to find his 
son, for it was possible he had fallen off a tree and injured 
himself and, for fear of attracting the man-eater, had not 
answered to his call. 

He did not ask anyone to accompany him, and no one offered to 
do so, and for the whole of that night he searched up and down 
that valley in which no one had dared to set foot since the 
advent of the man-eater. Four times during the night— as I saw 
from his foot-prints— when going along the cattle track he had 
passed within ten feet of where the tiger was lying eating his 
son. 

Weary and heartsick he climbed a little way up the rocky hill as 
light was coming, and sat down for a rest. From this raised 
position he could see into the ravine. At sunrise he saw a glint 
of blood on the two big rocks, and hurrying down to the spot he 
found all that the tiger had left of his son. These remains he 



collected and took back to his home, and when a suitable 
shroud had been procured, his friends helped him to carry the 
remains to the burning ghat on the banks of the Mandal river. 

I do not think it would be correct to assume that acts such as 
these are performed by individuals who lack imagination and 
who therefore do not realize the grave risks they run. The 
people of our hills, in addition to being very sensitive to their 
environments, are very superstitious, and every hill-top, valley, 
and gorge is credited with possessing a spirit in one form or 
another, all of the evil and malignant kind most to be feared 
during the hours of darkness. A man brought up in these 
surroundings, and menaced for over a year by a man-eater, 
who, unarmed and alone, from sunset to sunrise, could walk 
through dense forests which his imagination peopled with evil 
spirits, and in which he had every reason to believe a man- 
eater was lurking, was in my opinion possessed of a quality and 
a degree of courage that is given to few. All the more do I give 
him credit for his act of heroism for not being conscious that he 
had done anything unusual, or worthy of notice. When at my 
request he sat down near the man-eater to enable me to take a 
photograph, he looked up at me and said, in a quiet and 
collected voice, 'I am content now, sahib, for you have avenged 
my son. 1 

This was the last of the three man-eaters that I had promised 
the District Officials of Kumaon, and later the people of 
Garhwal, that I would do my best to rid them of. 



The Pipal Pani Tiger 

BEYOND the fact that he was born in a ravine running deep 
into the foot-hills and was one of a family of three, I know 
nothing of his early history. 

He was about a year old when, attracted by the calling of a 
chital hind early one November morning, I found his pug marks 
in the sandy bed of a little stream known locally as Pipal Pani. I 
thought at first that he had strayed from his mother's care, but, 
as week succeeded week and his single tracks showed on the 
game paths of the forest, I came to the conclusion that the near 
approach of the breeding season was an all-sufficient reason 
for his being alone. Jealously guarded one day, protected at the 
cost of the parent life if necessary, and set adrift the next, is the 
lot of all jungle folk; nature's method of preventing inbreeding. 

That winter he lived on peafowl, kakar, small pig and an 
occasional chital hind, making his home in a prostrate giant of 
the forest felled for no apparent reason, and hollowed out by 
time and porcupines. Here he brought most of his kills, 
basking, when the days were cold, on the smooth bole of the 
tree, where many a leopard had basked before him. 

It was not until January was well advanced that I saw the cub 
at close quarters. I was out one evening without any definite 
object in view, when I saw a crow rise from the ground and 
wipe its beak as it lit on the branch of a tree. Crows, vultures 
and magpies always interest me in the jungle, and many are 
the kills I have found both in India and in Africa with the help 
of these birds. On the present occasion the crow led me to the 
scene of an overnight tragedy. A chital had been killed and 
partly eaten and, attracted to the spot probably as I had been, 
a party of men passing along the road, distant some fifty yards, 
had cut up and removed the remains. All that was left of the 
chital were a few splinters of bone and a little congealed blood 
off which the crow had lately made his meal. The absence of 
thick cover and the proximity of the road convinced me that the 
animal responsible for the kill had not witnessed the removal 



and that it would return in due course; so I decided to sit up, 
and made myself as comfortable in a plum tree as the thorns 
permitted. 

I make no apology to you, my reader, if you differ with me on 
the ethics of the much-debated subject of sitting up over kills. 
Some of my most pleasant shikar memories centre round the 
hour or two before sunset that I have spent in a tree over a 
natural kill, ranging from the time when, armed with a muzzle- 
loader whipped round with brass wire to prevent the cracked 
barrel from bursting, I sat over a langur killed by a leopard, to 
a few days ago, when with the most modern rifle across my 
knees, I watched a tigress and her two full-grown cubs eat up 
the sambur stag they had killed, and counted myself no poorer 
for not having secured a trophy. 

True, on the present occasion there is no kill below me, but, for 
the reasons given, that will not affect any chance of a shot; 
scent to interest the jungle folk there is in plenty in the 
bloodsoaked ground, as witness the old grey-whiskered boar 
who has been quietly rooting along for the past ten minutes, 
and who suddenly stiffens to attention as he comes into the line 
of the blood-tainted wind. His snout held high, and worked as 
only a pig can work that member, tells him more than I was 
able to glean from the ground which showed no tracks; his 
method of approach, a short excursion to the right and back 
into the wind, and then a short excursion to the left and again 
back into the wind, each manoeuvre bringing him a few yards 
nearer, indicates the chital was killed by a tiger. Making sure 
once and again that nothing worth eating has been left, he 
finally trots off and disappears from view. 

Two chital, both with horns in velvet, now appear and from the 
fact that they are coming down-wind, and making straight for 
the blood-soaked spot, it is evident they were witnesses to the 
overnight tragedy. Alternately snuffing the ground, or standing 
rigid with every muscle tensed for instant flight, they satisfy 
their curiosity and return the way they came. 



Curiosity is not a human monopoly; many an animal's life is cut 
short by indulging in it. A dog leaves the verandah, to bark at a 
shadow, a deer leaves the herd to investigate a tuft of grass 
that no wind agitated, and the waiting leopard is provided with 
a meal. 

The sun is nearing the winter line when a movement to the 
right front attracts attention. An animal has crossed an opening 
between two bushes at the far end of a wedge of scrub that 
terminates thirty yards from my tree. Presently the bushes at 
my end part, and out into the open, with never a look to right 
or left, steps the cub. Straight up to the spot where his kill had 
been he goes, his look of expectancy giving place to one of 
disappointment as he realizes that his chital, killed, possibly, 
after hours of patient stalking, is gone. The splinters of bone 
and congealed blood are rejected, and his interest centres on a 
tree stump lately used as a butcher's block, to which some 
shreds of flesh are adhering. I was not the only one who carried 
fire-arms in these jungles and, if the cub was to grow into a 
tiger, it was necessary he should be taught the danger of 
carelessly approaching kills in daylight. A scatter-gun and dust- 
shot would have served my purpose better, but the rifle will 
have to do this time; and, as he raises his head to smell the 
stump, my bullet crashes into the hard wood an inch from his 
nose. Only once in the years that followed did the cub forget 
that lesson. 

The following winter I saw him several times. His ears did not 
look so big now and he had changed his baby hair for a coat of 
rich tawny red with well-defined stripes. The hollow tree had 
been given up to its rightful owners a pair of leopards, new 
quarters found in a thick belt of scrub skirting the foot-hills, 
and young sambur added to his menu. 

On my annual descent from the hills next winter, the familiar 
pug marks no longer showed on the game paths and at the 
drinking places, and for several weeks I thought the cub had 
abandoned his old haunts and gone further afield. Then one 



morning his absence was explained for, side by side with his 
tracks, were the smaller and more elongated tracks of the mate 
he had gone to find. I only once saw the tigers, for the cub was 
a tiger now, together. I had been out before dawn to try to bag 
a serow that lived on the foot-hills, and returning along a fire 
track my attention was arrested by a vulture, perched on the 
dead limb of a sal tree. 

The bird had his back towards me and was facing a short 
stretch of scrub with dense jungle beyond. Dew was still heavy 
on the ground, and without a sound I reached the tree and 
peered round. One antler of a dead sambur, for no living deer 
would lie in that position, projected above the low bushes. A 
convenient moss-covered rock afforded my rubbershod feet 
silent and safe hold, and as I drew myself erect, the sambur 
came into full view. The hind quarters had been eaten away 
and, lying on either side of the kill, were the pair, the tiger 
being on the far side with only his hind legs showing. Both 
tigers were asleep. Ten feet straight in front, to avoid a dead 
branch, and thirty feet to the left would give me a shot at the 
tiger's neck, but in planning the stalk I had forgotten the silent 
spectator. Where I stood I was invisible to him, but before the 
ten feet had been covered I came into view and, alarmed at my 
near proximity, he flapped off his perch, omitting as he did so 
to notice a thin creeper dependent from a branch above him 
against which he collided, and came ignominiously to ground. 
The tigress was up and away in an instant, clearing at a bound 
the kill and her mate, the tiger not being slow to follow; a 
possible shot, but too risky with thick jungle ahead where a 
wounded animal would have all the advantages. To those who 
have never tried it, I can recommend the stalking of leopards 
and tigers on their kills as a most pleasant form of sport. Great 
care should however be taken over the shot, for if the animal is 
not killed outright, or anchored, trouble is bound to follow. 

A week later the tiger resumed his bachelor existence. A 
change had now come over his nature. Hitherto he had not 
objected to my visiting his kills but, after his mate left, at the 



first drag I followed up I was given very clearly to understand 
that no liberties would in future be permitted. The angry growl 
of a tiger at close quarters, than which there is no more 
terrifying sound in the jungles, has to be heard to be 
appreciated. 

Early in March the tiger killed his first full-grown buffalo. I was 
near the foot-hills one evening when the agonized bellowing of 
a buffalo, mingled with the angry roar of a tiger, rang through 
the forest. I located the sound as coming from a ravine about 
six hundred yards away. The going was bad, mostly over loose 
rocks and through thorn bushes, and when I crawled up a steep 
bluff commanding a view of the ravine the buffalo's struggles 
were over, and the tiger nowhere to be seen. For an hour I lay 
with finger on trigger without seeing anything of the tiger. At 
dawn next morning I again crawled up the bluff, to find the 
buffalo lying just as I had left her. The soft ground, torn up by 
hoof and claw, testified to the desperate nature of the struggle 
and it was not until the buffalo had been hamstrung that the 
tiger had finally succeeded in pulling her down, in a fight which 
had lasted from ten to fifteen minutes. The tiger's tracks led 
across the ravine and, on following them up, I found a long 
smear of blood on a rock, and, a hundred yards further on, 
another smear on a fallen tree. The wound inflicted by the 
buffalo's horns was in the tiger's head and sufficiently severe to 
make the tiger lose all interest in the kill, for he never returned 
to it. 

Three years later the tiger, disregarding the lesson received 
when a cub (his excuse may have been that it was the close 
season for tigers), incautiously returned to a kill, over which a 
zamindar and some of his tenants were sitting at night, and 
received a bullet in the shoulder which fractured the bone. No 
attempt was made to follow him up, and thirty-six hours later, 
his shoulder covered with a swarm of flies, he limped through 
the compound of the Inspection Bungalow, crossed a bridge 
flanked on the far side by a double row of tenanted houses, the 
occupants of which stood at their doors to watch him pass. 



entered the gate of a walled-in compound and took possession 
of a vacant godown. Twenty-four hours later, possibly alarmed 
by the number of people who had collected from neighbouring 
villages to see him, he left the compound the way he had 
entered it, passed our gate, and made his way to the lower end 
of our village. A bullock belonging to one of our tenants had 
died the previous night and had been dragged into some 
bushes at the edge of the village; this the tiger found, and here 
he remained a few days, quenching his thirst at an irrigation 
furrow. 

When we came down from the hills two months later the tiger 
was living on small animals (calves, sheep, goats, etc.) that he 
was able to catch on the outskirts of the village. By March his 
wound had healed, leaving his right foot turned inwards. 
Returning to the forest where he had been wounded, he levied 
heavy toll on the village cattle, taking, for safety's sake, but one 
meal off each and in this way killing five times as many as he 
would ordinarily have done. The zamindar who had wounded 
him and who had a herd of some four hundred head of cows 
and buffaloes was the chief sufferer. 

In the succeeding years he gained as much in size as in 
reputation, and many were the attempts made by sportsmen, 
and others, to bag him. 

One November evening, a villager, armed with a single-barrel 
muzzle-loading gun, set out to try to bag a pig, selecting for his 
ground machan an isolated bush growing in a twenty-yard-wide 
rowkah (dry watercourse) running down the centre of some 
broken ground. This ground was rectangular, flanked on the 
long sides by cultivated land and on the short sides by a road, 
and by a ten-foot canal that formed the boundary between our 
cultivation and the forest. In front of the man was a four-foot- 
high bank with a cattle track running along the upper edge; 
behind him a patch of dense scrub. At 8 p.m. an animal 
appeared on the track and, taking what aim he could, he fired. 
On receiving the shot the animal fell off the bank, and passed 



within a few feet of the man, grunting as it entered the scrub 
behind. Casting aside his blanket, the man ran to his hut two 
hundred yards away. Neighbours soon collected and, on 
hearing the man's account, came to the conclusion that a pig 
had been hard hit. It would be a pity, they said, to leave the pig 
for hyenas and jackals to eat, so a lantern was lit and as a party 
of six bold spirits set out to retrieve the bag, one of my tenants 
(who declined to join the expedition, and who confessed to me 
later that he had no stomach for looking for wounded pig in 
dense scrub in the dark) suggested that the gun should be 
loaded and taken. 

His suggestion was accepted and, as a liberal charge of powder 
was being rammed home, the wooden ramrod jammed and 
broke inside the barrel. A trivial accident which undoubtedly 
saved the lives of six men. The broken rod was eventually and 
after great trouble extracted, the gun loaded, and the party set 
off. 

Arrived at the spot where the animal had entered the bushes, a 
careful search was made and, on blood being found, every 
effort to find the 'pig' was made; it was not until the whole area 
had been combed out that the quest for that night was finally 
abandoned. Early next morning the search was resumed, with 
the addition of my informant of weak stomach, who was a 
better woodsman than his companions and who, examining the 
ground under a bush where there was a lot of blood, collected 
and brought some blood-stained hairs to me which I recognized 
as tiger's hairs, A brother sportsman was with me for the day 
and together we went to have a look at the ground. 

The reconstruction of jungle events from signs on the ground 
has always held great interest for me. True, one's deductions 
are sometimes wrong, but they are also sometimes right. In the 
present instance I was right in placing the wound in the inner 
forearm of the right foreleg, but was wrong in assuming the leg 
had been broken and that the tiger was a young animal and a 
stranger to the locality. 



There was no blood beyond the point where the hairs had been 
found and, as tracking on the hard ground was impossible, I 
crossed the canal to where the cattle track ran through a bed 
of sand. Here from the pug marks I found that the wounded 
animal was not a young tiger as I had assumed, but my old 
friend the Pipal Pani tiger who, when taking a short cut 
through the village, had in the dark been mistaken for a pig. 

Once before when badly wounded he had passed through the 
settlement without harming man or beast, but he was older 
now, and if driven by pain and hunger might do considerable 
damage. A disconcerting prospect, for the locality was thickly 
populated, and I was due to leave within the week, to keep an 
engagement that could not be put off. 

For three days I searched every bit of the jungle between the 
canal and the foot-hills, an area of about four square miles, 
without finding any trace of the tiger. On the fourth afternoon, 
as I was setting out to continue the search, I met an old woman 
and her son hurriedly leaving the jungle. From them I learnt 
that the tiger was calling near the foot-hills and that all the 
cattle in the jungle had stampeded. When out with a rifle I 
invariably go alone; it is safer in a mix-up, and one can get 
through the jungle more silently. However, I stretched a point 
on this occasion, and let the boy accompany me since he was 
very keen on showing me where he had heard the tiger. 

Arrived at the foot-hills, the boy pointed to a dense bit of cover, 
bounded on the far side by the fire-track to which I have 
already referred, and on the near side by the Pipal Pani stream. 
Running parallel to and about a hundred yards from the stream 
was a shallow depression some twenty feet wide, more or less 
open on my side and fringed with bushes on the side nearer the 
stream. A well-used path crossed the depression at right 
angles. Twenty yards from the path, and on the open side of the 
depression, was a small tree. If the tiger came down the path 
he would in all likelihood stand for a shot on clearing the 
bushes. Here I decided to take my stand and, putting the boy 



into the tree with his feet on a level with my head and 
instructing him to signal with his toes if from his raised 
position he saw the tiger before I did, I put my back to the tree 
and called. 

You, who have spent as many years in the jungle as I have, 
need no description of the call of a tigress in search of a mate, 
and to you less fortunate ones I can only say that the call, to 
acquire which necessitates close observation and the liberal 
use of throat salve, cannot be described in words. 

To my great relief, for I had crawled through the jungle for 
three days with finger on trigger, I was immediately answered 
from a distance of about five hundred yards, and for half an 
hour thereafter— it may have been less and certainly appeared 
more— the call was tossed back and forth. On the one side the 
urgent summons of the king, and on the other, the subdued and 
coaxing answer of his handmaiden. Twice the boy signalled, but 
I had as yet seen nothing of the tiger, and it was not until the 
setting sun was flooding the forest with golden light that he 
suddenly appeared, coming down the path at a fast walk with 
never a pause as he cleared the bushes. When half-way across 
the depression, and just as I was raising the rifle, he turned to 
the right and came straight towards me. 

This manoeuvre, unforeseen when selecting my stand, brought 
him nearer than I had intended he should come and, moreover, 
presented me with a head shot which at that short range I was 
not prepared to take. Resorting to an old device, learned long 
years ago and successfully used on similar occasions, the tiger 
was brought to a stand without being alarmed. With one paw 
poised, he slowly raised his head, exposing as he did so his 
chest and throat. After the impact of the heavy bullet, he 
struggled to his feet and tore blindly through the forest, 
coming down with a crash within a few yards of where, 
attracted by the calling of a chital hind one November morning, 
I had first seen his pug marks. 

It was only then that I found he had been shot under a 



misapprehension, for the wound which I feared might make 
him dangerous proved on examination to be almost healed and 
caused by a pellet of lead having severed a small vein in his 
right forearm. 

Pleasure at having secured a magnificent trophy— he 
measured 10' 3" over curves and his winter coat was in perfect 
condition— was not unmixed with regret, for never again would 
the jungle folk and I listen with held breath to his deep- 
throated call resounding through the foot-hills, and never again 
would his familiar pug marks show on the game paths that he 
and I had trodden for fifteen years. 



The Thak Man-Eater 


I 

PEACE had reigned in the Ladhya valley for many months 
when in September '38 a report was received in Naini Tal that 
a girl, twelve years of age, had been killed by a tiger at Kot 
Kindri village. The report which reached me through Donald 
Stewart of the Forest Department gave no details, and it was 
not until I visited the village some weeks later that I was able 
to get particulars of the tragedy It appeared that, about noon 
one day, this girl was picking up windfalls from a mango tree 
close to and in full view of the village, when a tiger suddenly 
appeared. Before the men working nearby were able to render 
any assistance, it carried her off. No attempt was made to 
follow up the tiger, and as all signs of drag and blood trail had 
been obliterated and washed away long before I arrived on the 
scene, I was unable to find the place where the tiger had taken 
the body to. 

Kot Kindri is about four miles south-west of Chuka, and three 
miles due west of Thak. It was in the valley between Kot Kindri 
and Thak that the Chuka man-eater had been shot the previous 
April. 

During the summer of '38 the Forest Department had marked 
all the trees in this area for felling, and it was feared that if the 
man-eater was not accounted for before November— when the 
felling of the forest was due to start— the contractors would 
not be able to secure labour, and would repudiate their 
contracts. It was in this connexion that Donald Stewart had 
written to me shortly after the girl had been killed, and when in 
compliance with his request I promised to go to Kot Kindri, I 
must confess that it was more in the interests of the local 
inhabitants than in the interest of the contractors that I gave 
my promise. 

My most direct route to Kot Kindri was to go by rail to 
Tanakpur, and from there by foot via Kaldhunga and Chuka. 



This route, however, though it would save me a hundred miles 
of walking, would necessitate my passing through the most 
deadly malaria belt in northern India, and to avoid it I decided 
to go through the hills to Mornaula, and from there along the 
abandoned Sherring road to its termination on the ridge above 
Kot Kindri. 

While my preparations for this long trek were still under way a 
second report reached Naini Tal of a kill at Sem, a small village 
on the left bank of the Ladhya and distant about half a mile 
from Chuka. 

The victim on this occasion was an elderly woman, the mother 
of the Headman of Sem. This unfortunate woman had been 
killed while cutting brushwood on a steep bank between two 
terraced fields. She had started work at the further end of the 
fifty-yard-long bank, and had cut the brushwood to within a 
yard of her hut when the tiger sprang on her from the field 
above. So sudden and unexpected was the attack that the 
woman only had time to scream once before the tiger killed 
her, and taking her up the twelve-foot-high bank crossed the 
upper field and disappeared with her into the dense jungle 
beyond. Her son, a lad some twenty years of age, was at the 
time working in a paddy field a few yards away and witnessed 
the whole occurrence, but was too frightened to try to render 
any assistance. In response to the lad's urgent summons the 
Patwari arrived at Sem two days later, accompanied by eighty 
men he had collected. Following up in the direction the tiger 
had gone, he found the woman's clothes and a few small bits of 
bone. This kill had taken place at 2 p.m. on a bright sunny day, 
and the tiger had eaten its victim only sixty yards from the hut 
where it had killed her. 

On receipt of this second report Ibbotson, Deputy 
Commissioner of the three Districts of Almora, Naini Tal and 
Garhwal, and I held, a council of war, the upshot of which was 
that Ibbotson, who was on the point of setting out to settle a 
land dispute at Askot on the border of Tibet, changed his tour 



programme and, instead of going via Bageshwar, decided to 
accompany me to Sem, and from there go on to Askot. 

The route I had selected entailed a considerable amount of hill¬ 
climbing so we eventually decided to go up the Nandhour 
valley cross the watershed between the Nandhour and Ladhya, 
and follow the latter river down to Sem. The Ibbotsons 
accordingly left Naini Tal on 12th October, and the following 
day I joined them at Chaurgallia. 

Going up the Nandhour and fishing as we went— our best day's 
catch on light trout rods was a hundred and twenty fish— we 
arrived on the fifth day at Durga Pepal. Here we left the river, 
and after a very stiff climb camped for the night on the 
watershed. Making an early start next morning we pitched our 
tents that night on the left bank of the Ladhya, twelve miles 
from Chalti. 

The monsoon had given over early, which was very fortunate 
for us, for owing to the rock cliffs that run sheer down into the 
valley the river has to be crossed every quarter of a mile or so. 
At one of these fords my cook, who stands five feet in his boots, 
was washed away and only saved from a watery grave by the 
prompt assistance of the man who was carrying our lunch 
basket. 

On the tenth day after leaving Chaurgallia we made camp on a 
deserted field at Sem, two hundred yards from the hut where 
the woman had been killed, and a hundred yards from the 
junction of the Ladhya and Sarda rivers. 

Gill Waddell, of the Police, whom we met on our way down the 
Ladhya, had camped for several days at Sem and had tied out a 
buffalo that MacDonald of the Forest Department had very 
kindly placed at our disposal, and though the tiger had visited 
Sem several times during Waddell 1 s stay, it had not killed the 
buffalo. 

The day following our arrival at Sem, while Ibbotson was 
interviewing Patwaris, Forest Guards, and Headmen of the 



surrounding villages, I went out to look for pug marks. Between 
our camp and the junction, and also on both banks of the 
Ladhya, there were long stretches of sand. On this sand I found 
the tracks of a tigress, and of a young male tiger— possibly one 
of the cubs I had seen in April. The tigress had crossed and 
recrossed the Ladhya a number of times during the last few 
days, and the previous night had walked along the strip of sand 
in front of our tents. It was this tigress the villagers suspected 
of being the man-eater, and as she had visited Sem repeatedly 
since the day the Headman's mother had been killed they were 
probably correct. 

An examination of the pug marks of the tigress showed her as 
being an average-sized animal, in the prime of life. Why she 
had become a man-eater would have to be determined later, 
but one of the reasons might have been that she had assisted to 
eat the victims of the Chuka tiger when they were together the 
previous mating season, and having acquired a taste for human 
flesh and no longer having a mate to provide her with it, had 
now turned a man-eater herself. This was only a surmise, and 
proved later to be incorrect. 

Before leaving Naini Tal I had written to the Tahsildar of 
Tanakpur and asked him to purchase four young male buffaloes 
for me, and to send them to Sem. One of these buffaloes died 
on the road, the other three arrived on the 24th , and we tied 
them out the same evening together with the one MacDonald 
had given us. On going out to visit these animals next morning 
I found the people of Chuka in a great state of excitement. The 
fields round the village had been recently ploughed, and the 
tigress the previous night had passed close to three families 
who were sleeping out on the fields with their cattle; 
fortunately in each case the cattle had seen the tigress and 
warned the sleepers of her approach. After leaving the 
cultivated land the tigress had gone up the track in the 
direction of Kot Kindri, and had passed close to two of our 
buffaloes without touching either of them. 



The Patwari, Forest Guards, and villagers had told us on our 
arrival at Sem that it would be a waste of time tying out our 
young buffaloes, as they were convinced the man-eater would 
not kill them. The reason they gave was that this method of 
trying to shoot the man-eater had been tried by others without 
success, and that in any case if the tigress wanted to eat 
buffaloes there were many grazing in the jungles for her to 
choose from. In spite of this advice however we continued to tie 
out our buffaloes, and for the next two nights the tigress 
passed close to one or more of them, without touching them. 

On the morning of the 27th, just as we were finishing 
breakfast, a party of men led by Tewari, the brother of the 
Headman of Thak, arrived in camp and reported that a man of 
their village was missing. They stated that this man had left the 
village at about noon the previous day, telling his wife before 
leaving that he was going to see that his cattle did not stray 
beyond the village boundary, and as he had not returned they 
feared he had been killed by the man-eater. 

Our preparations were soon made, and at ten o'clock the 
Ibbotsons and I set off for Thak, accompanied by Tewari and 
the men he had brought with him. The distance was only about 
two miles but the climb was considerable, and as we did not 
want to lose more time than we could possibly help we arrived 
at the outskirts of the village out of breath, and in a lather of 
sweat. 

As we approached the village over the scrub-covered flat bit of 
ground which I have reason to refer to later, we heard a woman 
crying. The wailing of an Indian woman mourning her dead is 
unmistakable, and on emerging from the jungle we came on the 
mourner— the wife of the missing man— and some ten or 
fifteen men, who were waiting for us on the edge of the 
cultivated land. These people informed us that from their 
houses above they had seen some white object, which looked 
like part of the missing man's clothing, in a field overgrown 
with scrub thirty yards from where we were now standing. 



Ibbotson, Tewari and I set off to investigate the white object, 
while Mrs Ibbotson took the woman and the rest of the men up 
to the village. 

The field, which had been out of cultivation for some years, was 
covered with a dense growth of scrub not unlike 
chrysanthemum, and it was not until we were standing right 
over the white object that Tewari recognized it as the loin-cloth 
of the missing man. Near it was the man's cap. A struggle had 
taken place at this spot, but there was no blood. The absence of 
blood where the attack had taken place and for some 
considerable distance along the drag could be accounted for by 
the tigress having retained her first hold, for no blood would 
flow in such a case until the hold had been changed. 

Thirty yards on the hill above us there was a clump of bushes 
roofed over with creepers. This spot would have to be looked at 
before following up the drag, for it was not advisable to have 
the tigress behind us. In the soft earth under the bushes we 
found the pug marks of the tigress, and where she had lain 
before going forward to attack the man. 

Returning to our starting point we agreed on the following plan 
of action. Our primary object was to try to stalk the tigress and 
shoot her on her kill: to achieve this end I was to follow the 
trail and at the same time keep a lookout in front, with Tewari 
— who was unarmed— a yard behind me keeping a sharp 
lookout to right and left, and Ibbotson a yard behind Tewari to 
safeguard us against an attack from the rear. In the event of 
either Ibbotson or I seeing so much as a hair of the tigress, we 
were to risk a shot. 

Cattle had grazed over this area the previous day, disturbing 
the ground, and as there was no blood and the only indication 
of the tigress's passage was an occasional turned-up leaf or 
crushed blade of grass, progress was slow. After carrying the 
man for two hundred yards the tigress had killed and left him, 
and had returned and carried him off several hours later, when 
the people of Thak had heard several sambur calling in this 



direction. The reason for the tigress not having carried the man 
away after she had killed him was possibly due to his cattle 
having witnessed the attack on him, and driven her away 

A big pool of blood had formed where the man had been lying, 
and as the blood from the wound in his throat had stopped 
flowing by the time the tigress had picked him up again, and 
further, as she was now holding him by the small of the back, 
whereas she had previously held him by the neck, tracking 
became even more difficult. The tigress kept to the contour of 
the hill, and as the undergrowth here was very dense and 
visibility only extended to a few yards, our advance was slowed 
down. In two hours we covered half a mile, and reached a ridge 
beyond which lay the valley in which, six months previously, we 
had tracked down and killed the Chuka man-eater. On this 
ridge was a great slab of rock, which sloped upwards and away 
from the direction in which we had come. The tigress's tracks 
went down to the right of the rock and I felt sure she was lying 
up under the overhanging portion of it, or in the close vicinity. 

Both Ibbotson and I had on light rubber-soled shoes— Tewari 
was bare-footed— and we had reached the rock without making 
a sound. Signing to my two companions to stand still and keep 
a careful watch all round, I got a foothold on the rock, and inch 
by inch went forward. Beyond the rock was a short stretch of 
flat ground, and as more of this ground came into view, I felt 
certain my suspicion that the tigress was lying under the 
projection was correct. I had still a foot or two to go before I 
could look over, when I saw a movement to my left front. A 
golden-rod that had been pressed down had sprung erect, and 
a second later there was a slight movement in the bushes 
beyond, and a monkey in a tree on the far side of the bushes 
started calling. 

The tigress had chosen the spot for her after-dinner sleep with 
great care, but unfortunately for us she was not asleep; and 
when she saw the top of my head— I had removed my hat- 
appearing over the rock, she had risen and, taking a step 



sideways, had disappeared under a tangle of blackberry 
bushes. Had she been lying anywhere but where she was she 
could not have got away no matter how quickly she had moved, 
without my getting a shot at her. Our so-carefully-carried-out 
stalk had failed at the very last moment, and there was nothing 
to be done now but find the kill, and see if there was sufficient 
of it left for us to sit up over. To have followed her into the 
blackberry thicket would have been useless, and would also 
have reduced our chance of getting a shot at her later. 

The tigress had eaten her meal close to where she had been 
lying and as this spot was open to the sky and to the keen eyes 
of vultures she had removed the kill to a place of safety where 
it would not be visible from the air. Tracking now was easy, for 
there was a blood trail to follow. The trail led over a ridge of 
great rocks and fifty yards beyond these rocks we found the 
kill. 

I am not going to harrow your feelings by attempting to 
describe that poor torn and mangled thing; stripped of every 
stitch of clothing and atom of dignity, which only a few hours 
previously had been a Man, the father of two children and the 
breadwinner of the wailing woman who was facing— without 
any illusions— the fate of a widow of India. I have seen many 
similar sights, each more terrible than the one preceding it, in 
the thirty-two years I have been hunting man-eaters, and on 
each occasion I have felt that it would have been better to have 
left the victim to the slayer than recover a mangled mass of 
flesh to be a nightmare ever after to those who saw it. And yet 
the cry of blood for blood, and the burning desire to rid a 
countryside of a menace than which there is none more 
terrible, is irresistible; and then there is always the hope, no 
matter how absurd one knows it to be, that the victim by some 
miracle may still be alive and in need of succour. 

The chance of shooting— over a kill— an animal that has in all 
probability become a man-eater through a wound received over 
a kill, is very remote, and each succeeding failure, no matter 



what its cause, tends to make the animal more cautious, until it 
reaches a state when it either abandons its kill after one meal 
or approaches it as silently and as slowly as a shadow, scanning 
every leaf and twig with the certainty of discovering its would- 
be slayer, no matter how carefully he may be concealed or how 
silent and motionless he may be; a one-in-a-million chance of 
getting a shot, and yet, who is there among us who would not 
take it? 

The thicket into which the tigress had retired was roughly forty 
yards square, and she could not leave it without the monkey 
seeing her and warning us, so we sat down back to back, to 
have a smoke and listen if the jungle had anything further to 
tell us while we considered our next move. 

To make a machan it was necessary to return to the village, and 
during our absence the tigress was almost certain to cany away 
the kill. It had been difficult when she was carrying a whole 
human being to track her, but now, when her burden was 
considerably lighter and she had been disturbed, she would 
probably go for miles and we might never find her kill again, so 
it was necessary for one of us to remain on the spot, while the 
other two went back to the village for ropes. 

Ibbotson, with his usual disregard for danger, elected to go 
back, and while he and Tewari went down the hill to avoid the 
difficult ground we had recently come over, I stepped up on to 
a small tree close to the kill. Four feet above ground the tree 
divided in two, and by leaning on one half and putting my feet 
against the other, I was able to maintain a precarious seat 
which was high enough off the ground to enable me to see the 
tigress if she approached the kill, and also high enough, if she 
had any designs on me, to see her before she got to within 
striking distance. 

Ibbotson had been gone fifteen or twenty minutes when I heard 
a rock tilt forward, and then back. The rock was evidently very 
delicately poised, and when the tigress had put her weight on it 
and felt it tilt forward she had removed her foot and let the 



rock fall back into place. The sound had come from about 
twenty yards to my left front, the only direction in which it 
would have been possible for me to have fired without being 
knocked out of the tree. 

Minutes passed, each pulling my hopes down a little lower from 
the heights to which they had soared, and then, when tension 
on my nerves and the weight of the heavy rifle were becoming 
unbearable, I heard a stick snap at the upper end of the 
thicket. Here was an example of how a tiger can move through 
the jungle. From the sound she had made I knew her exact 
position, had kept my eyes fixed on the spot, and yet she had 
come, seen me, stayed some time watching me, and then gone 
away without my having seen a leaf or a blade of grass move. 

When tension on nerves is suddenly relaxed cramped and 
aching muscles call loudly for ease, and though in this case it 
only meant the lowering of the rifle on to my knees to take the 
strain off my shoulders and arms, the movement, small though 
it was, sent a comforting feeling through the whole of my body. 
No further sound came from the tigress, and an hour or two 
later I heard Ibbotson returning. 

Of all the men I have been on shikar with Ibbotson is by far and 
away the best, for not only has he the heart of a lion, but he 
thinks of everything, and with it all is the most unselfish man 
that carries a gun. He had gone to fetch a rope and he returned 
with rugs, cushions, more hot tea than even I could drink and 
an ample lunch; and while I sat— on the windward side of the 
kill— to refresh myself, Ibbotson put a man in a tree forty yards 
away to distract the tigress's attention, and climbed into a tree 
overlooking the kill to make a rope machan. 

When the machan was ready Ibbotson moved the kill a few feet 
— a very unpleasant job— and tied it securely to the foot of a 
sapling to prevent the tigress carrying it away, for the moon 
was on the wane and the first two hours of the night at this 
heavily wooded spot would be pitch dark. After a final smoke I 
climbed on to the machan, and when I had made myself 



comfortable Ibbotson recovered the man who was making a 
diversion and set off in the direction of Thak to pick up Mrs 
Ibbotson and return to camp at Sem. 

The retreating party were out of sight but were not yet out of 
sound when I heard a heavy body brushing against leaves, and 
at the same moment the monkey which had been silent all this 
time and which I could now see sitting in a tree on the far side 
of the blackberry thicket, started calling. Here was more luck 
than I hoped for, and our ruse of putting a man up a tree to 
cause a diversion appeared to be working as successfully as it 
had done on a previous occasion. A tense minute passed, a 
second, and a third, and then from the ridge where I had 
climbed on to the big slab of rock a kakar came dashing down 
towards me, barking hysterically. The tigress was not coming to 
the kill but had gone off after Ibbotson. I was now in a fever of 
anxiety, for it was quite evident that she had abandoned her kill 
and gone to try to secure another victim. 

Before leaving Ibbotson had promised to take every precaution 
but on hearing the kakar barking on my side of the ridge he 
would naturally assume the tigress was moving in the vicinity 
of the kill, and if he relaxed his precautions the tigress would 
get her chance. Ten very uneasy minutes for me passed, and 
then I heard a second kakar barking in the direction of Thak; 
the tigress was still following, but the ground there was more 
open, and there was less fear of her attacking the party. The 
danger to the Ibbotsons was, however, not over by any means 
for they had to go through two miles of very heavy jungle to 
reach camp; and if they stayed at Thak until sundown listening 
for my shot, which I feared they would do and which as a 
matter of fact they did do, they would run a very grave risk on 
the way down. Ibbotson fortunately realized the danger and 
kept his party close together, and though the tigress followed 
them the whole way— as her pug marks the following morning 
showed— they got back to camp safely. 

The calling of kakar and sambur enabled me to follow the 



movements of the tigress. An hour after sunset she was down 
at the bottom of the valley two miles away She had the whole 
night before her, and though there was only one chance in a 
million of her returning to the kill I determined not to lose that 
chance. Wrapping a rug round me, for it was a bitterly cold 
night, I made myself comfortable in a position in which I could 
remain for hours without movement. 

I had taken my seat on the machan at 4 p.m., and at 10 p.m. I 
heard two animals coming down the hill towards me. It was too 
dark under the trees to see them, but when they got to the lee 
of the kill I knew they were porcupines. Rattling their quills, 
and making the peculiar booming noise that only a porcupine 
can make, they approached the kill and, after walking round it 
several times, continued on their way. An hour later, and when 
the moon had been up some time, I heard an animal in the 
valley below. It was moving from east to west, and when it 
came into the wind blowing downhill from the kill it made a 
long pause, and then came cautiously up the hill. While it was 
still some distance away I heard it snuffing the air, and knew it 
to be a bear. The smell of blood was attracting him, but 
mingled with it was the less welcome smell of a human being, 
and taking no chances he was very carefully stalking the kill. 
His nose, the keenest of any animal's in the jungle, had 
apprised him while he was still in the valley that the kill was 
the property of a tiger. This to a Himalayan bear who fears 
nothing, and who will, as I have on several occasions seen, 
drive a tiger away from its kill, was no deterrent, but what was, 
and what was causing him uneasiness, was the smell of a 
human being mingled with the smell of blood and tiger. 

On reaching the flat ground the bear sat down on his haunches 
a few yards from the kill, and when he had satisfied himself 
that the hated human smell held no danger for him he stood 
erect and turning his head sent a long-drawn-out cry, which I 
interpreted as a call to a mate, echoing down into the valley. 
Then without any further hesitation he walked boldly up to the 
kill, and as he nosed it I aligned the sights of my rifle on him. I 



know of only one instance of a Himalayan bear eating a human 
being; on that occasion a woman cutting grass had fallen down 
a cliff and been killed, and a bear finding the mangled body had 
carried it away and had eaten it. This bear, however, on whose 
shoulder my sights were aligned, appeared to draw the line at 
human flesh, and after looking at and smelling the kill 
continued his interrupted course to the west. When the sounds 
of his retreat died away in the distance the jungle settled down 
to silence until interrupted, a little after sunrise, by Ibbotson's 
very welcome arrival. 

With Ibbotson came the brother and other relatives of the dead 
man, who very reverently wrapped the remains in a clean white 
cloth and, laying it on a cradle made of two saplings and rope 
which Ibbotson provided, set off for the burning ghat on the 
banks of the Sarda, repeating under their breath as they went 
the Hindu hymn of praise 'Ram nam sat hai' with its refrain, 
'Satya bol gat hai 1 . 

Fourteen hours in the cold had not been without its effect on 
me, but after partaking of the hot drink and food Ibbotson had 
brought, I felt none the worse for my long vigil. 

II 

After following the Ibbotsons down to Chuka on the evening of 
the 27th the tigress, some time during the night, crossed the 
Ladhya into the scrub jungle at the back of our camp. Through 
this scrub ran a path that had been regularly used by the 
villagers of the Ladhya valley until the advent of the man-eater 
had rendered its passage unsafe. On the 28th the two mail- 
runners who carried Ibbotson's dak on its first stage to 
Tanakpur got delayed in camp and to save time took, or more 
correctly started to take, a short cut through this scrub. Very 
fortunately the leading man was on the alert and saw the 
tigress as she crept through the scrub and lay down near the 
path ahead of them. 

Ibbotson and I had just got back from Thak when these two 
men dashed into camp, and taking our rifles we hurried off to 


investigate. We found the pug marks of the tigress where she 
had come out on the path and followed the men for a short 
distance, but we did not see her though in one place where the 
scrub was very dense we saw a movement and heard an animal 
moving off. 

On the morning of the 29th, a party of men came down from 
Thak to report that one of their bullocks had not returned to 
the cattle-shed the previous night, and on a search being made 
where it had last been seen a little blood had been found. At 2 
p.m. the Ibbotsons and I were at this spot, and a glance at the 
ground satisfied us that the bullock had been killed and carried 
away by a tiger. After a hasty lunch Ibbotson and I, with two 
men following carrying ropes for a machan, set out along the 
drag. It went diagonally across the face of the hill for a 
hundred yards and then straight down into the ravine in which 
I had fired at and missed the big tiger in April. A few hundred 
yards down this ravine the bullock, which was an enormous 
animal, had got fixed between two rocks and, not being able to 
move it, the tiger had eaten a meal off its hind quarters and left 
it. 

The pug marks of the tiger, owing to the great weight she was 
carrying, were splayed out and it was not possible to say 
whether she was the man-eater or not; but as every tiger in this 
area was suspect I decided to sit up over the kill. There was 
only one tree within reasonable distance of the kill, and as the 
men climbed into it to make a machan the tiger started calling 
in the valley below. Very hurriedly a few strands of rope were 
tied between two branches, and while Ibbotson stood on guard 
with his rifle I climbed the tree and took my seat on what, 
during the next fourteen hours, proved to be the most 
uncomfortable as well as the most dangerous machan I have 
ever sat on. The tree was leaning away from the hill, and from 
the three uneven strands of rope I was sitting on there was a 
drop of over a hundred feet into the rocky ravine below. 

The tiger called several times as I was getting into the tree and 



continued to call at longer intervals late into the evening, the 
last call coming from a ridge half a mile away. It was now quite 
evident that the tiger had been lying up close to the kill and 
had seen the men climbing into the tree. Knowing from past 
experience what this meant, she had duly expressed 
resentment at being disturbed and then gone away, for though 
I sat on the three strands of rope until Ibbotson returned next 
morning I did not see or hear anything throughout the night. 

Vultures were not likely to find the kill, for the ravine was deep 
and overshadowed by trees, and as the bullock was large 
enough to provide the tiger with several meals we decided not 
to sit up over it again where it was now lying, hoping the tiger 
would remove it to some more convenient place where we 
should have a better chance of getting a shot. In this however 
we were disappointed, for the tiger did not again return to the 
kill. 

Two nights later the buffalo we had tied out behind our camp at 
Sem was killed, and through a little want of observation on my 
part a great opportunity of bagging the man-eater was lost. 

The men who brought in the news of this kill reported that the 
rope securing the animal had been broken, and that the kill had 
been carried away up the ravine at the lower end of which it 
had been tied. This was the same ravine in which MacDonald 
and I had chased a tigress in April, and as on that occasion she 
had taken her kill some distance up the ravine I now very 
foolishly concluded she had done the same with this kill. 

After breakfast Ibbotson and I went out to find the kill and see 
what prospect there was for an evening sit-up. 

The ravine in which the buffalo had been killed was about fifty 
yards wide and ran deep into the foot-hills. For two hundred 
yards the ravine was straight and then bent round to the left. 
Just beyond the bend, and on the left-hand side of it, there was 
a dense patch of young saplings backed by a hundred-foot 
ridge on which thick grass was growing. In the ravine, and 



close to the saplings, there was a small pool of water. I had 
been up the ravine several times in April and had failed to mark 
the patch of saplings as being a likely place for a tiger to lie up 
in, and did not take the precautions I should have taken when 
rounding the bend, with the result that the tigress who was 
drinking at the pool saw us first. There was only one safe line 
of retreat for her and she took it. This was straight up the steep 
hill, over the ridge, and into the sal forest beyond. 

The hill was too steep for us to climb, so we continued on up 
the ravine to where a sambur track crossed it, and following 
this track we gained the ridge. The tigress was now in a 
triangular patch of jungle bounded by the ridge, the Ladhya, 
and a cliff down which no animal could go. The area was not 
large, and there were several deer in it which from time to time 
advised us of the position of the tigress, but unfortunately the 
ground was cut up by a number of deep and narrow rain-water 
channels in which we eventually lost touch with her. 

We had not yet seen the kill, so we re-entered the ravine by the 
sambur track and found the kill hidden among the saplings. 
These saplings were from six inches to a foot in girth, and were 
not strong enough to support a machan, so we had to abandon 
the idea of a machan. With the help of a crowbar a rock could 
possibly have been prised from the face of the hill and a place 
made in which to sit, but this was not advisable when dealing 
with a man-eater. 

Reluctant to give up the chance of a shot we considered the 
possibility of concealing ourselves in the grass near the kill, in 
the hope that the tigress would return before dark and that we 
should see her before she saw us. There were two objections to 
this plan: (a) if we did not get a shot and the tigress saw us 
near her kill she might abandon it as she had done her other 
two kills and (b) between the kill and camp there was very 
heavy scrub jungle, and if we tried to go through this jungle in 
the dark the tigress would have us at her mercy. So very 
reluctantly we decided to leave the kill to the tigress for that 



night, and hope for the best on the morrow. 

On our return next morning we found that the tigress had 
carried away the kill. For three hundred yards she had gone up 
the bed of the ravine, stepping from rock to rock, and leaving 
no drag marks. At this spot— three hundred yards from where 
she had picked up the kill— we were at fault, for though there 
were a number of tracks on a wet patch of ground, none of 
them had been made while she was carrying the kill. 

Eventually, after casting round in circles, we found where she 
had left the ravine and gone up the hill on the left. 

This hill up which the tigress had taken her kill was overgrown 
with ferns and goldenrod and tracking was not difficult, but the 
going was, for the hill was very steep and in places a detour 
had to be made and the track picked up further on. After a stiff 
climb of a thousand feet we came to a small plateau, bordered 
on the left by a cliff a mile wide. On the side of the plateau 
nearest the cliff the ground was seamed and cracked, and in 
these cracks a dense growth of sal, two to six feet in height, 
had sprung up. The tigress had taken her kill into this dense 
cover and it was not until we actually trod on it that we were 
aware of its position. 

As we stopped to look at all that remained of the buffalo there 
was a low growl to our right. With rifles raised we waited for a 
minute and then, hearing a movement in the undergrowth a 
little beyond where the growl had come from, we pushed our 
way through the young sal for ten yards and came on a small 
clearing, where the tigress had made herself a bed on some 
soft grass. On the far side of this grass the hill sloped upwards 
for twenty yards to another plateau, and it was from this slope 
that the sound we had heard had come. Proceeding up the 
slope as silently as possible we had just reached the flat 
ground, which was about fifty yards wide, when the tigress left 
the far side and went down into the ravine, disturbing some 
kaleege pheasants and a kakar as she did so. To have followed 
her would have been useless, so we went back to the kill and. 



as there was still a good meal on it, we selected two trees to sit 
in, and returned to camp. 

After an early lunch we went back to the kill and, hampered 
with our rifles, climbed with some difficulty into the trees we 
had selected. We sat up for five hours without seeing or 
hearing anything. At dusk we climbed down from our trees, and 
stumbling over the cracked and uneven ground eventually 
reached the ravine when it was quite dark. Both of us had an 
uneasy feeling that we were being followed, but by keeping 
close together we reached camp without incident at 9 p.m. 

The Ibbotsons had now stayed at Sem as long as it was possible 
for them to do so, and early next morning they set out on their 
twelve days' walk to keep their appointment at Askot. Before 
leaving, Ibbotson extracted a promise from me that I would not 
follow up any kills alone, or further endanger my life by 
prolonging my stay at Sem for more than a day or two. 

After the departure of the Ibbotsons and their fifty men, the 
camp, which was surrounded by dense scrub, was reduced to 
my two servants and myself— my coolies were living in a room 
in the Headman's house— so throughout the day I set all hands 
to collecting driftwood, of which there was an inexhaustible 
supply at the junction, to keep a fire going all night. The fire 
would not scare away the tigress but it would enable us to see 
her if she prowled round our tents at night, and anyway the 
nights were setting in cold and there was ample excuse, if one 
were needed, for keeping a big fire going all night. 

Towards evening, when my men were safely back in camp, I 
took a rifle and went up the Ladhya to see if the tigress had 
crossed the river. I found several tracks in the sand, but no 
fresh ones, and at dusk I returned, convinced that the tigress 
was still on our side of the river. An hour later, when it was 
quite dark, a kakar started barking close to our tents and 
barked persistently for half an hour. 

My men had taken over the job of tying out the buffaloes, a 



task which Ibbotson's men had hitherto performed, and next 
morning I accompanied them when they went out to bring in 
the buffaloes. Though we covered several miles I did not find 
any trace of the tigress. After breakfast I took a rod and went 
down to the junction, and had one of the best day's fishing I 
have ever had. The junction was full of big fish, and though my 
light tackle was broken frequently I killed sufficient mahseer to 
feed the camp. 

Again, as on the previous evening, I crossed the Ladhya, with 
the intention of taking up a position on a rock overlooking the 
open ground on the right bank of the river and watching for the 
tigress to cross. As I got away from the roar of the water at the 
junction I heard a sambur and a monkey calling on the hill to 
my left, and as I neared the rock I came on the fresh tracks of 
the tigress. Following them back I found the stones still wet 
where she had forded the river. A few minutes' delay in camp to 
dry my fishing line and have a cup of tea cost a man his life, 
several thousand men weeks of anxiety, and myself many days 
of strain, for though I stayed at Sem for another three days I 
did not get another chance of shooting the tigress. 

On the morning of the 7th, as I was breaking camp and 
preparing to start on my twenty-mile walk to Tanakpur, a big 
contingent of men from all the surrounding villages arrived, 
and begged me not to leave them to the tender mercies of the 
maneater. Giving them what advice it was possible to give 
people situated as they were, I promised to return as soon as it 
was possible for me to do so. 

I caught the train at Tanakpur next morning and arrived back 
in Naini Tal on 9 November, having been away nearly a month. 

Ill 

I left Sem on the 7th of November and on the 12th the tigress 
killed a man at Thak. I received news of this kill through the 
Divisional Forest Officer, Haidwani, shortly after we had moved 
down to our winter home at the foot of the hills, and by doing 
forced marches I arrived at Chuka a little after sunrise on the 



24th. 


It had been my intention to breakfast at Chuka and then go on 
to Thak and make that village my headquarters, but the 
Headman of Thak, whom I found installed at Chuka, informed 
me that every man, woman, and child had left Thak 
immediately after the man had been killed on the 12th, and 
added that if I carried out my intention of camping at Thak I 
might be able to safeguard my own life, but it would not be 
possible to safeguard the lives of my men. This was quite 
reasonable, and while waiting for my men to arrive, the 
Headman helped me to select a site for my camp at Chuka 
where my men would be reasonably safe and I should have 
some privacy from the thousands of men who were now 
arriving to fell the forest. 

On receipt of the Divisional Forest Officer's telegram 
acquainting me of the kill, I had telegraphed to the Tahsildar at 
Tanakpur to send three young male buffaloes to Chuka. My 
request had been promptly complied with and the three 
animals had arrived the previous evening. 

After breakfast I took one of the buffaloes and set out for Thak, 
intending to tie it up on the spot where the man had been killed 
on the 12th. The Headman had given me a very graphic 
account of the events of that date, for he himself had nearly 
fallen a victim to the tigress. It appeared that towards the 
afternoon, accompanied by his granddaughter, a girl ten years 
of age, he had gone to dig up ginger tubers in a field some sixty 
yards from his house. This field is about half an acre in extent 
and is surrounded on three sides by jungle, and being on the 
slope of a fairly steep hill it is visible from the Headman's 
house. After the old man and his granddaughter had been at 
work for some time his wife, who was husking rice in the 
courtyard of the house, called out in a very agitated voice and 
asked him if he was deaf that he could not hear the pheasants 
and other birds that were chattering in the jungle above him. 
Fortunately for him, he acted promptly. Dropping his hoe, he 



grabbed the child's hand and together they ran back to the 
house, urged on by the woman who said she could now see a 
red animal in the bushes at the upper end of the field. Half an 
hour later the tigress killed a man who was lopping branches 
off a tree in a field three hundred yards from the Headman's 
house. 

From the description I had received from the Headman I had 
no difficulty in locating the tree. It was a small gnarled tree 
growing out of a three-foot-high bank between two terraced 
fields, and had been lopped year after year for cattle fodder. 
The man who had been killed was standing on the trunk 
holding one branch and cutting another, when the tigress came 
up from behind, tore his hold from the branch and, after killing 
him, carried him away into the dense brushwood bordering the 
fields. 

Thak village was a gift from the Chand Rajas, who ruled 
Kumaon for many hundreds of years before the Gurkha 
occupation, to the forefathers of the present owners in return 
for their services at the Punagiri temples. (The promise made 
by the Chand Rajas that the lands of Thak and two other 
villages would remain rent-free for all time has been honoured 
by the British Government for a hundred years.) From a 
collection of grass huts the village has in the course of time 
grown into a very prosperous settlement with masonry houses 
roofed with slate tiles, for not only is the land very fertile, but 
the revenue from the temples is considerable. 

Like all other villages in Kumaon, Thak during its hundreds of 
years of existence has passed through many vicissitudes, but 
never before in its long history had it been deserted as it now 
was. On my previous visits I had found it a hive of industry, but 
when I went up to it this afternoon, taking the young buffalo 
with me, silence reigned over it. Every one of the hundred or 
more inhabitants had fled taking their livestock with them— 
the only animal I saw in the village was a cat, which gave me a 
warm welcome; so hurried had the evacuation been that many 



of the doors of the houses had been left wide open. On every 
path in the village, in the courtyard of the houses and in the 
dust before all the doors I found the tigress's pug marks. The 
open doorways were a menace, for the path as it wound 
through the village passed close to them, and in any of the 
houses the tigress might have been lurking. 

On the hill thirty yards above the village were several cattle 
shelters, and in the vicinity of these shelters I saw more 
kaleege pheasants, red jungle fowl and white-capped babblers 
than I have ever before seen, and from the confiding way in 
which they permitted me to walk among them it is quite 
evident that the people of Thak have a religious prejudice 
against the taking of life. 

From the terraced fields above the cattle shelters a bird's-eye 
view of the village is obtained, and it was not difficult, from the 
description the Headman had given me, to locate the tree 
where the tigress had secured her last victim. In the soft earth 
under the tree there were signs of a struggle and a few clots of 
dried blood. From here the tigress had carried her kill a 
hundred yards over a ploughed field, through a stout hedge, 
and into the dense brushwood beyond. The foot-prints from the 
village, and back the way they had come, showed that the 
entire population of the village had visited the scene of the kill, 
but from the tree to the hedge there was only one track, the 
track the tigress had made when carrying away her victim. No 
attempt had been made to follow her up and recover the body. 

Scraping away a little earth from under the tree I exposed a 
root and to this root I tied my buffalo, bedding it down with a 
liberal supply of straw taken from a nearby haystack. 

The village, which is on the north face of the hill, was now in 
shadow, and if I was to get back to camp before dark it was 
time for me to make a start. Skirting round the village to avoid 
the menace of the open doorways, I joined the path below the 
houses. 



This path after it leaves the village passes under a giant mango 
tree from the roots of which issues a cold spring of clear water. 
After running along a groove cut in a massive slab of rock, this 
water falls into a rough masonry trough, from where it spreads 
onto the surrounding ground, rendering it soft and slushy. I had 
drunk at the spring on my way up, leaving my foot-prints in this 
slushy ground, and on approaching the spring now for a second 
drink, I found the tigress's pug marks superimposed on my 
foot-prints. After quenching her thirst the tigress had avoided 
the path and had gained the village by climbing a steep bank 
overgrown with strobilanthes and nettles, and taking up a 
position in the shelter of one of the houses had possibly 
watched me while I was tying up the buffalo, expecting me to 
return the way I had gone; it was fortunate for me that I had 
noted the danger of passing those open doorways a second 
time, and had taken the longer way round. 

When coming up from Chuka I had taken every precaution to 
guard against a sudden attack, and it was well that I had done 
so, for I now found from her pug marks that the tigress had 
followed me all the way up from my camp, and next morning 
when I went back to Thak I found she had followed me from 
where I had joined the path below the houses, right down to 
the cultivated land at Chuka. 

Reading with the illumination I had brought with me was not 
possible, so after dinner that night, while sitting near a fire 
which was as welcome for its warmth as it was for the feeling 
of security it gave me, I reviewed the whole situation and tried 
to think out some plan by which it would be possible to 
circumvent the tigress. 

When leaving home on the 22nd I had promised that I would 
return in ten days, and that this would be my last expedition 
after man-eaters. Years of exposure and strain and long 
absences from home extending as in the case of the Chowgarh 
tigress and the Rudraprayag leopard to several months on end 
were beginning to tell as much on my constitution as on the 



nerves of those at home, and if by the 30th of November I had 
not succeeded in killing this man-eater, others would have to be 
found who were willing to take on the task. 

It was now the night of the 24th, so I had six clear days before 
me. Judging from the behaviour of the tigress that evening she 
appeared to be anxious to secure another human victim, and it 
should not therefore be difficult for me, in the time at my 
disposal, to get in touch with her. There were several methods 
by which this could be accomplished, and each would be tried 
in turn. The method that offers the greatest chance of success 
of shooting a tiger in the hills is to sit up in a tree over a kill, 
and if during that night the tigress did not kill the buffalo I had 
tied up at Thak, I would the following night, and every night 
thereafter, tie up the other two buffaloes in places I had 
already selected, and failing to secure a human kill it was just 
possible that the tigress might kill one of my buffaloes, as she 
had done on a previous occasion when the Ibbotsons and I 
were camped at Sem in April. After making up the fire with 
logs that would burn all night, I turned in, and went to sleep 
listening to a kakar barking in the scrub jungle behind my tent. 

While breakfast was being prepared the following morning I 
picked up a rifle and went out to look for tracks on the stretch 
of sand on the right bank of the river, between Chuka and Sem. 
The path, after leaving the cultivated land, runs for a short 
distance through scrub jungle, and here I found the tracks of a 
big male leopard, possibly the same animal that had alarmed 
the kakar the previous night. A small male tiger had crossed 
and recrossed the Ladhya many times during the past week, 
and in the same period the man-eater had crossed only once, 
coming from the direction of Sem. A big bear had traversed the 
sand a little before my arrival, and when I got back to camp the 
timber contractors complained that while distributing work 
that morning they had run into a bear which had taken up a 
very threatening attitude, in consequence of which their labour 
had refused to work in the area in which the bear had been 


seen. 



Several thousand men— the contractors put the figure at five 
thousand— had now concentrated at Chuka and Kumaya Chak 
to fell and saw up the timber and carry it down to the motor 
road that was being constructed, and all the time this 
considerable labour force was working they shouted at the tops 
of their voices to keep up their courage. The noise in the valley 
resulting from axe and saw, the crashing of giant trees down 
the steep hillside, the breaking of rocks with sledge hammers, 
and combined with it all the shouting of thousands of men, can 
better be imagined than described. That there were many 
frequent alarms in this nervous community was only natural, 
and during the next few days I covered much ground and lost 
much valuable time in investigating false rumours of attacks 
and kills by the man-eater, for the dread of the tigress was not 
confined to the Ladhya valley but extended right down the 
Sarda through Kaldhunga to the gorge, an area of roughly fifty 
square miles in which an additional ten thousand men were 
working. 

That a single animal should terrorize a labour force of these 
dimensions in addition to the residents of the surrounding 
villages and the hundreds of men who were bringing foodstuffs 
for the labourers or passing through the valley with hill 
produce in the way of oranges (purchasable at twelve annas a 
hundred), walnuts, and chillies to the market at Tanakpur, is 
incredible, and would be unbelievable were it not for the 
historical, and nearly parallel, case of the man-eater of Tsavo, 
where a pair of lions, operating only at night, held up work for 
long periods on the Uganda Railway. 

To return to my story. Breakfast disposed of on the morning of 
the 25th, I took a second buffalo and set out for Thak. The path, 
after leaving the cultivated land at Chuka, skirts along the foot 
of the hill for about half a mile before it divides. One arm goes 
straight up a ridge to Thak and the other, after continuing 
along the foot of the hill for another half-mile, zigzags up 
through Kumaya Chak to Kot Kindri. 



At the divide I found the pug marks of the tigress and followed 
them all the way back to Thak. The fact that she had come 
down the hill after me the previous evening was proof that she 
had not killed the buffalo. This, though very disappointing, was 
not at all unusual; for tigers will on occasions visit an animal 
that is tied up for several nights in succession before they 
finally kill it, for tigers do not kill unless they are hungry. 

Leaving the second buffalo at the mango tree, where there was 
an abundance of green grass, I skirted round the houses and 
found No. 1 buffalo sleeping peacefully after a big feed and a 
disturbed night. The tigress, coming from the direction of the 
village as her pug marks showed, had approached to within a 
few feet of the buffalo, and had then gone back the way she 
had come. Taking the buffalo down to the spring I let it graze 
for an hour or two, and then took it back and tied it up at the 
same spot where it had been the previous night. 

The second buffalo I tied up fifty yards from the mango tree 
and at the spot where the wailing woman and villagers had met 
us the day the Ibbotsons and I had gone up to investigate the 
human kill. Here a ravine a few feet deep crossed the path, on 
one side of which there was a dry stump, and on the other an 
almond tree in which a machan could be made. I tied No. 2 
buffalo to the stump, and bedded it down with sufficient hay to 
keep it going for several days. There was nothing more to be 
done at Thak so I returned to camp and, taking the third 
buffalo, crossed the Ladhya and tied it up behind Sem, in the 
ravine where the tigress had killed one of our buffaloes in 
April. 

At my request the Tahsildar of Tanakpur had selected three of 
the fattest young male buffaloes he could find. All three were 
now tied up in places frequented by the tigress, and as I set out 
to visit them on the morning of the 26th I had great hopes that 
one of them had been killed and that I should get an 
opportunity of shooting the tigress over it. Starting with the 
one across the Ladhya, I visited all in turn and found that the 



tigress had not touched any of them. Again, as on the previous 
morning, I found her tracks on that path leading to Thak, but 
on this occasion there was a double set of pug marks, one 
coming down and the other going back. On both her journeys 
the tigress had kept to the path and had passed within a few 
feet of the buffalo that was tied to the stump, fifty yards from 
the mango tree. 

On my return to Chuka a deputation of Thak villagers led by 
the Headman came to my tent and requested me to accompany 
them to the village to enable them to replenish their supply of 
foodstuffs, so at midday, followed by the Headman and his 
tenants, and by four of my own men carrying ropes for a 
machan and food for me, I returned to Thak and mounted 
guard while the men hurriedly collected the provisions they 
needed. 

After watering and feeding the two buffaloes I retied No. 2 to 
the stump and took No. 1 half a mile down the hill and tied it to 
a sapling on the side of the path. I then took the villagers back 
to Chuka and returned a few hundred yards up the hill for a 
scratch meal while my men were making the machan. 

It was now quite evident that the tigress had no fancy for my 
fat buffaloes, and as in three days I had seen her tracks five 
times on the path leading to Thak, I decided to sit up over the 
path and try to get a shot at her that way. To give me warning 
of the tigress's approach I tied a goat with a bell round its neck 
on the path, and at 4 p.m. I climbed into the tree. I told my men 
to return at 8 a.m. the following morning, and began my watch. 

At sunset a cold wind started blowing and while I was 
attempting to pull a coat over my shoulders the ropes on one 
side of the machan slipped, rendering my seat very 
uncomfortable. An hour later a storm came on, and though it 
did not rain for long it wet me to the skin, greatly adding to my 
discomfort. During the sixteen hours I sat in the tree I did not 
see or hear anything. The men turned up at 8 a.m. I returned to 
camp for a hot bath and a good meal, and then, accompanied 



by six of my men, set out for Thak. 

The overnight rain had washed all the old tracks off the path, 
and two hundred yards above the tree I had sat in I found the 
fresh pug marks of the tigress, where she had come out of the 
jungle and gone up the path in the direction of Thak. Very 
cautiously I stalked the first buffalo, only to find it lying asleep 
on the path; the tigress had skirted round it, rejoined the path 
a few yards further on and continued up the hill. Following on 
her tracks I approached the second buffalo, and as I got near 
the place where it had been tied two blue Himalayan magpies 
rose off the ground and went screaming down the hill. 

The presence of these birds indicated (a) that the buffalo was 
dead, (b) that it had been partly eaten and not carried away, 
and (c) that the tigress was not in the close vicinity 

On arrival at the stump to which it had been tied I saw that the 
buffalo had been dragged off the path and partly eaten, and on 
examining the animal I found that it had not been killed by the 
tigress but that it had in all probability died of snake-bite (there 
were many hamadryads in the surrounding jungles), and that, 
finding it lying dead on the path, the tigress had eaten a meal 
off it and had then tried to drag it away When she found she 
could not break the rope, she had partly covered the kill over 
with dry leaves and brush-wood and continued on her way up 
to Thak. 

Tigers as a rule are not carrion eaters but they do on occasions 
eat animals they themselves have not killed. For instance, on 
one occasion I left the carcass of a leopard on a fire track and, 
when I returned next morning to recover a knife I had 
forgotten, I found that a tiger had removed the carcass to a 
distance of a hundred yards and eaten two-thirds of it. 

On my way up from Chuka I had dismantled the machan I had 
sat on the previous night, and while two of my men climbed 
into the almond tree to make a seat for me— the tree was not 
big enough for a machan— the other four went to the spring to 



fill a kettle and boil some water for tea. By 4 p.m. I had 
partaken of a light meal of biscuits and tea which would have 
to keep me going until next day and refusing the men's request 
to be permitted to stay the night in one of the houses in Thak, I 
sent them back to camp. There was a certain amount of risk in 
doing this, but it was nothing compared to the risk they would 
run if they spent the night in Thak. 

My seat on the tree consisted of several strands of rope tied 
between two upright branches, with a couple of strands lower 
down for my feet to rest on. When I had settled down 
comfortably I pulled the branches round me and secured them 
in position with a thin cord, leaving a small opening to see and 
fire through. My 'hide 7 was soon tested, for shortly after the 
men had gone the two magpies returned, and attracted others, 
and nine of them fed on the kill until dusk. The presence of the 
birds enabled me to get some sleep, for they would have given 
me warning of the tigress's approach, and with their departure 
my all-night vigil started. 

There was still sufficient daylight to shoot by when the moon, a 
day off the full, rose over the Nepal hills behind me and flooded 
the hillside with brilliant light. The rain of the previous night 
had cleared the atmosphere of dust and smoke and, after the 
moon had been up a few minutes, the light was so good that I 
was able to see a sambur and her young one feeding in a field 
of wheat a hundred and fifty yards away. 

The dead buffalo was directly in front and about twenty yards 
away, and the path along which I expected the tigress to come 
was two or three yards nearer, so I should have an easy shot at 
a range at which it would be impossible to miss the tigress- 
provided she came; and there was no reason why she should 
not do so. 

The moon had been up two hours, and the sambur had 
approached to within fifty yards of my tree, when a kakar 
started barking on the hill just above the village. The kakar had 
been barking for some minutes when suddenly a scream which 



I can only very inadequately describe as 'Ar-Ar-Arr' dying away 
on a long-drawn-out note, came from the direction of the 
village. So sudden and so unexpected had the scream been that 
I involuntarily stood up with the intention of slipping down 
from the tree and dashing up to the village, for the thought 
flashed through my mind that the man-eater was killing one of 
my men. Then in a second flash of thought I remembered I had 
counted them one by one as they had passed my tree, and that 
I had watched them out of sight on their way back to camp to 
see if they were obeying my instructions to keep close together. 

The scream had been the despairing cry of a human being in 
mortal agony, and reason questioned how such a sound could 
have come from a deserted village. It was not a thing of my 
imagination, for the kakar had heard it and had abruptly 
stopped barking, and the sambur had dashed away across the 
fields closely followed by her young one. Two days previously, 
when I had escorted the men to the village, I had remarked 
that they appeared to be very confiding to leave their property 
behind doors that were not even shut or latched, and the 
Headman had answered that even if their village remained 
untenanted for years their property would be quite safe, for 
they were priests of Punagiri and no one would dream of 
robbing them; he added that as long as the tigress lived she 
was a better guard of their property— if guard were needed— 
than any hundred men could be, for no one in all that 
countryside would dare to approach the village, for any 
purpose, through the dense forests that surrounded it, unless 
escorted by me as they had been. 

The screams were not repeated, and as there appeared to be 
nothing that I could do I settled down again on my rope seat. At 
10 p.m. a kakar that was feeding on the young wheat crop at 
the lower end of the fields dashed away barking, and a minute 
later the tigress called twice. She had now left the village and 
was on the move, and even if she did not fancy having another 
meal off the buffalo there was every hope of her coming along 
the path which she had used twice every day for the past few 



days. With finger on trigger and eyes straining on the path I sat 
hour after hour until daylight succeeded moonlight, and when 
the sun had been up an hour, my men returned. Very 
thoughtfully they had brought a bundle of dry wood with them, 
and in a surprisingly short time I was sitting down to a hot cup 
of tea. The tigress may have been lurking in the bushes close to 
us, or she may have been miles away, for after she had called at 
10 p.m. the jungles had been silent. 

When I got back to camp I found a number of men sitting near 
my tent. Some of these men had come to inquire what luck I 
had had the previous night, and others had come to tell me that 
the tigress had called from midnight to a little before sunrise at 
the foot of the hill, and that all the labourers engaged in the 
forests and on the new export road were too frightened to go to 
work. I had already heard about the tigress from my men, who 
had informed me that, together with the thousands of men who 
were camped round Chuka, they had sat up all night to keep 
big fires going. 

Among the men collected near my tent was the Headman of 
Thak, and when the others had gone I questioned him about 
the kill at Thak on the 12 th of the month when he so narrowly 
escaped falling a victim to the man-eater. 

Once again the Headman told me in great detail how he had 
gone to his fields to dig ginger, taking his grandchild with him, 
and how on hearing his wife calling he had caught the child's 
hand and run back to the house— where his wife had said a 
word or two to him about not keeping his ears open and 
thereby endangering his own and the child's life— and how a 
few minutes later the tigress had killed a man while he was 
cutting leaves off a tree in a field above his house. 

All this part of the story I had heard before, and I now asked 
him if he had actually seen the tigress killing the man. His 
answer was, no; and he added that the tree was not visible 
from where he had been standing. I then asked him how he 
knew the man had been killed, and he said, because he had 



heard him. In reply to further questions he said the man had 
not called for help but had cried out; and when asked if he had 
cried out once he said, 'No, three times ', and then at my 
request he gave an imitation of the man's cry. It was the same— 
but a very modified rendering— as the screams I had heard the 
previous night. 

I then told him what I had heard and asked him if it was 
possible for anyone to have arrived at the village accidentally, 
and his answer was an emphatic negative. There were only two 
paths leading to Thak, and every man, woman, and child in the 
villages through which these two paths passed knew that Thak 
was deserted and the reason for its being so. It was known 
throughout the district that it was dangerous to go near Thak 
in daylight, and it was therefore quite impossible for anyone to 
have been in the village at eight o'clock the previous night. 

When asked if he could give any explanation for screams 
having come from a village in which there could not— 
according to him— have been any human beings, his answer 
was that he could not. 

And as I could do no better than the Headman it were best to 
assume that neither the kakar, the sambur, nor I heard those 
very real screams— the screams of a human being in mortal 
agony. 

IV 

When all my visitors, including the Headman, had gone, and I 
was having breakfast, my servant informed me that the 
Headman of Sem had come to the camp the previous evening 
and had left word for me that his wife, while cutting grass near 
the hut where his mother had been killed, had come on a blood 
trail, and that he would wait for me near the ford over the 
Ladhya in the morning. So after breakfast I set out to 
investigate this trail. 

While I was fording the river I saw four men hurrying towards 
me, and as soon as I was on dry land they told me that when 


they were coming down the hill above Sem they had heard a 
tiger calling across the valley on the hill between Chuka and 
Thak. The noise of the water had prevented my hearing the 
call. I told the men that I was on my way to Sem and would 
return to Chuka shortly and left them. 

The Headman was waiting for me near his house, and his wife 
took me to where she had seen the blood trail the previous day. 
The trail, after continuing along a field for a short distance, 
crossed some big rocks, on one of which I found the hairs of a 
kakar. A little further on I found the pug marks of a big male 
leopard, and while I was looking at them I heard a tiger call. 
Telling my companions to sit down and remain quiet, I listened, 
in order to locate the tiger. Presently I heard the call again, and 
thereafter it was repeated at intervals of about two minutes. 

It was the tigress calling and I located her as being five 
hundred yards below Thak and in the deep ravine which, 
starting from the spring under the mango tree, runs parallel to 
the path and crosses it at its junction with the Kumaya Chak 
path. 

Telling the Headman that the leopard would have to wait to be 
shot at a more convenient time, I set off as hard as I could go 
for camp, picking up at the ford the four men who were waiting 
for my company to Chuka. 

On reaching camp I found a crowd of men round my tent, most 
of them sawyers from Delhi, but including the petty 
contractors, agents, clerks, timekeepers, and gangmen of the 
financier who had taken up the timber and road construction 
contracts in the Ladhya valley. These men had come to see me 
in connexion with my stay at Chuka. They informed me that 
many of the hillmen carrying timber and working on the road 
had left for their homes that morning and that if I left Chuka on 
1st December, as they had heard I intended doing, the entire 
labour force, including themselves, would leave on the same 
day; for already they were too frightened to eat or sleep, and 
no one would dare to remain in the valley after I had gone. It 



was then the morning of 29th November and I told the men 
that I still had two days and two nights and that much could 
happen in that time, but that in any case it would not be 
possible for me to prolong my stay beyond the morning of the 
1st. 

The tigress had by now stopped calling, and when my servant 
had put up something for me to eat I set out for Thak, 
intending, if the tigress called again and I could locate her 
position; to try to stalk her; and if she did not call again, to sit 
up over the buffalo. I found her tracks on the path and saw 
where she had entered the ravine, and though I stopped 
repeatedly on my way up to Thak and listened I did not hear 
her again. So a little before sunset I ate the biscuits and drank 
the bottle of tea I had brought with me, and then climbed into 
the almond tree and took my seat on the few strands of rope 
that had to serve me as a machan. On this occasion the 
magpies were absent, so I was unable to get the hour or two's 
sleep the birds had enabled me to get the previous evening. 

If a tiger fails to return to its kill the first night it does not 
necessarily mean that the kill has been abandoned. I have on 
occasions seen a tiger return on the tenth night and eat what 
could no longer be described as fresh. On the present occasion, 
however, I was not sitting over a kill, but over an animal that 
the tigress had found dead and off which she had made a small 
meal, and had she not been a man-eater I would not have 
considered the chance of her returning the second night good 
enough to justify spending a whole night in a tree when she 
had not taken sufficient interest in the dead buffalo to return to 
it the first night. It was therefore with very little hope of 
getting a shot that I sat on the tree from sunset to sunrise, and 
though the time I spent was not as long as it had been the 
previous night, my discomfort was very much greater, for the 
ropes I was sitting on cut into me, and a cold wind that started 
blowing shortly after moonrise and continued throughout the 
night chilled me to the bone. On this second night I heard no 
jungle or other sounds nor did the sambur and her young one 



come out to feed on the fields. As daylight was succeeding 
moonlight I thought I heard a tiger call in the distance, but 
could not be sure of the sound or of its direction. 

When I got back to camp my servant had a cup of tea and a hot 
bath ready for me, but before I could indulge in the latter— my 
40-lb. tent was not big enough for me to bathe in— I had to get 
rid of the excited throng of people who were clamouring to tell 
me their experiences of the night before. It appeared that 
shortly after moonrise the tigress had started calling close to 
Chuka, and after calling at intervals for a couple of hours had 
gone off in the direction of the labour camps at Kumaya Chak. 
The men in these camps hearing her coming started shouting 
to try to drive her away, but so far from having this effect the 
shouting only infuriated her the more and she demonstrated in 
front of the camps until she had cowed the men into silence. 
Having accomplished this she spent the rest of the night 
between the labour camps and Chuka, daring all and sundry to 
shout at her. Towards morning she had gone away in the 
direction of Thak, and my informants were surprised and very 
disappointed that I had not met her. 

This was my last day of man-eater hunting, and though I was 
badly in need of rest and sleep, I decided to spend what was 
left of it in one last attempt to get in touch with the tigress. 

The people not only of Chuka and Sem but of all the 
surrounding villages, and especially the men from Talla Des 
where some years previously I had shot three man-eaters, were 
very anxious that I should try sitting up over a live goat, for, 
said they, 'All hill tigers eat goats, and as you have had no luck 
with buffaloes, why not try a goat? 1 More to humour them than 
with any hope of getting a shot, I consented to spend this last 
day in sitting up over the two goats I had already purchased for 
this purpose. 

I was convinced that no matter where the tigress wandered to 
at night her headquarters were at Thak, so at midday, taking 
the two goats, and accompanied by four of my men, I set out 



for Thak. 

The path from Chuka to Thak, as I have already mentioned, 
runs up a very steep ridge. A quarter of a mile on this side of 
Thak the path leaves the ridge, and crosses a more or less flat 
bit of ground which extends right up to the mango tree. For its 
whole length across this flat ground the path passes through 
dense brushwood, and is crossed by two narrow ravines which 
run east and join the main ravine. Midway between these two 
ravines, and a hundred yards from the tree I had sat in the 
previous two nights, there is a giant almond tree; this tree had 
been my objective when I left camp. The path passes right 
under the tree and I thought that if I climbed half-way up not 
only should I be able to see the two goats, one of which I 
intended tying at the edge of the main ravine and the other at 
the foot of the hill to the right, but I should also be able to see 
the dead buffalo. As all three of these points were at some 
distance from the tree, I armed myself with an accurate *275 
rifle, in addition to the 450/400 rifle which I took for an 
emergency. 

I found the climb up from Chuka on this last day very trying, 
and I had just reached the spot where the path leaves the ridge 
for the flat ground, when the tigress called about a hundred 
and fifty yards to my left. The ground here was covered with 
dense undergrowth and trees interlaced with creepers, and 
was cut up by narrow and deep ravines, and strewn over with 
enormous boulders— a very unsuitable place in which to stalk a 
man-eater. However, before deciding on what action I should 
take it was necessary to know whether the tigress was lying 
down, as she very well might be, for it was then 1 p.m., or 
whether she was on the move and if so in what direction. So 
making the men sit down behind me I listened, and presently 
the call was repeated; she had moved some fifty yards, and 
appeared to be going up the main ravine in the direction of 
Thak. 

This was very encouraging, for the tree I had selected to sit in 



was only fifty yards from the ravine. After enjoining silence on 
the men and telling them to keep close behind me, we hurried 
along the path. We had about two hundred yards to go to reach 
the tree and had covered half the distance when, as we 
approached a spot where the path was bordered on both sides 
by dense brushwood, a covey of kaleege pheasants rose out of 
the brushwood and went screaming away. I knelt down and 
covered the path for a few minutes, but as nothing happened 
we went cautiously forward and reached the tree without 
further incident. As quickly and as silently as possible one goat 
was tied at the edge of the ravine, while the other was tied at 
the foot of the hill to the right; then I took the men to the edge 
of the cultivated land and told them to stay in the upper 
verandah of the Headman's house until I fetched them, and ran 
back to the tree. I climbed to a height of forty feet, and pulled 
the rifle up after me with a cord I had brought for the purpose. 
Not only were the two goats visible from my seat, one at a 
range of seventy and the other at a range of sixty yards, but I 
could also see part of the buffalo, and as the *275 rifle was 
very accurate I felt sure I could kill the tigress if she showed up 
anywhere on the ground I was overlooking. 

The two goats had lived together ever since I had purchased 
them on my previous visit, and, being separated now, were 
calling lustily to each other. Under normal conditions a goat 
can be heard at a distance of four hundred yards, but here the 
conditions were not normal, for the goats were tied on the side 
of a hill down which a strong wind was blowing, and even if the 
tigress had moved after I had heard her, it was impossible for 
her not to hear them. If she was hungry, as I had every reason 
to believe she was, there was a very good chance of my getting 
a shot. 

After I had been on the tree for ten minutes a kakar barked 
near the spot the pheasants had risen from. For a minute or 
two my hopes rose sky-high and then dropped back to earth, 
for the kakar barked only three times and ended on a note of 
inquiry; evidently there was a snake in the scrub which neither 



he nor the pheasants liked the look of. 

My seat was not uncomfortable and the sun was pleasingly 
warm, so for the next three hours I remained in the tree 
without any discomfort. At 4 p.m. the sun went down behind 
the high hill above Thak and thereafter the wind became 
unbearably cold. For an hour I stood the discomfort, and then 
decided to give up, for the cold had brought on an attack of 
ague, and if the tigress came now it would not be possible for 
me to hit her. I retied the cord to the rifle and let it down, 
climbed down myself and walked to the edge of the cultivated 
land to call up my men. 

V 

There are few people, I imagine, who have not experienced that 
feeling of depression that follows failure to accomplish 
anything they have set out to do. The road back to camp after a 
strenuous day when the chukor(Hill partridge.) bag is full is 
only a step compared with the same road which one plods over, 
mile after weary mile, when the bag is empty, and if this feeling 
of depression has ever assailed you at the end of a single day, 
and when the quarry has only been chukor, you will have some 
idea of the depth of my depression that evening when, after 
calling up my men and untying the goats, I set off on my two- 
mile walk to camp, for my effort had been not of a single day or 
my quarry a few birds, nor did my failure concern only myself. 

Excluding the time spent on the journeys from and to home, I 
had been on the heels of the man-eater from 23rd October to 
7th November, and again from 24th to 30th November, and it is 
only those of you who have walked in fear of having the teeth 
of a tiger meet in your throat who will have any idea of the 
effect on one's nerves of days and weeks of such anticipation. 

Then again my quarry was a man-eater, and my failure to shoot 
it would very gravely affect everyone who was working in, or 
whose homes were in, that area. Already work in the forests 
had been stopped, and the entire population of the largest 
village in the district had abandoned their homes. Bad as the 


conditions were they would undoubtedly get worse if the man- 
eater was not killed, for the entire labour force could not afford 
to stop work indefinitely nor could the population of 
surrounding villages afford to abandon their homes and their 
cultivation as the more prosperous people of Thak had been 
able to do. 

The tigress had long since lost her natural fear of human 
beings as was abundantly evident from her having carried 
away a girl picking up mangoes in a field close to where 
several men were working, killing a woman near the door of 
her house, dragging a man off a tree in the heart of a village, 
and, the previous night, cowing a few thousand men into 
silence. And here was I, who knew full well what the presence 
of a man-eater meant to the permanent and to the temporary 
inhabitants and to all the people who passed through the 
district on their way to the markets at the foot-hills or the 
temples at Punagiri, plodding down to camp on what I had 
promised others would be my last day of man-eater hunting; 
reason enough for a depression of soul which I felt would 
remain with me for the rest of my days. Gladly at that moment 
would I have bartered the success that had attended thirty-two 
years of man-eater hunting for one unhurried shot at the 
tigress. 

I have told you of some of the attempts I made during this 
period of seven days and seven nights to get a shot at the 
tigress, but these were by no means the only attempts I made. I 
knew that I was being watched and followed, and every time I 
went through the two miles of jungle between my camp and 
Thak I tried every trick I have learnt in a lifetime spent in the 
jungles to outwit the tigress. Bitter though my disappointment 
was, I felt that my failure was not in any way due to anything I 
had done or left undone. 

VI 

My men when they rejoined me said that, an hour after the 
kakar had barked, they had heard the tigress calling a long way 


off but were not sure of the direction. Quite evidently the 
tigress had as little interest in goats as she had in buffaloes, 
but even so it was unusual for her to have moved at that time of 
day from a locality in which she was thoroughly at home, 
unless she had been attracted away by some sound which 
neither I nor my men had heard; however that may have been, 
it was quite evident that she had gone, and as there was 
nothing further that I could do I set off on my weary tramp to 
camp. 

The path, as I have already mentioned, joins the ridge that runs 
down to Chuka a quarter of a mile from Thak, and when I now 
got to this spot where the ridge is only a few feet wide and 
from where a view is obtained of the two great ravines that run 
down to the Ladhya river, I heard the tigress call once and 
again across the valley on my left. She was a little above and to 
the left of Kumaya Chak, and a few hundred yards below the 
Kot Kindri ridge on which the men working in that area had 
built themselves grass shelters. 

Here was an opportunity, admittedly forlorn and 
unquestionably desperate, of getting a shot; still it was an 
opportunity and the last I should ever have, and the question 
was, whether or not I was justified in taking it. 

When I got down from the tree I had one hour in which to get 
back to camp before dark. Calling up the men, hearing what 
they had to say, collecting the goats and walking to the ridge 
had taken about thirty minutes, and judging from the position 
of the sun which was now casting a red glow on the peaks of 
the Nepal hills, I calculated I had roughly half an hour's 
daylight in hand. This time factor, or perhaps it would be more 
correct to say light factor, was all-important, for if I took the 
opportunity that offered, on it would depend the lives of five 
men. 

The tigress was a mile away and the intervening ground was 
densely wooded, strewn over with great rocks and cut up by a 
number of deep nullahs, but she could cover the distance well 



within the half-hour— if she wanted to. The question I had to 
decide was, whether or not I should try to call her up. If I called 
and she heard me, and came while it was still daylight and gave 
me a shot, all would be well; on the other hand, if she came and 
did not give me a shot some of us would not reach camp, for we 
had nearly two miles to go and the path the whole way ran 
through heavy jungle, and was bordered in some places by big 
rocks, and in others by dense brushwood. It was useless to 
consult the men, for none of them had ever been in a jungle 
before coming on this trip, so the decision would have to be 
mine. 

I decided to try to call up the tigress. 

Handing my rifle over to one of the men I waited until the 
tigress called again and, cupping my hands round my mouth 
and filling my lungs to their utmost limit, sent an answering 
call over the valley. Back came her call and thereafter, for 
several minutes, call answered call. She would come, had in 
fact already started, and if she arrived while there was light to 
shoot by, all the advantages would be on my side, for I had the 
selecting of the ground on which it would best suit me to meet 
her. November is the mating season for tigers and it was 
evident that for the past forty-eight hours she had been 
rampaging through the jungles in search of a mate, and that 
now, on hearing what she thought was a tiger answering her 
mating call, she would lose no time in joining him. 

Four hundred yards down the ridge the path runs for fifty yards 
across a flat bit of ground. At the far right-hand side of this flat 
ground the path skirts a big rock and then drops steeply, and 
continues in a series of hairpin bends, down to the next bend. It 
was at this rock I decided to meet the tigress, and on my way 
down to it I called several times to let her know I was changing 
my position, and also to keep in touch with her. 

I want you now to have a clear picture of the ground in your 
mind, to enable you to follow the subsequent events. Imagine 
then a rectangular piece of ground forty yards wide and eighty 



yards long, ending in a more or less perpendicular rock face. 
The path coming down from Thak runs on to this ground at its 
short or south end, and after continuing down the centre for 
twenty-five yards bends to the right and leaves the rectangle 
on its long or east side. At the point where the path leaves the 
flat ground there is a rock about four feet high. From a little 
beyond where the path bends to the right, a ridge of rock, 
three or four feet high, rises and extends to the north side of 
the rectangle, where the ground falls away in a perpendicular 
rock face. On the near or path side of this low ridge there is a 
dense line of bushes approaching to within ten feet of the four- 
foot-high rock I have mentioned. The rest of the rectangle is 
grown over with trees, scattered bushes, and short grass. 

It was my intention to lie on the path by the side of the rock 
and shoot the tigress as she approached me, but when I tried 
this position I found it would not be possible for me to see her 
until she was within two or three yards, and further, that she 
could get at me either round the rock or through the scattered 
bushes on my left without my seeing her at all. Projecting out 
of the rock, from the side opposite to that from which I 
expected the tigress to approach, there was a narrow ledge. By 
sitting sideways I found I could get a little of my bottom on the 
ledge, and by putting my left hand flat on the top of the 
rounded rock and stretching out my right leg to its full extent 
and touching the ground with my toes, retain my position on it. 
The men and goats I placed immediately behind, and ten to 
twelve feet below me. 

The stage was now set for the reception of the tigress, who 
while these preparations were being made had approached to 
within three hundred yards. Sending out one final call to give 
her direction, I looked round to see if my men were all right. 

The spectacle these men presented would under other 
circumstances have been ludicrous, but was here tragic. Sitting 
in a tight little circle with their knees drawn up and their heads 
together, with the goats burrowing in under them, they had 



that look of intense expectancy on their screwed-up features 
that one sees on the faces of spectators waiting to hear a big 
gun go off. From the time we had first heard the tigress from 
the ridge, neither the men nor the goats had made a sound, 
beyond one suppressed cough. They were probably by now 
frozen with fear— as well they might be— and even if they 
were I take my hat off to those four men who had the courage 
to do what I, had I been in their shoes, would not have dreamt 
of doing. For seven days they had been hearing the most 
exaggerated and blood-curdling tales of this fearsome beast 
that had kept them awake the past two nights, and now, while 
darkness was coming on, and sitting unarmed in a position 
where they could see nothing, they were listening to the man- 
eater drawing nearer and nearer; greater courage, and greater 
faith, it is not possible to conceive. 

The fact that I could not hold my rifle, a D.B. 450/400, with my 
left hand (which I was using to retain my precarious seat on the 
ledge) was causing me some uneasiness, for apart from the 
fear of the rifle slipping on the rounded top of the rock— I had 
folded my handkerchief and placed the rifle on it to try to 
prevent this— I did not know what would be the effect of the 
recoil of a high velocity rifle fired in this position. The rifle was 
pointing along the path, in which there was a hump, and it was 
my intention to fire into the tigress's face immediately it 
appeared over this hump, which was twenty feet from the rock. 

The tigress however did not keep to the contour of the hill, 
which would have brought her out on the path a little beyond 
the hump, but crossed a deep ravine and came straight towards 
where she had heard my last call, at an angle which I can best 
describe as one o'clock. This manoeuvre put the low ridge of 
rock, over which I could not see, between us. She had located 
the direction of my last call with great accuracy, but had 
misjudged the distance, and not finding her prospective mate 
at the spot she had expected him to be, she was now working 
herself up into a perfect fury, and you will have some idea of 
what the fury of a tigress in her condition can be when I tell 



you that not many miles from my home a tigress on one 
occasion closed a public road for a whole week, attacking 
everything that attempted to go along it, including a string of 
camels, until she was finally joined by a mate. 

I know of no sound more liable to fret one's nerves than the 
calling of an unseen tiger at close range. What effect this 
appalling sound was having on my men I was frightened to 
think, and if they had gone screaming down the hill I should 
not have been at all surprised, for even though I had the heel of 
a good rifle to my shoulder and the stock against my cheek I 
felt like screaming myself. 

But even more frightening than this continuous calling was the 
fading out of the light. Another few seconds, ten or fifteen at 
the most, and it would be too dark to see my sights, and we 
should then be at the mercy of a man-eater, plus a tigress 
wanting a mate. Something would have to be done, and done in 
a hurry if we were not to be massacred, and the only thing I 
could think of was to call. 

The tigress was now so close that I could hear the intake of her 
breath each time before she called, and as she again filled her 
lungs, I did the same with mine, and we called simultaneously. 
The effect was startingly instantaneous. Without a second's 
hesitation she came tramping with quick steps through the 
dead leaves, over the low ridge and into the bushes a little to 
my right front, and just as I was expecting her to walk right on 
top of me she stopped, and the next moment the full blast of 
her deep-throated call struck me in the face and would have 
carried the hat off my head had I been wearing one. A second's 
pause, then again quick steps; a glimpse of her as she passed 
between two bushes, and then she stepped right out into the 
open, and, looking into my face, stopped dead. 

By great and unexpected good luck the half-dozen steps the 
tigress took to her right front carried her almost to the exact 
spot at which my rifle was pointing. Had she continued in the 
direction in which she was coming before her last call, my story 



— if written— would have had a different ending, for it would 
have been as impossible to slew the rifle on the rounded top of 
the rock as it would have been to lift and fire it with one hand. 

Owing to the nearness of the tigress, and the fading light, all 
that I could see of her was her head. My first bullet caught her 
under the right eye and the second, fired more by accident 
than with intent, took her in the throat and she came to rest 
with her nose against the rock. The recoil from the right barrel 
loosened my hold on the rock and knocked me off the ledge, 
and the recoil from the left barrel, fired while I was in the air, 
brought the rifle up in violent contact with my jaw and sent me 
heels over head right on top of the men and goats. Once again I 
take my hat off to those four men for, not knowing but what the 
tigress was going to land on them next, they caught me as I fell 
and saved me from injury and my rifle from being broken. 

When I had freed myself from the tangle of human and goat 
legs I took the *275 rifle from the man who was holding it, 
rammed a clip of cartridges into the magazine and sent a 
stream of five bullets singing over the valley and across the 
Sarda into Nepal. Two shots, to the thousands of men in the 
valley and in the surrounding villages who were anxiously 
listening for the sound of my rifle, might mean anything, but 
two shots followed by five more, spaced at regular intervals of 
five seconds, could only be interpreted as conveying one 
message, and that was, that the man-eater was dead. 

I had not spoken to my men from the time we had first heard 
the tigress from the ridge. On my telling them now that she 
was dead and that there was no longer any reason for us to be 
afraid, they did not appear to be able to take in what I was 
saying, so I told them to go up and have a look while I found 
and lit a cigarette. Very cautiously they climbed up to the rock, 
but went no further for, as I have told you, the tigress was 
touching the other side of it. Later in camp that night, while 
sitting round a camp-fire, and relating their experiences to 
relays of eager listeners, their narrative invariably ended up 



with, 'and then the tiger whose roaring had turned our livers 
into water hit the sahib on the head and knocked him down on 
top of us and if you don't believe us, go and look at his face/ A 
mirror is superfluous in camp and even if I had one it could not 
have made the swelling on my jaw, which put me on milk diet 
for several days, look as large and as painful as it felt. 

By the time a sapling had been felled and the tigress lashed to 
it, lights were beginning to show in the Ladhya valley and in all 
the surrounding camps and villages. The four men were very 
anxious to have the honour of carrying the tigress to camp, but 
the task was beyond them; so I left them and set off for help. 

In my three visits to Chuka during the past eight months I had 
been along this path many times by day and always with a 
loaded rifle in my hands, and now I was stumbling down in the 
dark, unarmed, my only anxiety being to avoid a fall. If the 
greatest happiness one can experience is the sudden cessation 
of great pain, then the second greatest happiness is 
undoubtedly the sudden cessation of great fear. One short hour 
previously it would have taken wild elephants to have dragged 
from their homes and camps the men who now, singing and 
shouting, were converging from every direction, singly and in 
groups, on the path leading to Thak. Some of the men of this 
rapidly growing crowd went up the path to help carry in the 
tigress, while others accompanied me on my way to camp, and 
would have carried me had I permitted them. Progress was 
slow, for frequent halts had to be made to allow each group of 
new arrivals to express their gratitude in their own particular 
way. This gave the party carrying the tigress time to catch us 
up, and we entered the village together. I will not attempt to 
describe the welcome my men and I received, or the scenes I 
witnessed at Chuka that night, for having lived the greater part 
of my life in the jungles I have not the ability to paint word- 
pictures. 

A hayrick was dismantled and the tigress laid on it, and an 
enormous bonfire made from driftwood close at hand to light 



up the scene and for warmth, for the night was dark and cold 
with a north wind blowing. Round about midnight my servant, 
assisted by the Headman of Thak and Kunwar Singh, near 
whose house I was camped, persuaded the crowd to return to 
their respective villages and labour camps, telling them they 
would have ample opportunity of feasting their eyes on the 
tigress the following day Before leaving himself, the Headman 
of Thak told me he would send word in the morning to the 
people of Thak to return to their village. This he did, and two 
days later the entire population returned to their homes, and 
have lived in peace ever since. 

After my midnight dinner I sent for Kunwar Singh and told him 
that in order to reach home on the promised date I should have 
to start in a few hours, and that he would have to explain to the 
people in the morning why I had gone. This he promised to do, 
and I then started to skin the tigress. Skinning a tiger with a 
pocket-knife is a long job, but it gives one an opportunity of 
examining the animal that one would otherwise not get, and in 
the case of man-eaters enables one to ascertain, more or less 
accurately, the reason for the animal having become a man- 
eater. 

The tigress was a comparatively young animal and in the 
perfect condition one would expect her to be at the beginning 
of the mating season. Her dark winter coat was without a 
blemish, and in spite of her having so persistently refused the 
meals I had provided for her she was encased in fat. She had 
two old gunshot wounds, neither of which showed on her skin. 
The one in her left shoulder, caused by several pellets of 
homemade buckshot, had become septic, and when healing the 
skin, over quite a large surface, had adhered permanently to 
the flesh. To what extent this wound had incapacitated her it 
would have been difficult to say, but it had evidently taken a 
very long time to heal, and could quite reasonably have been 
the cause of her having become a man-eater. The second 
wound, which was in her right shoulder, had also been caused 
by a charge of buckshot, but had healed without becoming 



septic. These two wounds received over kills in the days before 
she had become a man-eater were quite sufficient reason for 
her not having returned to the human and other kills I had sat 
over. 

After having skinned the tigress I bathed and dressed, and 
though my face was swollen and painful and I had twenty miles 
of rough going before me, I left Chuka walking on air, while the 
thousands of men in and around the valley were peacefully 
sleeping. 

I have come to the end of the jungle stories I set out to tell you 
and I have also come near the end of my man-eater hunting 
career. 

I have had a long spell and count myself fortunate in having 
walked out on my own feet and not been carried out on a 
cradle in the manner and condition of the man of Thak. 

There have been occasions when life has hung by a thread and 
others when a light purse and disease resulting from exposure 
and strain have made the going difficult, but for all these 
occasions I am amply rewarded if my hunting has resulted in 
saving one human life. 



Just Tigers 

I THINK that all sportsmen who have had the opportunity of 
indulging in the twin sports of shooting tigers with a camera 
and shooting them with a rifle will agree with me that the 
difference between these two forms of sport is as great, if not 
greater, than the taking of a trout on light tackle in a snow-fed 
mountain stream, and the killing of a fish on a fixed rod on the 
sun-baked bank of a tank. 

Apart from the difference in cost between shooting with a 
camera and shooting with a rifle, and the beneficial effect it 
has on our rapidly decreasing stock of tigers, the taking of a 
good photograph gives far more pleasure to the sportsman 
than the acquisition of a trophy; and further, while the 
photograph is of interest to all lovers of wild life, the trophy is 
only of interest to the individual who acquired it. As an 
illustration, I would instance Fred Champion. Had Champion 
shot his tigers with a rifle instead of with a camera his trophies 
would long since have lost their hair and been consigned to the 
dustbin, whereas the records made by his camera are a 
constant source of pleasure to him, and are of interest to 
sportsmen in all parts of the world. 

It was looking at the photographs in Champion's book With a 
Camera in Tiger-Land that first gave me the idea of taking 
photographs of tigers. Champion's photographs were taken 
with still camera by flashlight and I decided to go one better 
and try to take tiger pictures with a cine-camera by daylight. 
The gift by a very generous friend of a Bell and Howell 16-mm. 
camera put just the weapon I needed into my hands, and the 
'Freedom of the Forests' which I enjoy enabled me to roam at 
large over a very wide field. For ten years I stalked through 
many hundreds of miles of tiger country, at times being seen off 
by tigers that resented my approaching their kills, and at other 
times being shooed out of the jungle by tigresses that objected 
to my going near their cubs. During this period I learnt a little 
about the habits and ways of tigers, and though I saw tigers on. 



possibly; two hundred occasions I did not succeed in getting 
one satisfactory picture. I exposed films on many occasions, but 
the results were disappointing owing either to overexposure, 
underexposure, obstruction of grass or leaves or cobwebs on 
the lens; and in one case owing to the emulsion on the film 
having been melted while being processed. 

Finally in 1938 I decided to devote the whole winter to making 
one last effort to get a good picture. Having learnt by 
experience that it was not possible to get a haphazard picture 
of a tiger, my first consideration was to find a suitable site, and 
I eventually selected an open ravine fifty yards wide, with a 
tiny stream flowing down the centre of it, and flanked on either 
side by dense tree and scrub jungle. To deaden the sound of my 
camera when taking pictures at close range I blocked the 
stream in several places, making miniature waterfalls a few 
inches high. I then cast round for my tigers, and having located 
seven, in three widely separated areas, started to draw them a 
few yards at a time to my jungle studio. This was a long and a 
difficult job, with many setbacks and disappointments, for the 
area in which I was operating is heavily shot over, and it was 
only by keeping my tigers out of sight that I eventually got 
them to the exact spot where I wanted them. One of the tigers 
for some reason unknown to me left the day after her arrival, 
but not before I had taken a picture of her; the other six I kept 
together and I exposed a thousand feet of film on them. 
Unfortunately it was one of the wettest winters we have ever 
had and several hundred feet of the film were ruined through 
moisture on the lens, underexposure, and packing of the film 
inside the camera due to hurried and careless threading. But, 
even so, I have got approximately six hundred feet of film of 
which I am inordinately proud, for they are a living record of 
six full grown tigers— four males, two of which are over ten 
feet, and two females, one of which is a white tigress— filmed 
in daylight, at ranges varying from ten to sixty feet. 

The whole proceeding from start to finish took four and a half 
months, and during the countless hours I lay near the tiny 



stream and my miniature waterfalls, not one of the tigers ever 
saw me. 

The stalking to within a few feet of six tigers in daylight would 
have been an impossible feat, so they were stalked in the very 
early hours of the morning, before night had gone and daylight 
come— the heavy winter dew making this possible— and were 
filmed as light, and opportunity, offered. 

No matter how clear 16-mm. films may appear when projected 
they do not make good enlargements. However, the 
accompanying photographs will give some idea of my jungle 
studio and the size and condition of the subjects I filmed. 

-END- 